How many people are there in your family?
There are 5 people in my family: my father, mother, brother, sister, and me.
Does your family live in a house or an apartment?
We live in a house in the countryside.
What does your father do?
My father is a doctor. He works at the local hospital.
How old is your mother?
She is 40 years old, 1 year younger than my father.
Do you have any siblings? What’s his/her name?
Yes, I do. I have 1 elder brother, David, and 1 younger sister, Mary.
Are you the oldest amongst your brothers and sisters?
No, I’m not. I’m the second child in my family.
What do your mother/father like?
My father likes playing football and my mother likes cooking.
Do your parents let you stay out late?
Of course not. They always ask me to get home before 10 pm each night.
Do you stay with your parents?
Right now, no, but I used to.
Does your family usually have dinner together?
Yes, we do. My mom always prepares delicious meals for us.
How often do you eat out? Who do you go with?
I often eat out on weekends, when I hang out with my friends.
What restaurant do you usually visit?
Well, there are not many restaurants in my neighborhood, so my best choice is the deli in convenient stores like the Circle K, Mini-Stop, B-smart.
What type of food do you enjoy to eat? Western or Asian?
I’m interested in Asian food, Western food is not my thing.
How much do you usually pay when you eat out?
It’s not very expensive, just around $5 for each meal.
Do you enjoy spicy food?
Yes, I do, especially on cold days.
Are the servers there friendly to you?
Yes, they are. Most of them are really helpful.
Have you ever tried Italian food?
Yes, at least once, when I was in my friend’s wedding party.
Are you concerned about calories when eating out?
Yes, I am. I’m on diet now, so this really matters to me.
Are fast food restaurants like KFC or McDonald’s famous in your country?
Yes, they are. The youth in my country are big fans of fast food.
Do you often drink alcohol when eating out?
No, not often. Just when I have parties with my friends.
How often do you read books?
I read books almost every night before I go to bed.
What’s your favorite type of book?
I love reading about different cultures.
What can you learn from books?
Books can broaden my horizon about thousands of things around the world, and books are also my best friends.
Where do you read books?
I read books at home, sometimes in the library.
What’s the most interesting book you have ever read?
I think that would be Nepal, a book written about the country of Nepal, published in 1999.
How long does it take you to finish a book?
Well, it depends on the length of the book, but it usually takes me a week to finish a 300-page book.
Do you usually bring books with you when you travel?
Yes, I do. When I’m at the airport or bus station, I read books to kill time.
Is there any bookstore or library in your area?
Unfortunately, there are none near my house. The nearest one is 3 kilometers away.
How many places have you traveled to?
I’ve visited all the provinces throughout my country.
Who do you usually go with?
I often go with my family, sometimes with my best friends.
What’s your favorite tourist attraction?
That would be Venice city in Italy. I love riding the gondola along the canals while watching Italian people live their daily lives.
Have you ever been abroad?
Yes, I have. I came to Italy last year for a business trip.
What language do you use when traveling?
English, but sometimes I have to use body language since not all people are good at English.
What do you usually do during your trip?
I often go sightseeing, take pictures, mingle with the local people and sample the local cuisine.
What do you do to prepare for your trip?
Before the trip, I search for information about the location, weather, famous tourist attractions, transportation, local cuisine and prices on the internet.
What do you usually bring when you travel?
I usually pack my suitcase with some necessary items such as clothes, medicine, food, a map, and a camera.
Do you prefer traveling by car, train or plane?
I prefer planes although it can be a little expensive. Planes are much faster than any other mode of transport.
Do you prefer traveling alone or joining a guided tour?
I love backpacking with my friends who share the same interests as me.
What type of websites do you often search for?
It varies depending on my goal. I prefer entertainment and education websites such as facebook.com, wikipedia.org and VOA Special English.
How long have you been using them?
I have been using these websites since I was a freshman at university.
What do you visit those websites for?
I use them to study online or relax after working.
What’s your favorite website?
I think it’s probably youtube.com.
Can you read websites in English?
Yes, I can. Most useful websites are written in English.
What’s the most popular website in your country?
I’m not quite sure, but I guess it would be facebook.com.
Do you think the youth should use websites as a reliable source of knowledge?
Not always, they should choose their sources carefully.
Have you ever been in any traffic accident?
Yes, three years ago.
What happened?
I was hit by a car while crossing the road.
How did you feel then?
I felt really terrible because of my injuries.
Who was involved in the accident?
The car driver, his family (inside the car), and me.
Did the insurance company pay for repair service?
I was walking so I did not require any car repair services.
Did you need a lawyer?
I hurt my lower back just a little, so I didn’t call a lawyer.
Did you report the issue to the police?
No, we didn’t want to get the police involved.
Were you sent to the hospital after the accident?
No, the injury wasn’t really serious.
Do you have a driving license?
Yes, I do. I always keep it in my purse.
Why should people obey traffic regulations?
To protect themselves and others. The best ways are to wear a helmet, wait for traffic lights and stay in the appropriate vehicle/pedestrian lanes.
Did you have a happy childhood?
Yes, I did. I enjoyed playing hide and seek with my peers.
Did you experience your childhood in a city or countryside?
I spent my childhood in a rural area where I could see vast rice fields.
Did you usually skip class when you were a child?
Yes, I did, and many of my friends did, too.
Who were you with when you were a child?
I was with my beloved family.
What did you want to be when you were a child?
I dreamed of being a fashion designer.
Who did you love the most when you were a child?
I loved my mom the most since she was always there and took care of me.
Who was your childhood hero?
Robin Hood, he took money from the rich and gave it to the poor.
What reminds you of your childhood?
Green rice fields which I happen to see everywhere remind me of my beautiful childhood.
Did you change a lot when you grew up?
Yes, of course. I’m more mature now both physically and mentally.
Why is childhood important?
Because it shapes people into who they will become.
How many rooms are there in your house?
There are 6 rooms: a living room, 2 bedrooms, a bathroom and a kitchen.
Which floor is your bedroom on?
My bedroom is on the first floor of a three-storey house.
Is it big or small?
It’s not very spacious, just enough to put necessary furniture in.
What color is your bedroom painted?
It’s painted pink, my favorite color.
Do you love your room? Why?
I love it very much because it is my private space whenever I go home.
What furniture does your bedroom contain?
It contains a bed, a desk, and a clothing closet.
What do you do in it?
Well, I spend most of my free time there reading books and sleeping.
How much time do you spend in your room?
About 10 hours a day, especially in the evening.
Do you share your room with anyone else?
No, everyone in my family has their own room, so I stay there alone.
What kind of presents are popular in your country?
It depends on the receivers. For children, toys are the best choice. For youth, souvenirs are recommended.
Who gave presents to you? On what occasions?
I have received many presents, most of which were from my friends. They gave me gifts on my birthday.
What was your last present?
It was a hand-made doll, given by my best friend when I moved to another city.
What was the one you like best?
I loved my book Nepal a lot. It was given to me on my 23rd birthday by my brother.
Did you ever get a present you didn’t like?
Yes, I have, but I still treasure and take care of them.
How do you thank people who give you presents?
I gave them presents that they would like.
What are the times of the year that people give presents in your country?
Some special occasions are birthdays, weddings, graduation, New Year’s day, Valentine’s day, housewarming ceremonies, etc.
Who was the last person you gave a present to?
My mom, I bought her a coat on a business trip to Bangkok.
Is giving presents important in daily life?
Yes, it is. It’s one of the best ways to show your love and gratitude to someone.
Which tourist attractions do you prefer when traveling? Historical places or natural landmarks?
Well, historical places are always my first choice when traveling.
What do you usually do when visiting historical places?
I usually listen to the tour-guide introducing the sights and take notes about important historical events.
Can you name some historical places you have visited?
Whenever I travel to a foreign country, I always visit its famous historical places. Some of them are the Pyramids in Egypt, Angkor Wat in Cambodia, Stonehenge in England and the Taj Mahal in India.
What’s your most favorite historical place? Why?
I love the Pyramids the most. Taking a tour around the Pyramids, I can not only enjoy the gorgeous architecture but also learn cultural and historical values of the ancient Egyptian culture.
What is the most famous historical place in your country?
It’s definitely the Statue of Liberty in New York city.
What’s special about it?
The statue was gifted by the people of France. It is a symbol of freedom for the US as well as a welcoming sight to people coming to the US from another country.
Where is it located?
It’s located on Liberty island in New York Harbor, NYC.
Should the youth visit historical places instead of other places?
Sure. Nowadays the youth should visit these kind of places more often in order to preserve historical and cultural values of their country.
What are the benefits of reading a newspaper/magazine?
Newspapers/magazines can broaden your mind about thousands of things without the need to travel.
How often do you read it?
I read it every day.
What’s the best time to read the newspaper?
I think the best time is in the morning when you start a new day.
What types of magazines do you usually read?
I usually read politics and fashion magazines. I also enjoy reading about culture and tourism.
What’s your favorite magazine?
My favorite is The New York Times, which writes about all sorts of things: business, sports, movies, travel, books, jobs, education, and real estate.
Do you read the paper or online news?
I prefer online news to save money.
How much does it cost you to buy paper newspaper per month?
I only buy a monthly newspaper, so it doesn’t cost much money. Around $5/month.
What is the most popular magazine in your country?
I think it would be Forbes magazine, a leading source for reliable business news and financial information.
With the popularity of Internet, do you think newspapers and magazines will disappear?
Yes, unfortunately it’s just a matter of time.
How many events have you joined this year? What were they about?
I have joined more than 10 events so far, most of which were about education.
What was your most memorable event?
The most memorable for me was an international study conference, in which I was introduced to some famous universities in Europe to study overseas.
Was it organized indoors or outdoors?
It was an indoor event.
Who sponsored the event?
The event organizer was the Education Department of American Center, but the universities introduced in the conference were the ones who paid.
Who went to the event with you?
I went there with my friends, who shared the same interest in studying abroad as me.
What were some performances in the event?
There were not many performances. Each university representative just had a speech to introduce their school to students and then they hosted Q&A session.
Was the event shown on TV?
The event was not aired, but there were television advertisements for it.
How would someone market an event?
Taking advantage of social media is a smart way to promote an event.
What subjects did you learn in school?
I learned Math, Science, Physics, Biology, Geography, History, Literature, English, Art, and Music.
What subject did you like the most when you were at school? Were you good at it?
I liked Biology the most although I was excellent at Literature.
Did your friends like that subject too?
Yes, they did. They enjoyed every single Biology lesson.
Was the textbook written in English or any other language?
It was written in English.
Who taught that subject?
My teacher was Ms. Karen, from the USA.
How was that subject helpful to you?
It helped me a lot in becoming a Biology teacher.
How often did you learn that subject?
I often had Biology lessons 5 times a week.
How long did you spend on that subject at home?
I spent roughly 2 hours per day studying Biology at home.
Have you ever attended any extra classes for that subject?
Yes, I have. I usually attended evening classes.
Is it important to study hard on both social sciences and natural sciences?
No, it isn’t. Students should study the ones they like and those that are helpful to their career path.
What type of museum is popular in your country?
There are many types of museums, but the most popular are historical museums.
What is the most famous museum in your country?
That would be The British Museum, located in London.
What’s special about it?
I’m impressed by its large amount of historical, art, and cultural work.
How many times have you visited that museum?
I have visited the museum twice.
What do you usually do when visiting a museum?
I usually listen to the tour guide and take notes about important information.
Are you allowed to take pictures there?
No, the guards did not allow us to bring the camera in.
How did you feel after visiting there?
The overall experience was fantastic, and I learned so many things in just a few hours.
What do you think is the importance of museums in history?
Museums are an integral part of any country’s history, and they keep history alive.
Do you usually watch movies at home or at a movie theater?
I usually watch movies on my laptop, sometimes I go to the movie theater.
Is watching movies at the theater more interesting than watching movies at home?
Yes, definitely, because you can watch vivid images on a large screen with lively sound effects.
How often do you go to the movie theater?
I often go to the movie theater every weekend.
What’s your favorite type of movie? What movie of that type do you like?
My favorite type is comedy because whenever I watch one, I feel like there are no more worries in the world. I love the Mr.Bean movie series.
Was that movie adapted from a book?
No, the story is derived from funny situations in real life.
Who are the actors/actresses in the movie?
Mr. Bean is the main character, he is played by Rowan Atkinson who is from England.
Was it recommended by your friend, teacher or family?
It was recommended by my classmate.
Was the movie in your mother language or in English?
It was in English, but I can also watch it with subtitles.
Should children watch violent movies?
I don’t believe so. Young children are very impressionable and it could lead them to wanting to imitate the behavior.
What’s the most important factor of a great movie?
I believe that plot and actors are among the factors which decide the success of a movie.
Do you usually watch movies at home or at a movie theater?
I usually watch movies on my laptop, sometimes I go to the movie theater.
Is watching movies at the theater more interesting than watching movies at home?
Yes, definitely, because you can watch vivid images on a large screen with lively sound effects.
How often do you go to the movie theater?
I often go to the movie theater every weekend.
What’s your favorite type of movie? What movie of that type do you like?
My favorite type is comedy because whenever I watch one, I feel like there are no more worries in the world. I love the Mr.Bean movie series.
Was that movie adapted from a book?
No, the story is derived from funny situations in real life.
Who are the actors/actresses in the movie?
Mr. Bean is the main character, he is played by Rowan Atkinson who is from England.
Was it recommended by your friend, teacher or family?
It was recommended by my classmate.
Was the movie in your mother language or in English?
It was in English, but I can also watch it with subtitles.
Should children watch violent movies?
I don’t believe so. Young children are very impressionable and it could lead them to wanting to imitate the behavior.
What’s the most important factor of a great movie?
I believe that plot and actors are among the factors which decide the success of a movie.
Have you ever travelled abroad? If yes, what country was it?
Yes, I have. I traveled to the USA last year with my family.
Where is that country located?
The USA is located in North America.
What is it famous for?
The USA is known for its cultural achievements and landmarks.
What are the special food and drinks of that country?
There are many. They are known for fast food, dairy, and many beverages.
What do you like about that country?
I like the fast pace of life and the various sub-cultures.
How many citizens are there in that country?
The current population of the United States of America was over 324 million in 2016, which accounts for 4.3% of the total world population.
What language do people there speak?
The national language is English, but many people also speak Spanish, French, German, and Chinese.
Do you want to go back there again?
Sure.
Why do people like to travel abroad?
They just want to discover new places, learn new cultures and maybe speak new languages.
On what occasions do people in your country celebrate parties?
There are many occasions when people throw parties such as New Year’s eve, wedding engagments, family reunions, birthdays, etc, but sometimes people hold parties just when they meet up and want to have something fun to do.
Are you a party animal?
Yes, I am. I’m crazy about going to parties. I love meeting friends, drinking, and talking.
When do parties often start and finish?
It depends on what kind of party it is. I believe the perfect time to have a party is in the evening, from 8-11 pm.
Where are the parties thrown?
They are held inside or outside. Some formal events like weddings/housewarmings are organized inside while others like family reunions and birthdays may be held outside.
What do you usually wear when you come to a party?
I often wear casual clothes like a T-shirt and jeans if I go to informal parties, and a dress for formal ones.
What do people do in the parties you attended?
At the party, people talk, eat and drink together. Some go there to find business opportunities and new partners.
Do you enjoy drinking alcohol at the parties?
Yes, a little beer can cheer me up.
Do people have to bring anything to the party?
It’s not required, but sometimes visitors bring some gifts to show their love for the host.
Why do people, especially the youth, love going to parties?
It’s just a good way for them to chill out after a long day.
Who is your favorite teacher?
I like Mr. Tom the most, he is my English teacher.
Is he a foreign teacher?
Yes, he’s from the US.
What do you like about his lessons?
I have fallen in love with his American accent and he always shows us something new about the world outside of textbooks.
What’s he like?
He’s not only knowledgeable but also very friendly. He always treats us like friends, not students.
What does he usually wear when coming to class?
He usually wears a gray suit when he comes to class.
Do you love his subject?
Yes, I enjoy English a lot.
Do students in your class like him?
Yes, all of us admire him.
Do you want to be a teacher like him?
No, although I like him, my dream is not to become a teacher. I would like to be a chef.
Have you ever been punished by him?
No, he rarely punishes anyone.
Do you want to see him again?
Of course, he’s a great mentor.
Who’s your best friend?
It’s Jenny. She’s my best friend.
What does she look like?
She has shoulder-length brown hair. I just love her lovely smile.
How and when did you meet?
I first met her when we were in high school.
How often do you see this friend?
I see her every day. We’re in the same class.
What’s she like?
She’s not only thoughtful but also very understanding. She’s always by my side to cheer me up whenever I’m in trouble.
Do you and her share anything in common?
Yes, a lot. We both love shopping and playing sports.
What do you and her do together?
We usually do homework and read books together.
Have you and her ever quarreled?
Yes, but we seldom quarrel. When we do argue, afterwards we seem to understand more about each other.
Does she know how to cook?
Yes, but she’s not a great cook.
Do your parents like her?
Yes, a lot. They always ask Jenny to come over for dinner.
Why is a friend important in life?
A good friend can make your life better in many ways. I don’t think anyone can stand loneliness.
What is your favorite hotel? Where is it located?
It’s the Sheraton, a five-star hotel located in Saigon, Vietnam.
How do you know that hotel?
Before coming to Vietnam for traveling, I searched on the Internet. It’s one of the best hotels in Vietnam.
Why do you choose to stay in that particular hotel?
I like the architecture there, and online all the reviews about the hotel are positive.
Is it by the beach?
No, Saigon is not a beach-side city.
Does it attract many tourists?
Yes, I guess. When I stayed there, it was completely booked.
What type of room did you stay in and what facilities did you get from the hotel?
I stayed in a double-bed room. The room is equipped with air-conditioner, a flat-screen TV, wardrobe, etc.
What do you like about that hotel?
A gymnasium, swimming pool, and BBQ area are available. I also love the green space surrounding the hotel.
Is all the staff friendly and helpful?
Yes, definitely. They all are professional.
How much does it cost a night?
It costs me around $250/night.
Do you recommend that hotel to friends?
Yes, if they come to Vietnam. I love everything there.
Who wrote the letter to you?
My dad wrote the letter to me when he was on a business trip.
Did you keep the letter?
Yes, I put it in a folder. Whenever I’m down, reading his letter would be a good way to cheer me up.
What was the letter about?
He told me about his new workplace and how things were there.
How did you feel about the letter?
I was glad to know that he was fine in another city.
Do you have a letter collection?
Yes. I collect all the letters from family and friends. It’s one of my hobbies.
Do you like writing letters or emails?
I prefer writing paper letters.
Do people in your country usually write letters?
Years ago they did. Now people prefer emails.
What’s the difference between emails and hand-written letters?
Emails are much more convenient than letters because they’re free to send and they get there instantly. However, letters are much more special.
Why should we write letters to friends or relatives?
It’s a good way to show love to people you care about.
What is your hobby?
I like playing sports, especially swimming.
Is your hobby common in your country?
Yes, kids, adults, and senior citizens all like swimming in my country.
Is your hobby the same as when you were a child?
Yes, I was fond of swimming when I was a little girl.
When did you start practicing that hobby?
I started swimming when I was 5 years old.
Is there anybody in your family who you share your hobby with?
My dad, he taught me how to swim.
How much time do you spend on your hobby?
I usually go to the swimming pool twice a week.
What benefits do you get from it?
Swimming is a really good workout. It helps me keep fit and chill out after a long day working.
Have you ever heard of someone having a very unusual hobby? What was it?
Yes, my cousin loves tattooing vehicles. He puts stickers everywhere on his car.
What do you think about someone having weird hobbies?
I don’t think any hobby is weird. It’s just what you like to do, so I don’t judge others.
What hobbies are usually expensive in your country?
Playing golf is a really expensive hobby. Only the rich can afford to buy golf supplies.
What kind of music do you like?
I’m crazy about Pop music.
Is that the kind of music preferred in your country?
It varies. Normally the youth enjoy Rock and Pop while middle-aged citizens prefer country music.
Who is your favorite singer?
I’m a big fan of Miley Cyrus, a talented US singer, songwriter, and actress.
What piece of music do you like? Who sang that song?
My favorite song is Jolene, sung by Miley Cyrus.
How much time a day do you spend listening to music?
I usually listen to music all day with an MP3 player.
Do you feel relaxed listening to music?
Sure. I feel like there are no more worries in the world.
Why is music important to us?
Music has the power of beautifying our life.
Do you usually go to bars or clubs?
Not often. I sometimes go there on weekends.
What do you think about the teenagers’ music style?
Teenagers tend to choose loud and fast music like Rock or Rap. Everyone has their own taste of music though.
Have you ever thought of forming a music band?
No, I don’t have any talent for music.
Do you like shopping?
Yes, I’m a shopaholic.
What do you usually shop for?
I usually shop for clothes. I’m a big fashion fan.
Where do you go shopping?
At some fashion boutiques in my neighborhood.
Are there many shops in your neighborhood?
Yes. My area is the city center, so I have many choices of where to shop.
Do you spend much money on shopping?
Yes and I’m usually broke at the end of the month.
Do you usually shop online? What items?
Yes, but not really often. I only buy furniture online.
What’s the difference between shopping online and offline?
Unlike shopping offline, you cannot try on the pieces of clothes or check the material when shopping online.
Where did you go for holiday?
Last year I went to Singapore, a Southeast Asian country.
Why did you choose that destination?
I love to travel to Asian countries and Singapore was my best choice because of its beauty and culture.
How long did it last?
I stayed there for 2 weeks.
Who went with you?
I traveled to Singapore with my best friends.
How did you travel?
We flew there of course. During the time there, we moved mostly by MRT and taxi.
What did you pack up?
I only brought some necessary items such as money, clothes, medicine, a map and a digital camera.
What did you do during the holiday?
We visited famous tourist attractions like Marina Bay Sands, Merlion Park, Artsience Museum, Singapore Flyers. We also enjoyed local cuisine there.
What’s the difference between holidays today and 20 years ago?
Well, it has changed a lot. People now can afford holidays outside their countries while 20 years ago, traveling abroad seemed hard.
At what time do people in your country usually go on holiday?
It depends on what job people have. When they have a break from work, they will find somewhere to travel.
Are you an animal lover?
Yes, I am. I love animals.
Are you raising any pets?
Yes, I have a pitbull puppy at home.
What is it like?
My puppy is friendly, highly intelligent and well-behaved. He always waves his tail and licks my hand to welcome me home.
What does it look like?
He’s a medium-sized puppy with a strong neck, broad chest and brown hair.
What are its habits?
My Pitbull puppy loves doing exercise every day. When he plays, he plays to win.
What do you usually do with it?
We usually play tennis together. My puppy helps me pick up tennis balls.
What does it like to eat?
He loves beef, chicken and some dairy products.
What do you learn from it?
He teaches me loyalty. An adult pitbull may make me feel safe.
Why do people keep pets?
They consider pets as their loyal companions which make their life better.
Are pets well looked after in your country?
Yes. People in my country love pets.
What practical skill have you learned?
Cooking is a practical skill that I have practiced recently.
Who taught you that skill?
My mom is the best cook. She taught me everything about how to make soup, salad, omelettes, cake, etc.
How did you learn it?
She shows me how to buy food, prepare ingredients, and cook meals whenever she’s in the kitchen. I learn how to boil, grill, steam, fry, braise, etc. day by day.
Why did you learn it?
I just want to be a good cook like my mom when I get married. I will prepare the best dishes for my husband and children.
How long did it take for you to learn it?
I learned it in 4 years. The skill seems to be strengthened when I live apart from my family for studying.
How often do you use this skill?
I cook every day. I also love homemade food.
How has this skill helped you?
It makes me more confident whenever I go on a picnic outside. I’m always responsible for the BBQ.
Do people in your family know this skill, too?
My younger sister knows how to cook, too. She has just started learning.
Do all skills need learning?
Yes, they do. ‘’Practice makes perfect.’’
How is this skill important to you?
It’s an essential life skill. All women need to know this to keep their family warm and happy.
What sport do you like?
I like playing badminton.
Is it easy to play that sport?
Yes, it’s pretty easy to play.
Is that sport popular in your country?
Yes, it is.
How long have you been practicing that sport?
I have been practicing it for 5 years.
Who do you play sports with?
I play badminton with my friends, sometimes with my brother.
How often do you play that sport?
I play badminton every weekend.
What benefits can you get from that sport?
It helps strengthen my muscles because while playing, I have to move continuously. It is good to burn calories as well.
Do you like watching football? Online or offline?
Yes, I do. I prefer watching football offline and online. Going to the stadium, shouting and cheering are good to release stress.
What is your favorite football team?
I like the Manchester United Football Club, also known as “The Red Devils”.
Why is sport important?
Sports are sources of recreation. People can learn how to encourage team spirit when they play sports, too.
What school did you go to?
I went to Millennium high school, founded in 1999.
Where is the school located?
It’s located in New York City, United States.
Do you like the architecture of the school?
Yes, I do. The architecture is not really impressive, but I like it that the building’s architects left plenty of space for lounging.
What are the teachers like?
Most of the teachers there are helpful and friendly. I especially like Mr. Mike, my Physics teacher.
How long have you spent there?
I have spent 3 years of upper secondary school there.
Is that a single-sex school?
No, it isn’t. This is a unisex school.
Do you like the school uniform?
We don’t wear uniforms at school, actually.
Why do you enjoy the time there?
Although I had to deal with quite a heavy workload, I enjoy the relaxing atmosphere when hanging out with friends in the cafeteria there.
What important lesson did you learn from school?
I learned how to work in a group in which there are many friends coming from different cultures. That’s the lesson of cooperation.
Will you recommend that school to others?
Yes, of course. I’m proud to recommend Millennium High School to anyone who is searching for a good place to learn.
How many popular festivals are there in your country?
There are many: New Year’s day, Martin Luther King day, Valentine’s day, St. Patrick day, Easter, etc.
What is the most important festival in your country?
I believe that New Year’s day is the most important one since it’s a chance for family reunion and parties. People gather together to welcome the new year.
When does it take place?
It occurs on January 1st.
Where’s the festival celebrated?
The New Year’s day is celebrated all over the country. Each family has its own way to celebrate the day.
What do people do to prepare for the festival?
Before New Year’ day, people go shopping for food and drinks, repair the house or put up decor.
Who can join the festival?
It’s a day for everybody.
What do people do in the festival?
On New Year’ Eve, people have a party with traditional food and drinks. After that, they may visit friends or relatives, go to the movies or watch sports.
What’s special about that festival?
It marks the end of a year and celebrates a new year. People believe that the things they do on the first day will bring good luck and prosperity to them during the whole year.
Is the festival culturally related?
Sure, the festival is an integral part of culture.
Why is a festival important?
It adds structure to our social lives and connects us with our families and backgrounds.
Do you like to cook?
Yes, I do. Cooking helps me feel relaxed after long hours working.
Is there any kind of food you don’t like?
I don’t really like fried chicken, which is very high in fat.
Do you eat out or cook at home?
I usually cook at home, sometimes when I’m busy, I go out to eat.
How often do you cook?
Just when I have free time. My mom is often responsible for preparing meals. She’s the best cook ever.
What’s your favorite food?
I’m addicted to sushi. I can eat sushi every day.
Is it Western or Asian cuisine?
It’s Asian cuisine. Sushi is derived from Japan.
Is it easy to make your favorite food?
Yes, I guess. The recipe is quite simple.
What ingredients do you need to make that food?
I would need rice, eggs, meat, seafood, and vegetables.
What do you think about fast food?
I don’t really like fast food. It’s not healthy at all.
Would you say that you have a healthy diet?
Yes, I would. I prefer eating vitamins, protein and less fat.
What’s the most useful household appliance that you have?
That’s definitely the washing machine.
When did you buy it?
I bought it 2 years ago. Actually, my mom gave it to me as a birthday present.
Is it expensive?
I don’t think it cost that much.
Is it easy to use?
Yes, it’s pretty simple.
How does it work?
Just put clothes in, press the desired button and everything will be done within several minutes.
How often do you use it?
I wash my clothes twice a week.
Will you replace it with a more modern one?
No, because it was a present and it’s still working well.
How does your life change with that household appliance?
It makes our life more convenient. We can save time as well.
Do you think that household appliances will make people lazier and lazier?
Yes, to some extent. With the help of electronic equipment, people tend to forget manual tasks and become lazier.
What’s your favorite music band?
I’m a big fan of One Direction. There are 5 singers in the band.
Is it famous around the world?
Yes, it is. The band is well known around the world. Almost all teenagers love them.
What’s their taste of music?
They sing Pop music. Their most famous song may be “What Makes You Beautiful’’.
Are they good at dancing?
Yes, I think so. I fall in love with their every step.
Have you ever seen them in real life?
Nope, I just watch them on media. I wish I will see them one day.
How often do you come to their show?
I watch videos almost every day. Listening to their songs helps me chill out.
Can you sing their songs?
Yes, but only one song. I just keep singing it over and over again every day.
Do your friends like them?
Of course. We usually watch their performances and discuss it together.
Do they have anti-fans?
Yes, every famous singer has anti-fans.
What’s the weather like in your country?
Well, there are 4 seasons: Spring, Summer, Fall, and Winter, which vary considerably in characteristics.
What kind of weather do you like?
I enjoy hot weather. There are more things to do when it’s sunny. I love swimming and sunbathing.
What months have the best weather in your country?
I believe it depends. For me, the best weather is from June to August when it’s warm across the country.
Do you like it when it rains?
Not at all. I hate raining.
How does the weather affect your feelings?
I usually have a bad mood when it rains. The rain reminds me of sad memories.
How has the weather changed recently?
Due to global warming, the weather has become more and more unpredictable. It’s boiling hot in summer and freezing cold on winter days.
Do you usually watch the weather forecast?
No, not very often.
What’s your favorite season? Why?
Let’s see. I love spring when trees and flowers blossom.
What do you like to do when it’s windy?
When it’s windy, I like flying a kite with my friends. That’s interesting.
Who is your neighbor?
My neighbor is a university student. He lives next to my apartment.
When did you become neighbors?
I first met him when I moved to this apartment 2 years ago.
Is he friendly?
Yes, he is. He always smiles when he sees me.
How often do you see him?
Every day at the gate. Sometimes I invite him to my apartment when I throw a party.
Do you have any problems with him?
Only once when he sang karaoke too loud, which kept me awake all night. We ended up talking to each other the next day, and he never sang karaoke at midnight from then on.
Does he usually help you?
Yes, he does. He usually helps me run errands.
Would you be sad if he moves to another area?
Yes, of course. That will upset me if he leaves.
What’s the difference between friends and neighbors?
I’m not quite sure, but I think the difference may lie in the relationship. A friend can be someone you share your feelings with, while a neighbor can just be someone living next door.
What do you need to be a good neighbor?
Being respectful is the most important factor in building a good relationship.
Do you like visiting natural places?
Yes, I do. Being close to nature helps me release stress and worry.
What’s the most impressive natural scenery you’ve ever seen?
That’s the horseshoe of the Colorado River in Arizona. It’s such a great scenic place on Earth.
When did you see it?
I visited the place last Summer holiday.
Who went with you?
I went there with my family. We camped near the place.
What’s special about it?
I’m fond of the great nature there. It’s a horseshoe-shaped meander of Colorado river.
How has it changed recently?
It doesn’t change much actually.
What’s the next natural scenery you would like to visit?
My next destination would be the Maroon Bells in Colorado. I fell in love with mountain ranges and yellow flowers there.
What can people get from visiting natural places?
People will get closer to Mother Nature. Children have more motivation to discover the world around them.
What are some famous natural attractions in your country?
There are many such as Death Valley, Niagara Falls, the Redwoods, and the Grand Canyon, to name a few.
What outdoor activity do you participate in?
I do many, but my favorite one is jogging.
Where do you do it?
I go jogging in the park near my place.
Who do you do outdoor activities with?
I usually go jogging with my family.
Who shares the same interests as you?
My family, especially my dad. We usually jog together.
How often do you take part in outdoor activities?
Every morning, except on rainy days.
How do you feel after activities?
I feel really relaxed and refreshed.
What benefits can you get from outdoor activities?
It’s a good workout method. Jogging is also a good way for me to charge batteries for a long day working.
Do you usually play sports outdoors?
Yes, I do. I play volleyball and swim outdoors.
Why are children less interested in outdoor activities nowadays?
Children nowadays prefer high-tech gadgets like computers, iPads, and phones to outdoor activities.
What law do you like?
I like the traffic law of wearing the helmet when traveling by motorbike.
Is that an international law?
Yes, people around the world follow this law.
When was it issued?
I’m not quite sure, but I guess a long time ago.
Who told you that law?
I learned it at school.
Is it easy to follow that law?
Yes, it is. It doesn’t cause any inconvenience at all.
What do you think about that law?
The traffic law is so necessary for traffic participants when they’re on the road.
What benefit can you get from following that law?
It may keep me safe from traffic accidents.
Why should people obey the law strictly?
Following law is a good way to protect themselves as well as others.
What can be done to encourage people to follow the law?
Obeying law is people’s responsibility. If they against the law, they’ll put themselves in trouble.
How many kinds of pollution are there?
There are many types of pollution: land, water, noise, air, light, thermal pollution.
What type of pollution is popular in your country?
The most popular one is water pollution, I guess.
Have you ever littered?
Yes, I have, but when I was taught the lesson of protecting Mother Nature, I quit littering.
What can you do to help prevent pollution?
Reduce and reuse whatever I can to eliminate the amount of waste is what I can do to prevent pollution.
What does the government do to encourage people to protect the environment?
They organize some campaigns to raise the awareness of people. Everything should start from education.
Are people in your country aware of the environmental issues?
Yes, they are. They care about what happens to the environment around them.
Is there any law to force people to protect the environment?
Yes. The environment law states punishments to people doing harm to the environment.
Are you comfortable with traffic jam?
Not at all. I feel annoyed.
Why does it happen?
Because there are too many vehicles on the streets during rush hours, I bet.
How often do you sit in a traffic jam?
Just every day, when I finish office hour and go back home.
What time in a day are you usually caught in a traffic jam?
In rush hour at 7 a.m and 5 p.m
How long does it take to escape from the traffic jam?
At least half an hour.
What do you do while waiting in a long line?
I often glance at my watch actually.
Have you ever had any trouble caused by traffic jam?
Yes, just yesterday I was late for an important meeting with my clients.
How has the traffic situation changed recently?
There are more vehicles, which makes traffic jam more and more serious.
What is your favorite TV program?
Well, I watch a lot, but the one I like best is “How’s it made”.
Is that an international TV program?
Yes, it is. It’s available in Canada, Europe, Australia, New Zealand, Southeast Asia, and so on.
What is the TV program about?
Its name somehow describes the content, which is about the process of making things like lipsticks, balls, candy, toys, chocolate and so on.
How often do you watch that TV program?
Almost every day after dinner.
Who watches that program with you?
My family watches it together. My younger brother can’t wait to turn on the TV.
What channel is it on?
A very common one, Discovery channel, which focuses on popular science, technology, and history.
Why do you like that TV program?
I love learning new things, especially about how everything is produced. I would love to run a business about hand-made cosmetics.
How does that TV program change you?
I know more about the world around me. It also supports me in my career path to make my dream come true.
Who is its target audience?
It particularly aims at families and younger audiences.
Would you recommend that TV program to your friends?
Yes, of course. They would be crazy about the program, I bet.
What is the most impressive building you’ve visited?
It’s the Petronas Twin Tower in Malaysia.
Where is it located?
It’s located in the capital of Malaysia, Kuala Lumpur.
How tall is it?
They were the tallest buildings in the world from 1998 to 2004. It reaches the height of 451.9 meters.
Who was the architect?
César Pelli, an Argentine American architect.
Is it well-known all over the world?
Sure. Tourists can’t miss it when visiting Malaysia.
Do you have to purchase a ticket in order to visit the tower?
Yes, I do. It’s sold online.
When did you see it?
I saw it 2 years ago.
Will you come back there again?
Of course. I’m looking forward to seeing again someday.
What kind of electronic media is popular in your country?
There are some popular kinds: radio, TV and online news.
What’s your favorite kind?
I like online news because I have to work with computers every day, it’s easier for me to read online.
Why do you like it?
Due to its convenience. I love reading anyway.
How often do you access to that kind of electronic media?
Every morning before I start working.
What’s interesting about it?
Instead of watching TV or listening to radio passively, I ‘d rather read and think about the news.
Is it convenient to access to that kind of electronic media?
Yes, with a computer, smartphone connected to the Internet, you can read electronic news anytime and anywhere.
Do your family like that electronic media too?
No. My dad likes radio, and my mom likes TV.
How has mass media  changed recently?
They’re more modern and user-friendly.
What is your desired job?
Well, my dream changes in accordance to age. Up to now, I would like to be a great English teacher.
Is that a demanding job?
Yes, I think so although people suppose that being a teacher is easy and boring.
What challenge do you have when doing that job?
I have some problems with classroom management. Maybe I have to improve that skill a lot in order to be a good teacher.
Is it hard to make your dream come true?
Every job needs time and effort, and teacher does as well. Apart from the academic knowledge I was taught in university, I have to learn many other soft skills.
Why do you choose that job?
I really admired my high school English teacher, and I want to be like her.
What requirements and characteristics do you need to do that job?
Let’s see. You need to be patient, thoughtful and sympathetic.
Does the job have something to do with your major at university?
Sure. I studied English Linguistics and Literature, majored in English teaching. The major does support me a lot in my career path.
What does the society think about your job?
I’m not quite sure, but I’m proud to be a teacher, an honor job.
Do you make much money with that job?
Not at all. Teacher’s one of the lowest paying jobs in my country.
Have you ever thought of leaving your job?
I haven’t thought of that before, but I believe in what I’m doing right now.
What is the most impressive competition you’ve entered?
I took part in an eloquence competition, organized by my university last year.
What was it about?
The competition was to find out the best public speaker in the university.
Were there many participants in the competition?
Yes, there were around 500 participants totally.
What prize did you get?
Well, I didn’t get a very high prize, but it didn’t matter, I was still happy with the result.
What could you learn from the competition?
I learned the way to develop ideas for a speech beside some body language tips in public speaking.
Did you have to prepare a lot for the competition?
Yes, I did. I read various materials about eloquence, as well as rehearsed a lot.
How did you know about the competition?
The competition was informed in the school poster.
Did you do your best then?
Yes, I think so. After the competition, I know I have to try more.
Is the competition useful, in your opinion?
Sure. It helps students learn soft skills as well as become more confident in life.
Is there any garden that you like?
Yes, I love the strawberry garden in my neighborhood.
Where is it?
It’s in the highland area where I live.
When did you first see it?
I accidentally saw it when I had a picnic in the highland.
What were planted in the garden?
Strawberries, of course. There are also some boxes of cucumbers next to the strawberry beds.
Why do you like the garden?
I love picking red strawberries. The garden brings me closer to nature as well.
What is special about the garden?
The strawberries there are organic.
How do people do the gardening?
Keeping the beds mulched is important since it helps reduce water needs.
How often do you visit the garden?
Just when I have leisure time since I’m quite busy.
Is there any relation between the green garden and your mood?
Yes, at least for me. The green will help me chill out.
Do you want to be a gardener?
Honestly, no. I’m not used to manual work.
Where is your hometown?
My hometown is a coastal state of US.
Is it the city or the countryside?
I live in a suburb area.
What’s it known for?
It’s famous for tobaccos.
What do people do there?
Agriculture is the main industry in my hometown. Most of the people here plant and sell tobaccos.
How is the atmosphere there?
Well, it’s quite peaceful. I enjoy the fresh air here.
How are people there?
They’re friendly and hospitable.
Would you like to live in your hometown or somewhere else?
Yes, I would. I just wish I can live here forever.
Is it easy to find a job there?
Manual work is easy to find. I’m not sure about the white -collar jobs.
Is it a good environment for young people?
I don’t think so. The pace of life here is quite slow. If they want to work in a dynamic environment, they’d better move to the city.
Is traffic congestion a big problem in your hometown?
Not at all. We couldn’t be happier with the traffic system here.
What is your favorite item of clothing?
My favorite one is a maxi dress. I wear it when hanging out with my friends or attending parties.
When did you buy it?
My friend gave it to me as a birthday present when I turned to 21.
Where did you buy it?
I had no idea where my close friend bought it.
What color is it?
It’s blue – my favorite color.
Was it expensive?
Yes, I guessed.
Why do you like it?
Well, I’m kind of short and plump, so it’s hard to find a piece of clothing that fits me perfectly, but that one does. I also love the color and style.
Do clothes help to build your personal brand?
Yes, I agree with it to some extent. I still believe that personal brand can be built from the inside rather than the outside. However, what you wear also plays an important role in saying who you are.
Have you seen anybody wearing unusual clothes?
Yes, I have, but I don’t think any fashion style is weird. I believe everybody has their own taste of fashion.
How has your fashion style changed recently?
I always wore formal shirt and trousers whenever hanging out years ago, but now I change into casuals like jeans and T-shirt.
What is your favorite advertisement?
I’m quite impressed with the advertisement about Surf – a laundry detergent made by Unilever.
Where did you see it?
I accidentally saw it on TV 2 years ago.
What happened in the advertisement?
The ad told a story of a family in which the children all loved their step-mother due to the white shirts she prepared for them.
Why do you like it?
I just can’t stop loving the story in the ad. It’s such a sweet story.
Was there any famous actor/ actress in the advertisement?
Not at all. The actors were not very well-known, I think.
Did it attract much attention?
I have no idea, but I saw it in many public places.
What do you like the most in the advertisement?
Well, the vivid images and sound effects did attract me.
Do you believe in advertisements?
Not really. Ads always say good things and neglect to mention bad things about a product for obvious reasons.
How have advertisements changed recently?
They’re more modern. Digital marketing has proved successful in many fields.
What project did you work on?
I made an English poster about our environment.
Was that an indoor or outdoor project?
The project was carried out mostly outdoor, only the last phase was conducted indoor.
Who was involved in the project?
My teammates and an advisory teacher.
What did you do?
We had a field trip to the countryside where we studied insects and plants.
Was it a successful project?
Yes. We received compliments from our professor.
Who was your advisory teacher?
Our Science teacher, Mr.John. We learned a lot from him.
What did you learn after the project?
I learned how to write contents and decorate posters.
Did you like your partners?
Yes. Most of them were friendly and responsible. I particularly liked Michael, the leader of my team.
What did you get after the project?
After the project, I know how to work in a team and cooperate well with my teammates.
Have you ever attended someone’s wedding? Who was he/she?
Yes, a lot, but the most memorable one is my best friends.
Who went with you?
I went with one of my classmates.
Where was the wedding organized?
It was held in a restaurant downtown.
What did people do in the wedding?
They enjoyed wedding feast, sang and danced together after giving the couple best wishes of an ever-lasting happiness.
What did the bride and groom wear?
The bride wore a white wedding gown while the groom wore a black suit and tie.
What was the most interesting ritual in the wedding?
Exchanging rings is the ritual I’m quite interested in.
Are weddings a special event of one’s life in your country?
Yes, along with birthdays.
Do people in your country get married early?
Not really. The average age to get married for women is 27 and for men is 29.
What is the ideal age to get married in your opinion?
Well. 27 would be my ideal age. Women are most charming and mature at that age, I guess.
How has wedding changed recently?
The most noticeable change is the reduce of rituals in a wedding. There used to be more steps in weddings years ago than there are now.
What’s your favorite coffee shop?
My favorite one is The Coffee House, a local coffee shop in my neighborhood.
Where is it?
It’s 500 m far from my house.
How often do you visit that coffee shop?
Every weekend when I hang out with my friends. The Coffee House is always our first choice.
Who do you go with?
I meet my friends there. They love the place, too.
What drinks does it serve?
Many kinds: coffee, chocolate, cocktail, smoothie, tea, juice of various tastes. My favorite one is hot chocolate.
Are the waiters there friendly?
Yes, they couldn’t be nicer.
Do you like the decorations of that coffee shop?
Yes, I love it. I fancy the green space they put in each corner of the room.
When was the last time you go there?
I last went there last Monday.
What is special about that coffee shop?
The drinks are what make them different. People are just addicted to full-bodied coffee and chocolate there.
How do you know about that coffee shop?
My cousin recommended it to me and I did give it a try.
Which culture do you belong to?
I was born and raised in America where my culture was shaped.
Is that a multicultural society?
Yes, it is. My culture is a diverse mix of customs and traditions of various races and ethnicities.
How long has your country been practicing those customs?
Well, it has a long history, around 10,000 years ago.
What custom do you like the most?
I like practicing dining etiquette. That’s what makes me American whenever I travel to other countries.
What are traditional costumes of men and women in your country?
Cowboy hats and boots are American styles, but nowadays jeans and T-shirt are more preferable.
Are you comfortable with tradition and customs of your culture?
Of course. I was born with it.
How do people greet each other?
Well, it depends on the situation. In an informal communication, people just say ‘hi’.
Have you ever felt drawn to another land?
Yes, I’m interested in Indian culture. I wish I can get there someday to attend a typical Indian wedding.
What is the most popular means of transport in your country?
Most people in my country travel by car.
How do you go to school or work?
I prefer bus due to its convenience. I enjoy reading books while sitting on the bus.
How often do you take busses?
Every day. I went to school by bus 2 years ago, and the bus is still my best choice.
Do people in your country like traveling by bus?
Not really, they have their own cars.
What are some benefits of traveling by bicycle?
It’s a good way of doing exercise. We can protect our environment as well.
Do you prefer public transport or private transport?
Public transport is much cheaper.
Do you think bus should replace other means of transport?
Sure. In the future, busses should be used widely by commuters.
What do the government do to encourage people to use public transport?
It’s a good idea to make public transport as convenient as private transport. Besides, more campaigns should be launched to raise the awareness of protecting our environment.
How has the transport changed recently?
There are more cars in a household now than before, which partly leads to traffic jams in some cosmopolitan cities.
Who is your favorite politician?
She’s Hillary Diane Rodham Clinton, an American politician.
Where is she from?
She comes from the USA.
Does she appear on TV?
Yes, quite often. She usually shows up on TV in news programs.
What is appealing about her?
She’s a democratic politician.
Is she famous?
Yes, she’s well-known all over the world.
Does she have a great influence on people?
Yes. I think so. She fights for humans rights. She has a very controversial and influential speech that ‘human rights are women’s rights and women’s rights are human rights.’
Do you want to be like her?
Being a politician has never been my dream, actually.
Why do you admire her?
She’s one of the few women who succeed in politics.
What did she do that you can tell others?
Oh, a lot of things. She cares for people’s health. She also tackles the issues of adoption and family safety.
What’re your favorite means of communication?
I prefer talking directly to people.
How to you keep in touch with your friends?
I’m so busy that I don’t often hang out with friends, so I usually get in touch with them using social networks or phone.
Do you get in touch with your family by phone?
Yes, I do. I live away from my family, so phone would be an ideal means of communication.
Do you usually write letters or emails?
I used to write letters when the Internet hasn’t been used widely. Now I prefer emails due to its convenience.
What are some advantages of using a mobile phone?
That’s the easiest means of communication, I think. Mobile phones are portable. Just dial the numbers and you can immediately get connected with anyone you want.
Do you like handwriting letters?
Yes, I do. I like to keep handwriting letters as keepsakes.
Do you use social networks?
Yes, the youth now can hardly live without social networks.
Do you need communication skills using social networks?
Sure. Even in social networks.
How have social networks changed communication?
People prefer talking online rather than directly. Because of the illusion of social networks, people tend to forget necessary skills to communicate with others in real life.
Do you have good communication skills in your opinion?
Maybe yes. People are quite happy talking to me.
Are you studying or working?
I left school 3 years ago. I’m working now.
Are you self – employed or working for a company?
I’m self-employed. I used to work for a company 2 years ago.
Are you running any business?
Yes, I’m running a small business.
What does your business sell?
I make and sell handmade cosmetics.
Do you have any difficulty running that business?
Yes, I had some difficulties attracting customers at first, but everything is getting better now.
Is that an online or offline business?
I sell products online. It’s easier selling online than offline because I can take full advantage of my social network.
When did you start the business?
I started running my own business 2 years ago.
What are some advantages of running your own business?
I can take some days off whenever I feel tired, and I can make much more money compared to working for a company.
Do you have your own computer?
Yes, I owned a personal laptop when I was in university.
How often do you use the computer?
Almost every day. I can’t work without a computer.
Have you ever joined any computer class?
Yes, years ago. I learned about Microsoft Word and Excel.
What do you use the computer for?
You know, I’m an accountant, so managing business records would be much easier for me using a computer.
What are some advantages of using the computer?
With a computer connected to the Internet, we can shop, pay bills or do bank transactions online. Listening to music, watching movies are even more convenient.
Do you use other high-tech devices besides computers?
Yes, apart from a computer, I also use a smartphone.
Should children learn how to use the computer?
Yes, I think so. Children should be given chances to approach the computer but under the control of their parents.
Do you usually exercise?
Yes, I do. Doing exercise is one of my good habits.
What sport do you play?
Swimming is my favorite. I also play tennis.
How often do you exercise?
I go jogging almost every day before breakfast.
When did you start doing exercise?
Just last year, actually.
Is there anyone who does exercise with you?
I go jogging with my older brother. He’s a good company of mine.
What benefits can you get from exercising?
Well, a lot. Exercise helps reduce fat and build muscles. It also keeps me awake mentally during the whole day.
Where do you exercise?
At a nearby park. There are some exercise machines for people to use.
Why do you exercise?
I like moving. For me, life without moving is like a picture without color.
Do people in your country do much exercises?
I don’t think so. They’re so busy working that they forget to do exercise.
What if people don’t do enough exercise?
Obviously, they’ll gain weights fast and become obese.
What is your current short-term goal?
I’m determined to get a scholarship to study post-graduate abroad.
When did you start thinking about this goal?
I started thinking about it when I left university.
What difficulties do you have in order to achieve it?
Spending a lot of time searching it, I haven’t found any scholarship that fits my needs.
Do you need any help to achieve that goal?
I really need spiritual encouragement from my family and friends.
Do your parents support you to achieve that goal?
Yes, they do. They’re always by my side and support me when needed.
Do you think it’s important to set goals?
Sure. We all need to have some goals to drive ourselves towards them. Setting goals is a necessary step to do in order to succeed in doing something
What are the important qualities to achieve goals?
Well, you need to be persistent to what you desire to get. Commitment and patience are needed, too.
What’s your favorite work of art?
There’s a special photograph named ‘The Napalm Girl’.
When did you see it?
I accidentally saw it 5 years ago, when I traveled to Vietnam.
Where did you see it?
In Museum of Vietnamese History. The photo was solemnly hung in an eye-catching position in the room.
Why do you like it?
The photo captured a naked 9 –year-old girl, running away from the napalm attack, which is really touching.
What’s special about it?
Thanks to the photo, the photographer was awarded the Pulitzer prize for Spot News Photography.
Do your friends like it, too?
Yes, they do. The photo did touch their souls, too.
Do you want to be an artist?
Nope, although I’m quite interested in art.
What qualities does a person need to be an artist?
An artist needs to be creative and sensitive to things around him, I think.
How do children develop their talent for art?
Children’s talent for art should be recognized and nurtured as early as possible so that they can reach their full potential.
Are you a big fan of fashion?
Yes, I am. I believe every girl is crazy about fashion.
What style do you choose to wear?
Well, my favorite piece of clothes is a dress. Depending on the situation, I choose a formal or informal dress to wear.
Do you enjoy shopping for clothes?
Yes, I’m a shopaholic, actually.
Is there any fashion icon who you want to wear the same?
Yes, I really admire Taylor Swift and wish to wear like her.
Do you create your own fashion style?
No, I’m not a fashionista, so most of the time I just follow the fashion trend.
Do you prefer vintage or modern style? Why?
Honestly, I love vintage style. Wearing classic clothes makes me feel like I’m special.
Have you ever attended in any fashion show?
Not in real life. I just watch them on TV.
What do people think about your fashion style?
I don’t know exactly, and I don’t care much about it. I just wear what makes me comfortable and confident.
Are you going to change your fashion style in the future?
Well, I can’t tell. Maybe fashion is changeable, and I am, too.
Is fashion important to people?
Yes, in my opinion. Fashion can partly reveal who you are.
What’s your favorite item of jewelry?
Well, I have quite a lot of ornaments, but my favorite one is a necklace.
When did you buy it?
Uhm…I don’t remember exactly when, but I guess I bought it years ago.
What’s it made of?
It’s made of silver.
How does it look?
It looks gorgeous with a ruby clover –shaped pendant.
Why do you like it?
I believe it can bring me good luck in everything I do.
What’s special about it?
I love the vintage style of my necklace. It really goes with my classic dresses.
Does it remind you of something?
Yes, I spent my first month’s salary buying it, so the necklace encourages me to work hard and earn more money every day.
How much does it cost?
Around $400 if I’m not mistaken.
Do you usually wear it?
Yes, I just wear it all the time. I’ll be missing it if I don’t see it.
What’s your favorite cosmetic item?
My favorite cosmetic item is a cherry red lipstick.
When did you buy it?
I bought it in a local cosmetic shop.
How often do you use it?
Almost every day. I sometimes change the color.
How did it change your physical appearance?
Oh. At first, I was hesitant to try because I thought it wouldn’t match my skin undertone, but when putting it on, the cherry red color did make me more charming and gorgeous.
Is it expensive?
Nope. It is under $21only.
Is the brand name famous?
Yes, I think. M.A.C is well-known all around the world. M.A.C lipstick is an iconic product of the producer.
How important are cosmetics according to you?
Well, frankly, cosmetics are really important to women although I agree that the true beauty does come from inside.
Is it important to have a good-looking appearance?
Sure. You will be given more opportunities if you’re good-looking.
Are cosmetics harmful?
Yes, I guess. Some toxic chemicals in cosmetics may cause skin cancer.
Do think beauty products are a waste of money?
Not really as for me, I just spend my saving money on cosmetics.
What indoor game do you like to play?
Uhm, I’m fond of playing bowling.
When did you start playing it?
I’ve just started bowling. It’s been 3 weeks so far.
Who do you play it with?
Most of the time I play with my friends when we hang out together. Sometimes, I also go bowling with my cousins.
Where do you play?
At a nearby shopping mall. There is an entertainment area where people can play various games.
Is it easy to play?
Yes, quite easy. The bowler has to knock down as many pins as possible, ideally all of them.
Are you usually the winner?
Nope, because I’m just a beginner. My friends are much more experienced in playing it.
Why do you like it?
Well, going bowling is quite enjoyable. I love it when my friends cheer me up.
Is it popular in your country?
Yes, people playing almost everywhere. There are nearly 3,000 bowling centers in my country.
What are other indoor games in your country?
There are many such as board game, table tennis, squash, boxing and so on.
Do you usually talk on the phone?
Yes, I do. It’s a good way to keep in touch.
What was your favorite phone conversation?
It was when I talked to my interviewer. He did give me the good news that I got the job.
When did you have the conversation?
I don’t remember exactly, but It’s been 2 years so far, I guess.
Who did you talk to?
I talked to the owner of the restaurant where I’m working as a cashier.
What did you talk about?
He offered me the position and congratulated me.
Why did you find the conversation interesting?
Actually, it was more exciting than interesting. I was waiting for it for so long, and finally, he did make it come true.
Do you prefer talking directly or talking on the phone?
Personally, talking directly is much better to me since it’s more lively and authentic.
Who do you usually talk to on the phone?
I talk to my mom almost every day. I will be missing the conversation every evening with mom if one day she stops calling me.
What are the differences between talking directly and phoning?
Well, talking directly seems more exciting since you can see facial expression, eye contact while talking on the phone, you can only listen to the voice.
Do you like learning languages?
Yes, I do. I love traveling and talking to the local people in their mother tongue.
What is your mother language?
I speak English.
What second language are you learning?
I’m learning Spanish. I fell in love with Spanish when I traveled to Spain last year.
Is that language popular in your country?
Yes. People in my country come from every corner of the world and Spanish is the second popular language spoken here according to the statistic.
How often do you use that language?
Quite a lot. I see Spanish people every day in the restaurant, bank or supermarket.
How long have you been learning that language?
I’ve been learning it for 5 years. I’m in advanced class now.
Why do you choose to learn that language?
I’m interested in Spanish culture, and I’d like to use language as a tool to discover Spanish cultural values.
Who is your teacher?
An old Spanish teacher. She can also speak English fluently.
Why do people learn a second language?
There are many purposes. Some learn to do business, some learn to travel, some just learn for fun.
Who is the creative person that you admire?
Well, I really admire Mr.Tom, who is an extremely creative Math teacher.
Why do you admire him?
For me, Math is quite boring because I have to work with long numbers. I used to hate Math so much before I had lessons with Mr.Tom. He has thousands of ways to teach that boring subject, which inspires me a lot.
How did he become so creative?
I’m not quite sure, but I think that’s his inborn talent.
Do people you know admire him, too?
Of course. All my classmates just love and respect him for his creative teaching.
What is he like?
He has a good sense of humor. He always tells jokes, and we just can’t help laughing.
Do you think creativity can be learned and practiced?
Yes, I definitely do. Creativity, like any other qualities, can be trained.
How is creativity important in study or work?
It generates energy and makes things more inspiring. Without creativity, work and study are just dull and tiring.
Who is a famous celebrity that you admire?
Well, I’m a big fan of Miley Ray Cyrus, an American singer, songwriter, and actress.
Why do you admire her?
Well, she’s at my age, but what she’s achieved is acknowledged worldwide.
What is special about her?
I just fall in love with her beautiful voice. I can’t stop listening to her songs again and again. My favorite songs of hers are Jolene and Wrecking Ball.
Is she well-known worldwide?
Yes, she is. She’s a teen idol.
Do you see her on TV or in reality?
Most of the time I see her on TV.
Do your friends love her, too?
Yes, they do. We usually enjoy her songs, movies together.
Do you want to be like her?
Yes, being a well-known singer is my dream.
What health problem did you have?
I had measles when I was 18.
How did you have that health problem?
I thought I catch measles from someone when they cough or sneeze.
Was that serious?
Not really, but it was unpleasant. I recovered after 10 days staying at home.
What were some symptoms of that health problem?
I had a cold and fever with a cough, a runny nose. The small grayish-white spots appeared on my body, too.
Did you take any medical treatment?
No, I didn’t. The situation wasn’t serious enough to be sent to the hospital then.
How could you recover from it?
Well, let me see, I drank a lot of water, avoided the direct light, and I had to stay off school for 10 days.
What difficulties did you face because of that problem?
I couldn’t go out for a few days, which was boring. I’m not allowed to play outside and I felt so bad about it.
What do people do to prevent that health problem?
By having measles vaccine.
Is that health problem common in your country?
Not really, due to the effectiveness of vaccination.
Are you a tech and gadget lover?
Yes, I am. I love shopping for new gadgets.
What is an important technological advancement you know?
That’s the emergence of online payment systems like Credit Cards or Paypal thanks to the development of the Internet, I think.
What do you use it for?
I use these services to do shopping online. Now I can book flight tickets in advance without the need to go to the agency.
How long have you been using it?
I’ve been using these services for around 3 years.
Does it make your life easier?
Sure. It’s fast, simple and convenient.
How did it change your life?
Well, I can enjoy my life more. I can do a plenty of things online like shopping, transferring money, booking tickets, and so on.
How often do you use it?
At least once a week.
What are other technological advancements you know?
There are many: electricity, smartphone, the internet, robot, and so on.
What is a famous landmark in your hometown?
Well, I can’t hide my proud to talk about the Statue of Liberty.
When was it built?
I read on newspapers that It was constructed in 1886.
Where is it?
It’s located on Liberty island in New York Harbor.
How does it look like?
That’s a woman, known as the Roman goddess, bearing a torch and a broken chain lies at her feet.
What was it made of?
The main material was copper.
Who was the architect?
Mr.Gustave Eiffel, who also designed the tower of Eiffel.
What is special about it?
Actually, it was gifted to my country, the USA from the people of France.
Does it symbolize something?
The statue is a symbol of freedom. We all love it and are so proud to share with international friends about it.
Does it attract many tourists to come?
Yup. It attracts 4 million visitors each year according to the statistic.
Do you love handcraft items?
Yeah. My accessories are all hand-made.
What handcraft item do you like?
Well, I’ve got many items, but I really fall in love with my bamboo handbag.
Where did you buy it?
I bought it in a trip to the countryside. People make handcrafts from bamboo there.
Why do you like it?
Because it’s unique. I travel quite a lot, but can hardly find a similar one.
What is it made of?
It’s made of 100% bamboo.
What does it look like?
Being made of traditional material, it looks trendy, though. My handcraft bag has A4 paper size, which is large enough to carry a bunch of stuff: makeup things, a wallet, and tissues.
How is it made?
Luckily, I had a chance to see how it is made. People spent the whole day knitting hundreds of small bamboo fibers together to make one bag.
Is it easy to make?
Nope. I’m not really skillful and patient, so handcrafts seem super hard for me.
What is special about it?
The material itself is what makes it special. It’s eco-friendly as well.
Does it remind you of something?
Yup. It reminds me of the peaceful and quiet atmosphere of the countryside where I visited.
Is plastic surgery popular in your country?
Not really. People in my country are not so interested in plastic surgery.
What do you think about people having plastic surgery?
It’s hard to say. As long as they find happiness in what they’re doing, it’s fine with me.
Why do you think people do it?
They want to gain a better look, I believe. That’s understandable.
Is plastic surgery bad?
It’s bad for health in the long run.
Does it do harm to your health?
Sure, there are several unhealthy substances in the medical treatments which may be harmful to your body.
Do you think changing your look is a good thing?
Yes, I can’t deny that changing for a better appearance is what people should do. But don’t abuse plastic surgery or you will face serious health problems later on.
Do you think the development of plastic surgery is a positive or negative trend?
It’s more a positive trend, I guess. Thanks to plastic surgery, people who think they don’t look good can now make themselves more attractive.
Do you care more about your outlook or inner soul?
As for me, the inner soul does matter more although outside appearance is important, too.
What is a part of your face that you wish to change?
Although I have some imperfect parts, I have no wish to change anything. I love the natural appearance my parents gave me.
What success did you achieve?
I don’t know if it matters to someone or not, but passing the entrance exam to university was a huge success for me.
When did you get that success?
I got it 6 years ago. It’s been 2 years since I left university.
Was there anyone who supported you?
My family supported me a lot. My mom prepared good meals for me while my dad helped me with hard math problems.
Was it hard to get that success?
It was hard for me since I wasn’t good at academic subjects at all.
What were some difficulties in achieving success?
The period before the exam was quite stressful. I was so obsessed with it that I had a serious headache.
How did you get it?
I stuck to books day and night. I just stopped reading and writing when I felt I knew thoroughly about the matters.
How did you feel when you were successful?
I was over the moon then. I was looking forward to campus life.
How did your life change after that success?
I had a chance to learn my favorite major at my desired university and then got a high-paying job in an active working environment.
What is your key to success?
I don’t particularly have any key to success. Just work hard and try your best, everything good will come to you.
Goodbye
Bye
Bye for now!
See you!
See you soon!
See you later!
Talk to you later!
Catch up with you later.
I hope to see you soon.
See you next time.
I’m looking forward to seeing you soon.
It was nice meeting you.
It’s been really nice knowing you.
It has been a pleasure, we’ll speak soon.
It was really great to see you, catch you later.
All the best, bye.
Take care!
Stay in touch.
I’m really going to miss you.
I’ve got to go now.
Hello
Good morning/ Good afternoon/ Good evening
How are you?
How are you doing?
Nice to meet you
It’s nice to meet you
I’m pleased to meet you.
It’s a pleasure to meet you.
I’m glad to see you.
How do you do?
Hi
Hey
What’s up?
Everything is OK!
How have you been?
I am fine, thanks!
What’s going on?
Nothing new.
How’s your day?
Nice, thanks!
I’ve had so many problems with my new car. It’s driving me crazy.
Are you sure you don’t want to buy a new one?
How can I? I already spent a lot of money on this one.
I guess you’ll be spending a lot of money on repairs then.
I guess so. Unless, you want to buy the car.
No, thanks. I don’t think I’d want to buy your car. It has too many problems.
How long have you been living in China?
About three years now.
Are you used to eating the food here?
Yes, I like it very much.
What about chopsticks? Are you used to using them?
It took me a while to get used to it but now it’s a piece of cake.
Have you seen Tom?
No. As far as I can remember he was supposed to be on a business trip to Lisbon.
Yes, but he was supposed to be back by now.
Have you called his home?
Yeah, but there is no answer.
Maybe you should call the police and file a missing person’s report.
Have you seen the movie, Silence of the Lambs?
Yes. It gave me the creeps.
Come on, it wasn’t that bad.
Yes, it was. As far as I’m concerned, I’m never going to see another movie like that again.
Well, as far as the plot is concerned, I think it’s an interesting movie.
Yes, but some of the scenes were too gory.
She has been calling me for several days now.  I  think she’s interested in me.
Are you sure? I think she already has a boyfriend.
How do you know?
A friend of hers told me. I’d be careful if I were you.
Why?
Because I heard her boyfriend is a weightlifter.
Dear, we have been driving around aimlessly for hours. Don’t you think we should ask for directions?
Look honey, maybe we’ve been driving for a long time,  but  this doesn’t mean that we’re lost.
Really? Then what have we been doing all this time?
Well, we’re taking the scenic route.
Oh,  I see.  You just  don’t  want  to admit  that  we’re lost.  You know, sometimes you’re too proud.
OK, we’re lost, but this does not mean that you have to rub it in.
I need to lose weight.
Yeah, me too.
By the way, when was the last time you exercised?
I can’t remember.
How about we both go running tomorrow?
Yeah, that’s a good idea. That way we can lose weight and get in shape at the same time. By the way, do you have any running shoes I can borrow?
So how do you like your new job?
Compared to my last one, it’s a lot more interesting.
What was your last job?
I was a night security guard.
That sounds interesting.
Not really, since compared to my new job, I hardly saw anybody else while I was on duty.
Did you use to have any really bad habits?
I used to bite my toenails when I was younger but now I don’t.
What made you stop?
One day I bit my toenail too deeply and my toe started bleeding. So I learned my lesson and didn’t bite my toenails again.
Mom, can I go swimming in the pool now?
But you just had your lunch.
I know but it’s hot and I want to cool off.
Don’t ever go swimming right after eating or else you’ll get cramps.
When can I go swimming then?
Why don’t you wait for at least a half an hour.
I think studying English is boring and a waste of time. Don’t you agree?
No. I think it’s really important if you want to have a good job in the future.
But it’s too hard to learn.
I don’t agree. You just have to work at it and be persistent.
How do you like this sweater?
It looks beautiful. Can I try it on?
Sure. Go ahead.
Oh I’m afraid it’s too tight on me. Do you carry this in a larger size?
Yes, we do. Here try this one.
This is perfect. I’ll take this one.
Hello, can I help you?
Yes, I’m looking to buy a leather jacket.
What kind of leather jacket are you interested in?
I was wondering, do you have any black leather jackets available?
Sure we do. Why don’t you sit down and I’ll get you some to try on.
OK. Thanks.
Well, you have been working with our company for 10 years now.
Yes I know. It’s been a long time.
In all this time you have never asked for a raise. Do you mind if I ask you why?
That’s because my wife is rich.
Really? What does she do?
Well, she owns your company.
I’m so bored.
Feel like watching a movie?
No, I feel like going dancing.
Where do you want to go?
How about Sam’s Disco?
I don’t feel like going there. It’s always too crowded.
We’ll try the disco down the block. It’s called Rick’s Disco.
OK. We’ll give it a try.
Are you ready to go to the beach?
Wait. Shouldn’t we check the weather report before we leave?
No, it’s a beautiful day and the sun is out.
I heard on the news last night that there was a forecast for rain.
I want to quit my job.
Why, what’s the matter?
Nothing. I just want a change.
But you have a great job and you’ve been working there for ten years.
I know, but haven’t you ever wanted to do something different?
I guess so, but it seems more prudent to just stay where I am and continue working in my current job.
I heard that Bill got divorced.
Yes, he is really sad now.
I thought he wanted to get divorced because he didn’t love his wife anymore.
Yes, but he didn’t realize how much he needed her until they got divorced.
Yeah. Well now it’s too late. She already has another husband.
That’s  too bad.  Sometimes people often don’t  appreciate  what  they have until they lose it.
Have you seen him run in a race?
Yes. He’s as fast as the wind when he runs.
But he’s not too good when it comes to studying.
One of my friends said he’s as dumb as a post.
That’s not a nice thing to say.
Maybe it’s not nice, but it’s true.
Do you have the report you promised me?
What report?
You know, your work report.
Either you’re kidding me or I’m getting forgetful in my old age.
I think it’s the latter.
I’m sorry. I’ll hand it in tomorrow.
Can you believe the weather we’re been having lately?
Yeah, it’s really hot, isn’t it?
It’s so hot you can fry an egg on the sidewalk.
Maybe you’re exaggerating a little bit.
OK, maybe it’s not that hot. But it’s hot enough to get a heat stroke.
You make it sound so hot, I don’t want to leave my air-conditioned house.
Have you seen the movie Gone with the Wind?
Yeah. I think Vivian Leigh is beautiful.
She’s not only beautiful; she’s also a talented actress.
Yes, I’ve enjoyed all her movies.
Which one is your favorite?
I like her best in A Streetcar Named Desire.
Thanks for inviting me over for dinner this evening.
You’re welcome.
It looks delicious.
Well here. Help yourself to some shrimp. It’s fresh.
Thank you. Mm… It tastes delicious.
Have some more. I don’t want you to leave hungry.
Is it time to get up already?
Yes, Dear, it’s 6 a.m. You have to hurry up and get dressed.
I guess so, hey honey how about making me a cup of coffee while I hop in the shower?
Sure, Dear. How would you like your coffee?
With milk and sugar, please.
Sure, right away. Now take that shower before it gets too late.
Are you going to your sister’s wedding?
I decided not to go.
How come you’re not going?
Because I’m afraid that if I go I’ll catch the bouquet of flowers and then I’ll have to get married.
Don’t be silly. Just make sure you don’t catch it.
Hey, that’s a good idea. I never thought of that.
David,  more and more money has been missing from the company’s funds over the past six months.
Really? What’s been happening?
Obviously somebody has been stealing the money.
Who do you think it could be?
Well, you’re the accountant. You tell me.
Do you think I did it? How dare you accuse me of stealing!
How long have you been in China?
A few months.
How do you like living here?
Great! I’m having a great time.
How do you like the food here?
It’s pretty good. I just can’t get used to using chopsticks.
You’ll get used to them after a while.
I love them. They are very friendly to me.
Did you finish the assignment I gave you last week?
Sure, no problem.
Really, you didn’t think it was difficult?
Actually it was pretty easy.
How long did it take you to finish the assignment?
It only took a day. My friend and I did it together so it was easier.
I’ve been having bad dreams lately.
Really? How often?
Just about every night.
What do you dream about?
I dream about  being in a boat  and suddenly a storm comes and I drown because I can’t swim.
Maybe you should learn how to swim. Then you won’t have any nightmares.
Where’s my wallet?
You left it on your desk. Remember?
I know but it’s not there anymore.
I bet Sally took it.
What makes you think so?
I saw her hanging around your desk when you weren’t there.
I have some bad news for you.
What’s the matter?
Our company has been having some financial troubles and we have to lay off some workers.
Really?
I’m afraid so and you’re one of the workers whose job we’ll have to cut.
I can hardly believe my ears! I never thought I would lose my job here.
So how long have you known Maria?
Only four days.
Only four days! That’s so short, and you seem so crazy about her.
I know. I can’t help thinking about her. She’s always on my mind.
Well, why don’t you ask her out on a date?
I’d like to, but what if she said no? I don’t think I could stand the rejection.
So who do you think will win the NBA championships?
I really can’t say. Both teams this year seem really good.
Hey there’s a game on tonight. You want to watch it with me?
That sounds great! Can your brother watch it with us?
Only two days until my birthday! I can’t wait!
Now don’t get too excited, you still have lots of homework to do.
I hope a lot of people come to my party.
Did I tell you that Aunt Jenny will be there?
Really! That’s great! Oh, I can’t wait to see her.
Me too.  OK, now get  back to your homework.  You still have lots to do before your birthday.
I heard the news this morning about our friend Jim.
Is it true that he will be leaving us to live in Alaska?
Yes. He’s going there to live with the Eskimos.
I dare say that’s an adventurous thing to do.
Yeah,  well,  he’s going there to teach the Inuit  population, who suffer from high illiteracy.
I hope that he will succeed and make friends with the people he’ll be with.
I’d like you to do me a favor.
What is it?
Can you mail this at the post office for me? I have to go to the doctor for an appointment and I don’t have enough time to go to the post office.
OK, but can you get something for me when you go to the doctor’s?
Sure, what is it?
I’d like you to get some cold medicine. I think I have a cold.
Do you have the five dollars I lent you yesterday?
Oh I forgot! I’ll l run home real quick and bring you the money.
You don’t have to go right away.
I’d hate for you to think I was lazy in returning your money.
That’s OK. I know you’re a responsible person.
Yeah, but just the same, I’ll go home and get the money right away.
Where’s my son?
Don’t worry, Miss, your son will be fine. We sent him to the hospital.
Thank you so much.
You’re welcome.
Without your help my son would have died in that fire.
We got here just  in time.  A minute  later and it would have been almost impossible to save him.
Is that pesky lady coming to the office again?
Yeah, I’m afraid so.
If there’s one thing that bugs me, it’s her critical attitude.
Yeah, well, that’s her personality, I guess.
But it’s so annoying. She makes me feel so stupid sometimes.
Just don’t pay any attention to her. She won’t stay long.
Have you met the new student Sally?
Yes, she is a very nice girl.
I kept asking her questions in class today, but she wouldn’t respond.
That’s because she is hard of hearing.
I had no idea she had a hearing problem.
It’s not too serious. You should make her sit in the front of the class so she can hear you better.
How many candy bars have you eaten today?
I think I’ve eaten ten so far.
That’s too much! You’ve got to stop eating so much.
Why?
Because if you eat too much candy, you’ll rot your teeth.
You’re right. I’ve got to stop eating so many sweets.
I hope you’ll do better this semester. I was disappointed in your grades last year.
Don’t worry, Dad. I’ll study as hard as I can.
I hope so. If you have any questions, just ask me and I’ll help you as much as possible.
Thanks, Dad.
Your education is important for your future.
I know. I’ll work as hard as I can.
Are you coming to dinner tonight?
I don’t know. I have to work late tonight.
When will you know for sure?
I’ll let you know this afternoon if I can make it for dinner tonight.
What time this afternoon?
I’ll give you a call around 3:00.
How do you like the music at this dance club?
It’s great. I love dancing.
Me too. You know I’d be grateful if you’d dance with me.
Sure, but first you have to do me a favor.
What’s that?
Well, I’d be grateful if you’d stop stepping on my foot.
OK, stop right there you thief! Don’t Move!
Manager: Don’t shoot!
Put your hands over your head and don’t make any sudden move.
Look,  officer, I’m afraid you have the wrong person. I’m the bank manager, not the thief.
Are you sure? Oh, I’m sorry. I’m afraid I’ve made a terrible mistake.
Well, you still have a chance to get your man. I saw somebody carrying a bag full of money running that way.
Hello?
Hello! Is this Peter?
Yes. Hello! Coach.
I’m calling to remind you that we have practice tomorrow.
What time does it begin?
We’ll start at 6 a.m. So don’t be late.
Aunt Jane, I hope you’ll be home next Sunday. I’d like you to meet my fiancée.
I’m looking forward to meeting her. What’s her name again?
Rachel.
That’s such a lovely name. How long have you known each other?
About two years now.
I am looking forward to attending your wedding soon.
I’ve been so depressed lately.
Why? What’s the matter?
I’m getting older and I’m not happy with the way my life is going.
What’s so bad about it?
I just go from girlfriend to girlfriend and I’m never happy or satisfied.
I think you’re thinking too much about yourself. You need to concentrate on helping others.
What are you going to have for breakfast?
I’m thinking about having some eggs.
That sounds good. Can you make some for me too?
Sure. How many do you want?
I think I’ll have two eggs.
OK. Two eggs are coming right up.
Hey, I’m hungry. How about you?
Yeah, I can really go for some Chinese food right now.
That’s a great idea. Let’s go to a Chinese restaurant right now.
OK. It’s my treat.
Are you sure?
Yeah. You can pay next time.
Who ate all the cookies?
I think it was the dog that ate them.
Are you sure?
It’s possible.
What happened to Steve? I haven’t seen him at work for a long time.
He was fired because of his poor work performance.
It’s too bad he’s gone. He had such a good sense of humor.
Yes, but he also had a serious drinking problem which affected his work.
I didn’t know that.
Yeah. He had such potential too. It’s too bad.
I can’t find my car keys.
I’m sorry it’s my fault. I accidentally locked them in the car last night when I came home.
Well, at least they’re not lost.
That’s true but how are you going to get them out?
I have another set of keys tied under the car.
That was smart thinking.
You have to finish your dinner before you leave the table.
But, Mom, I can’t eat anymore. I’m stuffed.
What’s the matter? It doesn’t taste good?
It’s not that I don’t like your cooking, but  I ate some cookies before we had dinner.
And now you don’t have an appetite. You know you’re not supposed to have any snacks before dinner.
Sorry, Mom. I promise I’ll try and finish eating everything.
Did you see the new employee in our company?
Yeah. Do you know her name?
It’s on the tip of my tongue but I just can’t remember.
Well, let’s just ask the manager?
So, you’ve come to beg for the life of your son?
Yes, Your honor.
And why do you think I should pardon him?
It is said that you are a just but merciful man.
Mercy is given to those who show mercy.
But, Your honor, he’s my son, my own flesh and blood.
I’m looking forward to our son’s graduation this weekend.
Yes, so am I. But what will he do after graduation? He really needs to go to college.
Well, Dear, we can’t force him to go to college. It’s up to him.
I know that but he has to learn to be independent. He can’t just keep living at home.
You’re right. I’ll talk to him about getting a job. Maybe he can work at my store.
That’s  up to you, Dear. You just have to make sure that he does his work and doesn’t loaf around.
I have been washing the dishes for over a week now.
Well, I think you are very good at doing the dishes, so maybe you should do them for another week.
No, we made an agreement that we would take turns doing the dishes. Now it’s your turn to do them.
OK, I’ll do them. But I’ll warn you I don’t think I can do them as well as you.
That’s OK. I’ll give you plenty of chances to practice until you get really good at it.
I knew you would say something like that.
How come you never go to McDonalds?
This may surprise you, but I’m a vegetarian.
So you don’t eat any meat?
That’s right; no meat or dairy products.
Why dairy products?
Because they come from animals.
What’s the matter? You look so tired lately.
I haven’t been sleeping very well these past few nights.
Why not?
I’ve been worried about my financial troubles and when I try to go to bed I can’t sleep.
Why don’t you try reading before you go to bed? Maybe that will make you tired.
I’ve tried that but it doesn’t work. I end up reading books about money.
New York City is a tough place to live.
Yeah, it’s so crowded and the pollution is so bad.
You know, I’ve had enough of this city. I’m going to quit my job and move to the country.
What will you do for a job?
I don’t know. I’ll do anything as long as it means getting out of here.
Well,  I don’t think changing your environment  will make things better. You should learn to be content where you are first.
Excuse me,  Miss,  I wonder if I could have a few minutes of your time?
Why?
Well,  I’d like to introduce  you to the new super model ZX-2000 vacuum cleaner.
I’m sorry but I’m in a hurry now. I don’t have time to try it out.
That’s no problem. Excuse me for interrupting you. Here, have my card.
Thanks.  If  I  get  a chance, I will check out  your vacuum cleaner another time.
I’m desperate for money right now.
What’s the matter?
I don’t have enough money to pay for my rent.
Why don’t you ask Kurt to loan you some money?
I’d rather dig trenches with a spoon than ask for his help.
I wouldn’t be so proud if I were you. Sounds to me you don’t have much of a choice.
What’s bothering you?
I want to get out of here and get away from all my problems.
Are you sure that changing your location will solve your problems?
No but at least things will be different.
No, matter where you go, you will bring your problems with you.
I guess you’re right.
Is there something wrong? You look so sad.
My house was robbed last night and the thieves stole all my furniture.
No wonder you look so upset.
Yeah. I called the police but they said there was little they could do.
Why not?
Because there were no witnesses and the thieves didn’t leave any traces.
Where did you put my dictionary?
I’m sorry, but I can’t  remember where I put it last.
But that’s my favorite dictionary.
Wait, now that I think about it, I left it on the kitchen table.
How could you be so careless? You should be more careful with other people’s things.
Sorry. I’ll be more careful next time.
My friends have been asking me to smoke cigarettes with them.
Be careful! You don’t give in to peer pressure.
Why?
First  of  all,  smoking is bad for your health  and second,  once you start smoking it will be hard to stop.
Yeah, you’re right. I know a lot of people who are addicted to smoking.
I bet most of them started because their friends also smoked.
Why are you so late?
I’m sorry but I missed the bus.
How could you miss the bus?
I hurried to get to the bus stop only to find I didn’t have enough change to pay the fare.
I’m sorry to hear that.
I had to go back home and get some change and wait for the next bus.
What do you think of Shakespeare?
On one hand his plays are very interesting to watch but on the other hand they are hard to read.
I feel the same way sometimes.
So what do you do?
I just try to catch the general meaning of each sentence.
That sounds like a good idea.
You were late to work again this morning.
Yes, I’m sorry but I had to help my mother go to the hospital. She was sick.
I don’t care what you had to do. You’re supposed to be on time. See that you’re not late again.
But this was an emergency.
It’s your third emergency this month.
Yeah well, my mother gets sick a lot.
I can’t wait until Valentine’s Day.
Speaking of Valentine’s Day, how is your girlfriend?
She’s doing well. I took her out to dinner last night.
Did you have a good time?
Yeah, the food was delicious.
Hey, speaking of food, are you hungry? Let’s grab a bite to eat.
I’m so glad we won the game.
Thanks to you, you scored the final goal and won.
Actually, you deserve the credit. Thanks to you, the ball was passed to me and I scored.
Yeah, we all worked together.
I hope that we can win the next game.
If we work together like we did this past game, I’m sure we will.
I have a big favor to ask.
What is it?
Well, I need to borrow $1,000 for the down payment on a car.
OK, I’ll lend you the money but you have to pay it back as soon as you can.
I promise I will. Thanks a million.
You’re welcome.
Did you get a package in the mail today?
I sure did.
What was it?
A box of cookies from my mom.
That’s great! She’s coming here next week, isn’t she?
Yes, she is. The first thing I’m goanna do when I see her is give her a hug and thank her.
Are you still selling your car?
Yeah, but the more I think about it, the more I want to keep it.
Why’s that?
Because buying a new car would be very expensive and I wouldn’t be able to afford the insurance.
But you already put an ad in the paper.
I know but if anybody calls, I’ll just tell them it’s not for sale anymore.
Do you cook for yourself?
Yes, I do, but it’s not the same as what my mother makes.
I know what you mean. There’s nothing as good as home cooking.
My mom’s given me some recipes, but when I make them they don’t come out the same as when she cooks.
Maybe you should just ask her to cook for you.
No, I’d rather try and learn myself.
Did you just finish playing basketball?
Yes and I’m so thirsty.
How about a Coke?
That sounds great! There’s nothing better than a cold Coke when you’re hot and thirsty.
So how does it taste?
Great! Thanks a million.
Our new dog has been howling all night long.
I know. It’s really getting on my nerves.
We should have gotten a quieter pet, like a fish.
I agree. I think we’d  be better off without a dog.
So what are we going to do?
I guess we’ll have to bring it back to the animal shelter.
I heard the temperature is going to drop dramatically tonight.
Really?
Yes, so you’d better dress warmly before you go out.
I will. Thanks for telling me.
You’re welcome. I wouldn’t want you to catch a cold.
Thanks for your concern. I don’t want to get sick either.
We’ve been looking for your lost CD for hours.
It’s got to be here somewhere.
We’ll never find it. We may as well give up.
No way. It’s my favorite CD.
OK, I’ll help you look for another ten minutes then I’m going home.
Don’t worry I know we’ll find it.
Remember that old man who used to beg for money on the street across from our house?
Yeah. Whatever became of him?
Well he got a job and now he owns a small ice cream shop in town.
That’s great. We should visit him some time.
Yeah, we should. Let’s go today and get some ice cream.
Then we can ask him how he’s been and how he started his business.
Excuse me, are you the tailor?
Yes, I am. What can I do for you?
Well, I’d like to have a business suit made for me.
Sure, let me take your measurements then you can tell me what style you’d like.
When do you think you can finish the suit?
Well, it  depends on what  style you want.  Business suits usually take about a week to finish.
Happy anniversary!
What do you mean?
Today is our one-month anniversary of dating.
Oh, I see. You know everything has a beginning and an end.
What do you mean by saying that?
Well, I think it’s time for us to break up. I’m sorry.
Honey, you’ve been trying to fix that sink for hours.
I know, I know. My back is killing me.
Well, how can I help you?
Hand me that what-do-you-call-it.
You mean the wrench?
Yeah that’s it.
I’m so upset.
What’s the matter?
My girlfriend broke up with me today.
I’m sorry to hear that. Hey, what do you say you and I go to the movies this afternoon? Maybe that will cheer you up.
That sounds like a good idea.
Sure it is. It will get your mind off of your girlfriend, I mean your ex-girlfriend.
Have you heard that my father is going to quit his job?
What would he do that for?
He said work is too hectic and that he needs a break.
What will he do to earn a living?
He said he would take a vacation for a while and then go into the carpentry business. He thinks it will be more relaxing.
Well, I hope he’s happy.
Did you hear the weather forecaster’s  prediction for rain tomorrow?
Yeah,  but  I never believe the weather reports because they are usually wrong.
But what if he’s right?
I guess we’ll have to change our plans for tomorrow.
That means we can’t go to the beach.
Only if it rains.
Where did you put my Walkman?
I forget.
You should be more careful with other people’s things.
Are you saying I’m careless?
What I’m trying to say is that when you borrow something from someone, you should take good care of it.
I’m sorry. Please forgive me. I’ll try to find it right away.
Your face is so pale. Are you OK?
No, I’ve had a fever for a few days and I am sick to my stomach.
What’s the matter with you?
I think I have food poisoning.
What do you think it was from?
I had some raw seafood the other day at a Japanese restaurant. Maybe that was it.
Can I ask you a hypothetical question?
Sure, go ahead.
What would you do if you were given a million dollars?
Well, first I’d buy a nice house for my parents to live in and take care of all their financial problems. Then I’d buy a house for my sister and do the same.
That’s very nice of you.
I’d just like to take care of my family as best as I can.
How long have you been studying English?
Over ten years now, but my English is not very fluent at all.
Why not?
I don’t like speaking English because I’m afraid of making mistakes.
What’s the use of studying English if you won’t speak it?
You’re right. I should try to speak out more and not be so afraid of making mistakes.
I love ice cream.
Really? Me too. What’s your favorite flavor?
Well, I like both strawberry and coffee ice cream.
I like vanilla best.
What’s your second favorite ice cream flavor?
My second favorite is peppermint.
I plan to go to Beijing this summer.
That sounds great. Where will you go when you get there?
I’m not sure yet. I have to make a plan. Where can I get a map of Beijing?
I have one. I can lend to you.
That would be great. I’ll take care of it and give it back when I’m done.
OK. Just be careful because it’s my only copy.
Dad,  I’ll be having my college interview with  Harvard University  next week.
That’s great son, I’m glad to hear that.
Yeah, but the problem is the competition to get into that college is very stiff.
Well, are you sure you really want to go there?
Yes, I’ve wanted to go to that college since I was in junior high school.
Don’t worry, Son. If you really want to go there, then I’m sure you will get in. Remember, where there’s a will there’s a way.
I don’t like this movie.
Look, I already paid for the tickets, so whether you like it or not we’re going to finish watching it.
Well, I’ll just read a book then.
Don’t be such a stick in the mud. Just watch it with me.
But I don’t like it.
Come on, give it a chance. The movie just started.
I’d like you to introduce the guest speaker at  the student assembly today.
Why me? I can’t do that.
Why not? You’re a good student and I think you will do a great job.
But  I’ve never spoken in front of so many people before.  I wouldn’t know what to say.
Don’t worry. I’ll help you prepare the speech. Why not give it a try?
OK, I guess I have nothing to lose.
How was your meal?
It was delicious.
Would you care for some dessert?
What do you recommend?
There’s a Greek pastry called baklava that’s made of  chopped nuts, butter and cinnamon all soaked in honey. Would you like to try it?
Sure. It sounds delicious.
May I see your daughter please?
My daughter is very upset right now.
Please just give me a chance. I want to talk to her.
I’m sorry but you’re not to see her again.
But why?
You’re a monster.  She doesn’t need someone like you to break her heart.
Where is Allen? He’s late.
Did you give him directions on how to get here?
He told me he already knew how to get here.
You can never be too sure with him.
Why is that?
Because he has a bad sense of direction and he always gets lost.
Have you started your report yet?
I’m having a hard time getting the information.
It’s so easy to get information these days.
Then how can I get it?
You only have to search the Internet  in order to get  the information you’re looking for.
Oh, I didn’t think of that.
Hello. My name's Peter. What's your name?
Janet. 
Where are you from Janet?
I'm from Seattle. Where are you from? 
I'm from Madrid.
Are you American?
Hello, Peter. How are you?
Fine, thanks. How are you? 
Goodbye, Janet. See you tomorrow!
Bye bye, Peter. Have a nice evening. 
Thanks, you too!
Thanks.
Hello. How are you?
I'm fine, - OK, - well, thank you
Goodbye, - bye bye
See you tomorrow
Excuse me. Can you tell me the time, please?
Yes, of course. It's seven o'clock. 
Thank you.
No problem. 
What time is it?
It's half past three.
Thanks.
You're welcome.
May I help you?
Yes, I'm looking for a sweater.
What size are you?
I'm an extra large.
Would you like a plain sweater or something else?
I'm looking for a plain blue sweater.
How about this one?
Yes, that's nice. Could I try it on?
Certainly, the changing rooms are over there.
Thank you.
How does it fit?
It's too large. Do you have a large?
Yes, here you are. Would you like to try it on to see if it fits?
No that's Okay. Thank you. I'll take it. I'm also looking for some nice slacks.
Great. We have some very nice wool slacks over here. Would you like to take a look?
Yes, thanks for your help. 
What are your measurements?
I'm a 38 waist and a 32" inseam.
What do you think about these?
They're nice, but I'd prefer cotton trousers if you have them.
Yes, here's a pair. You said you the measurements are 38 by 32, didn't you?
Yes, that's correct. I'll go try them on.
Let me know if you need any help.
Thank you. (comes back) These are great. So, that makes one sweater and a pair of grey slacks.
OK, how would you like to pay?
Do you take credit cards?
Yes, we do. Visa, Master Card and American Express.
OK, here's my Visa.
Thank you. Have a nice day!
Thank you, goodbye.
What's your surname?
Smith
What's your first name?
Fred
Where are you from?
Atlanta, Georgia
What's your job?
I'm a teacher.
What's your address?
34 White Street
What is your phone number?
308-6730
How old are you?
54
Are you married?
Yes, I am.
Good morning. Can I have your ticket, please?
Here you are.
Thank you. Would you like smoking or non-smoking?
Non-smoking, please.
Would you like a window or an aisle seat?
An aisle seat, please.
Do you have any baggage?
Yes, this suitcase and this carry-on bag.
Here's your boarding pass. Have a nice flight.
Thank you.
Next!
Here's my ticket.
Please step through the scanner.
What's wrong?!
Please step to the side. 
Certainly.
Do you have any coins in your pocket?
No, but I have some keys.
Ah, that's the problem. Put your keys in this bin and walk through the scanner again.
Okay.
Excellent. No problem. Remember to unload your pockets before you go through security next time.
I'll do that. Thank you.
Good morning. Can I see your passport?
Here you are.
Thank you very much. Are you a tourist or on business?
I'm a tourist.
That's fine. Have a pleasant stay.
Thank you.
Good morning. Do you have anything to declare?
I'm not sure. I have two bottles of whiskey. Do I need to declare that?
No, you can have up to three liters.
Great.
Have you brought any food into the country?
Just some cheese I bought in France.
I'm afraid I'll have to take that.
Why? It's just some cheese.
Unfortunately, you are not allowed to bring cheese into the country. I'm sorry.
That's strange! Oh well. Here you are.
Thank you. Anything else?
I bought a t-shirt for my daughter.
That's fine. Have a nice day.
You, too.
Excuse me. Is there a bank near here?
Yes. There's a bank on the corner.
Thank you.
You're welcome.
Excuse me. Is there a supermarket near here?
Yes. There's one near here.
How do I get there?
At the traffic lights, take the first left and go straight on. It's on the left.
Is it far?
Not really.
Thank you.
Don't mention it.
Good evening. Can I help you?
Yes, please. I'd like a room for the night.
Would you like a single room, or a double room?
A single room, please. How much is the room?
It's $55 per night.
Can I pay by credit card?
Certainly. We take Visa, Master Card and American Express. Could you fill in this form, please?
Do you need my passport number? No, just an address and your signature.
Here you are.
Here's your key. Your room number is 212.
Thank you.
Thank you. If you need anything, dial 0 for the reception area. Have a good stay!
Hi. How are you doing this afternoon?
Fine, thank you. Can I see a menu, please? 
Certainly, here you are.
Thank you. What's today's special?
Grilled tuna and cheese on rye.
That sounds good. I'll have that. 
Would you like something to drink?
Yes, I'd like a coke. 
Thank you. (returning with the food) Here you are. Enjoy your meal!
Thank you. 
Can I get you anything else?
No thanks. I'd like the check (bill - UK English), please. 
That'll be $6.75.
Here you are. Keep the change! 
Thank you! Have a good day!
Bye.
Where do you live?
I live in Pasadena.
Where is Pasadena?
It's in California.
Is it in northern California?
No. It's in southern California.
Is Pasadena a big city?
It's pretty big.
How big is "pretty big"?
It has about 140,000 people.
How big is Los Angeles?
It has about 3 million people.
Do you have a car?
Yes, I do.
What kind of car do you have?
I have a Honda.
Is it new?
It was new in 2003.
So, it's pretty old now.
Yes, it is. But it still looks good.
Do you take good care of it?
Oh, yes. I wash it once a week.
Do you change the oil?
My mechanic changes the oil twice a year.
Do you have a girlfriend?
No, I don't. Do you?
I don't have a girlfriend, either.
Why not?
I don't know. Maybe I'm not rich enough.
Girls like guys with money.
They sure do.
They like guys with new cars.
I don't have money or a new car.
Me, neither.
But girls like guys who are funny.
Maybe we should learn some good jokes.
Where are you going?
I have to walk the dog.
What kind of dog do you have?
I have a little poodle.
Poodles bark a lot.
They sure do.
They bark at everything.
They never shut up.
Why did you get a poodle?
It's my mom's dog.
So she likes poodles.
She says they're good watchdogs.
Can I borrow $5?
Sure. Why do you need it?
I want to buy lunch.
Where's your money?
It's not in my wallet.
Your wallet is empty?
I don't have even one dollar in it.
Being broke is no fun.
Even if it's only for a short while.
It's always good to have friends.
Friends will lend you money when you're broke.
As long as you pay them back.
Let's go to the beach.
That's a great idea.
We haven't been in a while.
We haven't been in a month.
The last time we went, you almost drowned.
No, I didn't.
Then why did the lifeguard dive into the water?
I think he wanted to cool off.
He swam right up to you.
And then he turned right around.
Maybe you're right.
Maybe we should get going.
Are you married?
No. I'm divorced.
When did you get divorced?
I got divorced two years ago.
Why did you get divorced?
My wife left me.
Why did she leave you?
She said she didn't love me anymore.
Wow! That's terrible.
Yes, it was.
Why didn't she love you anymore?
She fell in love with my best friend.
I'm bored.
What's on TV?
Nothing.
There must be something on TV!
Nothing that's interesting.
What about that new game show?
Which one?
Deal or No Deal
Tell me you're joking.
I love that show.
I watched it once. That was enough.
It's on right now. Let's watch it together.
I like living here.
I agree. Pasadena is a nice city.
It's not too big.
And it's not too small.
It has great weather all year long.
It has the Rose Parade.
It has beautiful houses.
It has wonderful restaurants.
It has great schools.
It's close to the mountains.
The people are friendly.
I'm not ever going to leave.
We need a new mattress.
What's the matter with this one?
It's not comfortable.
It seems fine to me.
I toss and turn all night.
You should stop drinking coffee.
Look at these marks on my arms.
What are they?
They are bites.
Did the cat bite you?
No. The bedbugs in that mattress bit me.
Okay. Let's get a new mattress.
My laptop is so slow.
Buy a new one.
I would if I had the money.
Why is it so slow?
That's a good question.
Did you take it to a computer shop?
I would if I had the money.
Well, I guess you have to live with it.
Sometimes I want to throw it out the window.
You don't want to do that.
Why not?
You might hit someone in the head.
What's for dinner?
I'm not sure.
How about a pizza?
You had pizza for lunch.
But I love pizza.
Everybody loves pizza.
So why can't I have pizza for dinner?
Because you need variety.
What's "variety?
Different things—not the same thing all the time.
You mean, like a pepperoni pizza instead of a cheese pizza?
No, I mean a salad instead of a pizza.
We need to save money.
Why do we need to save money?
Because we need to buy a house.
But a house is so expensive.
That's why we need to save money.
How much do we need to save?
We need to save enough for a down payment.
How much is that?
That's about $30,000.
Thirty thousand dollars! That will take forever.
Not if we save every penny.
Okay. Here's seven pennies.
The ocean is so big.
You can't see the end of it.
It goes on and on forever.
And it's deep, too.
I think it's five miles deep.
Are there fish at the bottom?
There are fish at the top and the bottom.
Are there more fish or more people?
I think there are more fish.
I hope so. I love to eat fish.
I'm upset with my mom.
Why is that?
I warned her about her new boyfriend. She didn't listen to me.
What happened?
I gave her $1,000 for her birthday. I told her to spend it on herself.
That was very nice of you.
I found out that she gave it to her new boyfriend.
Why did she do that?
He said he would buy her a nice ring.
What's wrong with that?
He went to Las Vegas. He lost it all gambling.
I hope your mom broke up with him.
Do animals talk to each other?
Of course they talk to each other.
What do they talk about?
They talk about other animals.
What else do they talk about?
They talk about food and the weather.
Do they talk about us?
Of course they talk about us.
What do they say about us?
They say that we are funny looking.
Ha! We're not funny-looking; animals are funny-looking.
We're funny-looking because we wear clothes.
I have to clean the house.
Yes, it's very dirty.
You can help me.
Why me?
Because you helped make it dirty.
What do you want me to do?
I want you to clean the bathroom.
Oh, that's easy.
Clean the sink, the tub, the counter, and the toilet.
That's a lot of work.
Tell me when you finish.
I don't think so. You'll just give me more work.
You're watching too much TV.
What do you mean?
I mean you're wasting your life.
I'm having fun.
You're sitting there with your mouth open.
Who cares?
I care. Do something.
Okay. I did something.
What did you do?
I turned up the volume.
That's not what I meant by do something.
Will you do something? Leave me alone.
Did you write a letter to grandma?
Yes, I did.
Did you tell her about school?
I told her that school is fun.
Did you put the letter in an envelope?
Yes, and I sealed the envelope.
Did you put a stamp on the envelope?
I couldn't find any stamps.
They're in the kitchen drawer.
Okay. I just put a stamp on the envelope.
Give me the envelope, and I'll mail it for you.
When is grandma going to learn about e-mail?
Why are you yawning?
I'm sleepy.
Why don't you go to bed?
I want to watch this TV show.
Maybe you should record it.
The tape recorder is broken.
Then you should watch the rerun.
Why? I'm watching the original.
But you'll be asleep in about one minute.
I'm just yawning because the commercials are on.
It's Sunday.
So?
You know what that means.
I forgot.
Sunday means we go to church.
Oh, yeah.
Put on a coat and tie.
Why?
To show respect to God and others.
I'm glad Sunday is only once a week.
I hope God didn't hear that.
He'll forgive me.
Did you feed the cat?
I'll do that in a minute.
The cat is meowing. He's hungry.
Okay. I'll feed him right now.
You shouldn't make him wait.
I was doing my homework.
The cat doesn't care about your homework.
The cat doesn't care about anything.
That's the way cats are.
All they think about is themselves.
Maybe we should get rid of him.
Of course not! He's family.
I hate shaving.
Me too.
I just cut myself again.
Did you use a new blade?
It doesn't matter. Old blades cut, new blades cut.
Maybe you should use an electric shaver.
They make a lot of noise, but they don't give a close shave.
Maybe you should stop shaving.
And grow a beard?
Sure. Why not?
Because food and other stuff sticks in my beard.
Here's an idea. Put cream on your face and have the cat lick it off.
Excuse me.
Yes?
Are you reading this paper?
Oh, no. Help yourself.
I asked because the paper is sitting next to you.
Thank you. That's polite of you to ask.
Some people would just pick it up.
Yes, I know. Some people are rude.
I always try to be polite.
So do I.
The world needs more polite people like us.
I agree 100 percent.
Mom, I want a puppy.
Let me think about it.
Why do you have to think about it?
Because a puppy costs money.
No, it doesn't. Puppies are free.
Yes, but a puppy needs shots.
Shots for what?
So it won't get sick. Just like you get shots.
I hate shots.
And a puppy eats food. Food costs money.
No problem. I'll give him food off my plate.
Oh, no you don't. Puppies don't eat vegetables.
Look at all these kittens!
How many are there?
Eight.
They're all so cute.
Yes, but I can't keep them.
What are you going to do with them?
I'm going to give them away. Do you want one?
Yes, I would love one.
Which one do you want?
That one. The one that's all black.
Yes, I like that one, too.
I'll call him Blacky.
My parents go to church every Sunday.
They trust in God.
They hope they will go to heaven.
They probably will.
But no one knows for sure.
That's for sure.
No one knows what happens after we die.
If we are good, we will be happy in heaven with God.
That's what many people believe.
If we are bad, we will be unhappy forever in hell.
I don't want to go to hell.
Let's go to church with your parents on Sunday.
My husband died.
I'm sorry for you.
Thank you.
When did he die?
A couple of months ago.
You still miss him.
Yes, but I talk to him almost every day.
When you go to church?
No, when I call him on his cell phone.
What do you mean?
I buried him with his cell phone.
What will you do when the battery dies?
Today is Friday the thirteenth.
That's a bad day.
It's supposed to be unlucky.
You're supposed to stay home all day.
That's what I do.
My friend stayed in a hotel on Friday the thirteenth.
That was a mistake.
He stayed on the thirteenth floor.
What happened?
Someone stole his laptop.
He was asking for it.
He learned his lesson. He's home today.
Do you really love me?
Of course.
Prove it.
How can I prove it?
Take me to dinner.
That's it? That's all I have to do?
Take me to a nice restaurant, not to McDonald's.
But a nice restaurant costs money.
Yes, and you have to make a reservation.
That's such a hassle.
I knew you didn't love me.
Okay, okay! I'll make a reservation right now.
My parents are divorced.
So are mine.
Why did your parents get divorced?
My father found a new girlfriend.
That's too bad.
My mother was hurt and angry.
She had good reason. What did she do?
She told him to drop his girlfriend.
What did your father do?
He moved out of our house.
I guess he really liked his new girlfriend.
Yes, but she left him a year later.
My grandma's apartment smells funny.
So does mine.
I think it's an old people's smell.
Really?
Yes. I think when you get old, you begin to smell.
Like fruit that is too ripe?
Yes, just like fruit that is too ripe.
But the smell is different.
Yes, old people don't smell like fruit.
No, they smell like a thrift shop.
Yes, a thrift shop has that same smell.
Yes, an old smell.
The price of stamps goes up and up.
I think stamps used to cost a penny.
That was a long time ago.
It was before I was born.
Now a stamp is 42 cents.
But in May it will be 44 cents.
Have you ever lost a letter in the mail?
No, I haven't.
Neither have I.
So, they do a good job for the money.
Yes, they do.
Maybe we shouldn't complain.
A button came off my shirt.
What are you going to do?
First, I have to find the button.
Where did you lose it?
I have no idea.
A button is hard to find. Did you look in your pant cuffs?
That's a good idea.
I found a button in my pant cuffs one time.
Let me look. No, it's not there.
Many shirts come with an extra button.
You're right. This one does have an extra button.
Now all you have to do is sew it on.
I have to go to the bathroom.
You drink too much coffee.
But I love coffee.
Well, it's your life.
You eat too much chocolate.
I don't think so.
Have you looked in the mirror?
Do you think I'm getting fat?
I didn't say that.
What did you say?
I said I have to go to the bathroom.
That's what I thought you said.
Did you do the laundry?
Yes, I did.
What did you wash?
I washed the sheets and towels.
What about the pillowcases?
Yes, I took them off the pillows and washed them.
Did you dry everything in the dryer?
Yes, I dried everything in the dryer.
Then what did you do?
I folded all the towels.
Did you put the sheets on the beds?
Yes, and I put the pillowcases on the pillows.
Do you listen to the radio?
I listen day and night.
What do you listen to?
Mostly talk radio.
What's that?
People talk about current events.
What do they say?
They say they want change.
What kind of change?
They want tax cuts.
Why do they want tax cuts?
Because tax cuts will save them money.
Mom, I'm hungry.
Look in the fridge.
I'm looking. There's nothing to eat.
Are you sure?
It's almost empty.
I went to the market yesterday.
I don't see anything.
I bought lots of oranges and apples.
I don't want fruit. I want something tasty.
Eat the fruit. It's good for you.
Next time you go to the market, let me go with you.
No, thank you. All you want to eat are hot dogs and candy bars.
What is there to eat?
I don't know. Look in the fridge.
I think I'll make a sandwich.
What kind?
A ham sandwich.
The bread is in the cabinet.
Where's the mustard?
It's in the fridge, I think.
Oh, yes, here it is. Do you want a sandwich?
Yes, that sounds nice.
How about some potato chips?
Yes. And a pickle, if we have any.
It's time for your bath, young lady.
But, Mom, I'm not dirty.
You need a bath every day.
Why?
Because you don't want to smell bad.
I don't smell bad.
That's what you think.
If I smelled bad, I could smell me.
I can smell you.
I can smell you, too.
That's my perfume.
When can I wear perfume?
Something's wrong with my computer.
Exactly what?
All I get is a black screen.
What's the matter?
I think I know, because this happened before.
What happened before?
My hard drive crashed.
Oh, no. That's bad news.
It sure is, but I'm going to call HP first, just to make sure.
Will you lose all your files?
No, I always back up my files.
You're smart.
I called HP about my computer.
What did they say?
They said I need a new hard drive.
That's too bad. How much is a new one?
It's not too much, only about $85.
Plus installation?
No, my hard drive is easy to remove and replace.
Really?
Yes, it's just a couple of screws.
That's nice.
It's a lot better than paying someone $60.
If my hard drive crashes, I'll just call you.
What's your email address?
It's blue street.
Are you sure that's all?
Yes.
No. That's incomplete.
What do you mean?
What's your mailing address?
Cherry Drive, Pasadena.
That's correct.
So what's the problem?
It is just the street. You have to give me the city, state, and ZIP code.
Oh, I get it. My email address is this.
I'm going to take a nap.
You should unplug the phone.
That's a good idea.
Do you want me to wake you in an hour?
No, thanks. Just let me sleep until I wake up.
I'll start dinner at 6:00.
Okay. I think I'll be awake by then.
If not, your nose will wake you up.
You mean I will smell the food cooking?
You might even dream about dinner.
I don't think I'm going to dream about anything. I'm really tired.
Have a nice nap.
That was a nice funeral.
Yes, dad, it was.
The son gave a nice speech about his father.
It was long, too.
I think it was about 45 minutes long.
But it went by fast. It was interesting.
I liked it.
I'll give you a speech like that, too.
Do you think anyone will come to my funeral?
Of course.
I think only the family will be there.
You have lots of friends. They will be there, too!
What was that noise?
I had to blow my nose.
Did you have to blow right next to the phone?
Did you hear that?
Of course I heard that. I thought a plane had crashed into your house.
It wasn't that loud.
I will blow my nose sometime for you, and you'll see.
Okay. I'll take your word for it.
I thought you had an elephant in your house.
You're funny.
What did you say? I think I've gone deaf.
I'm going into the bathroom to blow my nose. I'll be right back.
I have lots of friends.
Really? How many do you have?
I don't know, maybe one hundred.
That is a lot of friends. Do you have a best friend?
Of course. I have lots of best friends.
How many best friends do you have?
I think about twenty-five.
I have only one best friend.
I feel sorry for you.
I have only a few friends.
You must be lonely. I will share my friends with you.
That's very nice of you.
Don't you ever cheat on me.
Why would I do that?
Because men like to cheat.
Some men do, but not me.
I'm watching you.
I'm an open book. Watch me all you want.
If I catch you, you'll be sorry.
You won't catch me, because I love you. I'm not a cheater.
I will poke your eyes out.
I don't want any other woman.
I will chop your toes off, one by one.
Honey, please. You're the only woman for me, forever. I swear it.
I hate to go outside.
Me too.
Why do you hate to go outside?
I meet too many jerks.
I agree.
This city is full of jerks.
Rude people are everywhere.
But what can you do?
You can yell at them.
And they will yell back at you.
Yelling doesn't do any good.
No. The best thing to do is just stay home.
Will you look at this form?
B: Are you having problems with it?
A: I don't understand some things.
B: Let me help you.
A: What does "MI" mean?
B: "MI" stands for Middle Initial.
A: What does "MM/DD/YY" mean?
B: That means Month/Day/Year. Use numbers.
A: I don't understand.
B: For example, if your birth date is January 12, 1987, write 01/12/87.
A: Oh. That's simple enough.
B: Always print clearly, and fill in the bubbles completely.
A: Let's go to the animal shelter.
B: What do you want to do?
A: I want to get a puppy for my son.
B: That will make him so happy.
A: I'll get him one of those little dogs.
B: One that won't grow up too big.
A: And eat too much.
B: Do you know which one he would like?
A: Oh, yes, I took him there yesterday. He showed me one that he really liked.
B: I bet you had to drag him away.
A: He wanted to take it home yesterday.
B: I wonder what he'll name it. 
A: What's the weather like?
B: I don't know. I just woke up.
A: Why don't you look outside?
B: Okay. It looks like rain.
A: Why do you say that?
B: The sky is gray.
A: Is it raining right now?
B: No.
A: How do you know?
B: The street isn't wet.
A: I have to go shopping today.
B: You'd better take an umbrella.
A: I can't believe how hot it is.
B: It's not even noon yet.
A: That means it will get hotter.
B: I am dying from the heat.
A: Turn on the air conditioner.
B: It doesn't work.
A: What happened?
B: I don't know.
A: Did you call the repairman?
B: Of course.
A: When is he coming?
B: He's busy. He said next week.
A: I'll be glad when winter comes.
B: Why is that?
A: Because I love the snow.
B: Yes, the snow is fun.
A: Last year we made a big snowman.
B: How big was it?
A: It was seven feet tall.
B: How long did it take?
A: It took us all day.
B: Did you give him a nose?
A: Of course. We gave him a big carrot for a nose.
B: Let me help you make one this year.
A: I'm going to the bank.
B: What do you need to do?
A: I need to withdraw some money.
B: How are you going to do that?
A: I'll just use the ATM.
B: What's that?
A: It's the Automatic Teller Machine.
B: It gives you money?
A: I just insert my debit card into the machine.
B: And it gives you money?
A: Well, it gives me money, but it's my own money.
B: Oh. What good is that? I thought it gave you free money.
A: Did you put the blue bin out on the street?
B: Oh, no. I forgot.
A: Well, you'd better take it out front.
B: What time does the recycle truck come by?
A: It usually gets here at noon on Tuesday, which is tomorrow.
B: I'll just take it out to the street tomorrow morning.
A: Oh, no, you don't.
B: What do you mean?
A: Every morning you get up late and rush off to work late.
B: Do you think I'll forget to do it?
A: You'll remember to do it, but you won't have time to do it.
B: Okay, I'll take it out front right now.
A: Are you ready?
B: Ready for what?
A: Ready for the big switch.
B: What are you talking about?
A: The nation is switching to digital TV.
B: Oh. Of course I'm ready.
A: Did you buy the converter?
B: No, I don't need a converter because I bought a digital TV.
A: How much was that?
B: It was only about $120 for a 13-inch screen.
A: Does it pick up any digital channels?
B: Oh, yes. I get six Korean channels but nothing in English!
A: People are funny.
B: They sure are.
A: Did you hear about the pilot?
B: The one that stole a small plane?
A: Yes, he stole a plane in Canada and flew into the U.S.
B: Did they catch him?
A: Yes. After two U.S. fighter jets followed him for an hour, he landed on a highway.
B: Did he crash?
A: No, he just landed the plane and walked to a restaurant.
B: Did the cops find out why he flew into the U.S.?
A: His life sucked. He was hoping a fighter jet would shoot him down.
B: Poor guy.
A: The police need our help finding a robber.
B: How do you know?
A: The TV news is reporting a bank robbery.
B: Do they know what the robber looks like?
A: Yes, he's 6 feet tall, 200 pounds, black hair, and about 30 years old.
B: What race is he?
A: They didn't say.
B: The TV news doesn't tell us the race anymore.
A: Of course not. That would be racist.
B: But how can we identify someone if we don't know their race?
A: Don't ask me.
B: Then they also shouldn't tell us if the robber is male or female, because that is sexist.
A: Don't wipe your nose on your sleeve.
B: But I don't have a tissue.
A: Then go find a tissue in the bathroom.
B: I didn't have time to get one from there.
A: Your sleeves are not tissues.
B: But Mom, all my friends use their sleeves.
A: That doesn't make it right.
B: I saw Dad wipe his nose on his sleeve yesterday.
A: I will talk to your father about that.
B: I bet Dad did it all the time when he was my age.
A: Your daddy was a good little boy.
B: How do you know? Were you his mommy, too?
A: I'm worried.
B: Worried about what?
A: I'm getting married.
B: You should be happy, not worried.
A: I am happy, but marriage is a lot of responsibility.
B: Yes, you have to take care of your wife.
A: And I have to take care of our children.
B: Are you going to start a family?
A: Yes. We want to have a little boy and a little girl.
B: That sounds wonderful.
A: Except we can't afford it!
B: No wonder you're worried.
A: I don't get art.
B: Or artists.
A: They're in a different world.
B: I saw a painting of a jar that was full of pencils.
A: The artist said the jar was both full and empty.
B: But it was full of pencils! How could he say it was empty?
A: Artists see things differently.
B: Did you ever see anything that Picasso painted?
A: Of course! He's world famous.
B: Did he ever take art lessons?
A: I can't believe it. I drew paintings like that in third grade.
B: Where are they? Maybe they are worth millions.
A: What's the point?
B: The point of what?
A: Of living.
B: Who knows? You live, and then you die.
A: We must be here for some reason.
B: Maybe we're here to have fun.
A: Then why aren't I having fun?
B: Because you're thinking too much.
A: So I should stop thinking?
B: Stop thinking about what the point is.
A: Okay. I'll start thinking about having some fun.
B: Just be patient. Fun doesn't come along every five minutes.
A: Beer is a powerful drug.
B: So are cigarettes.
A: Which would you prefer?
B: What do you mean?
A: When you die and go to heaven, they will offer you beer or cigarettes.
B: I could pick only one or the other?
A: Yes. Nothing's perfect, not even in heaven.
B: Boy, that's a tough one.
A: What's so tough about it? Of course, I would pick cigarettes.
B: But cigarettes taste much better when you have a cold beer.
A: Well, you can't have everything.
B: I don't think I want to go to your heaven.
A: My pants have a hole in the front pocket.
B: You shouldn't carry pens in your pocket.
A: Yesterday a pen fell through my pants onto my shoe.
B: Lucky for you it wasn't a sharp knife.
A: Who carries a sharp knife in their pocket?
B: Criminals, of course.
A: Anyway, I have to fix the hole.
B: You can sew it up or use an iron-on patch.
A: Tell me about this patch.
B: The patch has glue. The hot iron melts the glue so the patch sticks on.
A: That sounds a lot easier than sewing.
B: It is. But after about ten washings, the glue washes off.
A: Do you know any good jokes?
B: I can't remember jokes.
A: Neither can I.
B: They go in one ear and out the other.
A: Who makes up all these jokes?
B: Who knows? But there must be a hundred new ones every day.
A: Yes, just in English alone.
B: I wonder if every language has jokes.
A: Of course! People everywhere like good jokes.
B: What do you think people joke about the most?
A: I think most jokes are about women.
B: Oh, really? I think most jokes are about men!
A: You're very lucky.
B: Why do you say that?
A: You speak two languages.
B: Well, my English isn't perfect.
A: No one speaks perfect English.
B: Maybe I will be the first!
A: I've been thinking about learning Spanish.
B: Spanish is easy. I'll be happy to teach you.
A: How long will it take me to learn?
B: I think it will only take you a year or two.
A: How soon can we begin?
B: That means right now.
A: Do you know what today is?
B: Yes, it's April 22.
A: It's more than just a date.
B: Is it your birthday or anniversary?
A: No, it's Earth Day.
B: What's that?
A: It's a yearly reminder to take care of our planet.
B: Oh, you mean like reuse things and recycle stuff?
A: Yes. We need to think green, save water, and stop using plastic bags.
B: How about if I take shorter showers?
A: That's a good idea, because showers waste a lot of water.
B: From now on I'll spend only 20 minutes in the shower.
A: Poetry sucks.
B: I don't know anyone who likes it.
A: Some of it is okay, I guess.
B: Yes, the poems that rhyme and are easy to remember.
A: Like "One, two, buckle my shoe."
B: But people still write poems.
A: No one makes any money at it.
B: Shakespeare was a poet.
A: Did he get rich from his poetry?
B: Probably not.
A: Poems are a little bit like songs.
B: Yes, but songs have music. Without music, songs would suck, too.
A: How smart are you?
B: I don't know. I think I'm average.
A: Did you ever take an IQ test?
B: No, I never did. All I know is that I got A's and B's in school.
A: I wish I was really smart.
B: Don't be ridiculous.
A: What do you mean?
B: If you're going to make a wish, wish that you were really rich or famous.
A: Don't you ever wonder what it's like to be super-smart?
B: It must be very lonely.
A: Why's that?
B: Because if you're super-smart, no one understands what you're saying.
A: I missed the TV news last night. What was on?
B: Nothing that would pass as news.
A: What's the weather going to be like this weekend?
B: I don't know. Whenever the weather comes on, I switch channels.
A: What was the lead story on the news?
B: Some actress was in court for driving without a license.
A: What was the second story?
B: Some actor married a woman young enough to be his daughter.
A: What was the third story?
B: A bull chased a man in a supermarket.
A: Wasn't there anything about Octo-Mom?
B: Of course. She's going to hire a nanny for her eight infants.
A: What are you going to do about your death?
B: Well, mostly I'll try to avoid it.
A: I mean, are you going to get buried or cremated?
B: My wife and I will be cremated.
A: Are you going to be buried next to each other?
B: Oh, no. Our ashes will be shaken into the ocean.
A: You're not going to be buried?
B: A coffin costs too much and takes up too much space.
A: Yes, but it will be in a cemetery where your children can visit you.
B: Children seldom visit their parents in a cemetery.
A: That's true. A cemetery is for dead people, not living people.
B: We figure our kids can visit us whenever they go to the beach.
A: Did you wipe your feet?
B: Yes, of course I wiped my feet.
A: Then why is there mud on the carpet?
B: I don't know. It's not my mud.
A: Well, someone brought it into the house.
B: Look at the bottom of my shoes—they're clean.
A: Of course they're clean. You left all the mud on the carpet.
B: Okay, I'll get the vacuum cleaner.
A: Don't vacuum it now.
B: Don't you want me to clean up the mud?
A: Wait till it dries. It will be easier to vacuum.
B: Next time I will be more careful.
A: What are you getting for your mom?
B: What are you talking about?
A: Sunday is Mother's Day.
B: This Sunday?
A: Of course. It's all over the news.
B: I thought it was next Sunday.
A: Well, you'd better get her something.
B: I'll get her a nice card.
A: Is that it?
B: Yes. That's all I ever give her.
A: She raised you, and all you ever give her is a card?
B: It's okay. She knows that I love her.
A: I don't like our flag.
B: What's the matter with it?
A: It's too much like other flags.
B: Yes, a lot of flags have stripes.
A: A flag should be pretty.
B: What should our flag look like?
A: It should have a pretty woman on it.
B: That's ridiculous!
A: You don't like pretty women?
B: Of course I do. But not on our flag!
A: Every nation should have a pretty woman on their flag.
B: You can't go to war carrying a flag with a woman on it!
A: I had a busy morning.
B: What did you do?
A: I watered all the plants.
B: You have a lot of plants.
A: Then I did my laundry.
B: That takes some time.
A: I took the dog for a walk.
B: I'll bet he enjoyed his walk.
A: I vacuumed the entire house.
B: That's a lot of work.
A: And then I made lunch.
B: I'll bet you were hungry!
A: I don't have long distance service with my home phone.
B: So how do you make long distance calls?
A: I use a calling card.
B: Where do you get that?
A: I buy it at the dollar store.
B: How much is it?
A: It's one dollar for 100 minutes.
B: That's only a penny a minute!
A: It's a great price. But you have to dial a lot of numbers.
B: How many?
A: First you dial seven numbers, then ten numbers, then ten more numbers.
B: I think I'll keep my long distance service.
A: Do you go to college?
B: Yes, I do.
A: What college do you go to?
B: I go to Pasadena City College.
A: Do you like it?
B: Oh, yes, I really like it.
A: Why do you like it?
B: Because it has great teachers.
A: What else?
B: I like all my classmates, too.
A: Anything else?
B: Yes. It's not expensive!
A: I lost my new pen.
B: Where did you lose it?
A: I don't know.
B: When did you lose it?
A: I think I lost it today. I used it yesterday.
B: Did you check all your pockets?
A: I checked all my pockets.
B: Did you look in your desk?
A: Yes. It isn't there, either.
B: It's probably around somewhere.
A: Oh, well, it only cost me a dollar.
B: Only a dollar? Don't even look for it.
A: Gravity is very important.
B: What is gravity?
A: It's the force that pulls everything down.
B: I don't understand.
A: If you pour water into a glass, the water goes down into the glass.
B: Of course it does.
A: Without gravity, the water would go up.
B: You're joking.
A: Without gravity, you would go up.
B: What do you mean?
A: You would float into the sky like a balloon.
B: That would be fun!
A: I can't read my book.
B: Turn on the light.
A: The light is on.
B: Open the book.
A: The book is open.
B: See an eye doctor.
A: That's what I need to do.
B: He'll give you a prescription for glasses.
A: I'll make an appointment tomorrow.
B: I'll get the yellow pages for an eye doctor.
A: Read the phone number to me.
B: I'll read it very loud, in case your hearing is getting bad, too.
A: What do you need for school?
B: I need pencils.
A: Anything else?
B: I need a notebook.
A: Do you need a pen?
B: No. I already have a pen.
A: Do you need a calculator?
B: No. The teacher doesn't permit calculators.
A: How about a dictionary?
B: No, we have a big dictionary in the classroom.
A: Well, I guess that's it.
B: Yes, that's all I need for now.
A: I like this magazine.
B: So do I.
A: I read it once, and I subscribed.
B: It gives you all the news.
A: All the news in only 50 pages.
B: I like the political cartoons.
A: I like the beautiful photos of the houses for sale.
B: I always read the film reviews.
A: I never miss the food and drink section.
B: I gave a subscription to my parents.
A: Me too. They canceled their other news magazines.
B: So did mine!
A: My pen is out of ink.
B: Shake it a couple of times.
A: I shook it. There is no more ink.
B: You can borrow mine.
A: Thank you. I'll buy a new one tomorrow.
B: What were you doing?
A: I was writing a letter.
B: Who were you writing to?
A: It's to my mom.
B: Tell her I said hello.
A: Okay. I'll return your pen when I'm done.
B: Take your time.
A: Have you done your homework?
B: Not yet.
A: Then why are you watching TV?
B: This is my favorite show.
A: Go do your homework.
B: But, mom!
A: You can watch TV after you do your homework.
B: But the show will be over.
A: There will be another show next week.
B: Please?
A: You know the rules.
B: I hate the rules! I can't wait till I grow up.
A: I can't wait until I graduate.
B: Me too.
A: No more homework.
B: I hate homework.
A: Are you going to college?
B: I can't afford it.
A: Me neither.
B: So what are you going to do?
A: I'm joining the army.
B: You're kidding. You might get killed.
A: I don't think so. After I finish, I'll have enough money to go to college.
B: That's not a bad idea.
A: What is your major?
B: English.
A: What are you going to do with an English major?
B: I'm going to be a teacher.
A: High school or middle school?
B: High school.
A: I teach high school English.
B: I didn't know that.
A: I started teaching five years ago.
B: How do you like it?
A: Do you see all this gray hair? It was totally black five years ago.
B: Maybe I'll teach middle school.
A: Parking at school is impossible.
B: I'll say.
A: I drove around for half an hour.
B: Did you find a spot?
A: I found a spot, but someone cut in and took it from me.
B: Did you yell at them?
A: Yes, I did.
B: And?
A: And he yelled back at me.
B: How rude.
A: But I got lucky a few minutes later.
B: You have to be lucky to find a parking space.
A: This is a huge library.
B: Yes, it has lots of rooms and lots of space.
A: And lots of books.
B: And lots of thieves.
A: What do you mean?
B: I mean, keep your belongings close to you.
A: The only thing in my backpack is used books.
B: But thieves don't know that.
A: They might think that I've got an iPod or laptop in there.
B: Now you're thinking.
A: You'd think a library would be safe from thieves.
B: Not even a church is safe from thieves.
A: How good is your math?
B: I can add two and two.
A: So you're not very good at math?
B: I'm terrible at math.
A: Well, I need some help.
B: With what?
A: I'm taking a math course in school.
B: Well, you should ask your teacher or your classmates for help.
A: I can't do that.
B: Why not?
A: They might think I'm stupid.
B: They're not going to think that! They'll be glad to help you.
A: Do you believe in God?
B: Of course.
A: Do you pray to God?
B: Occasionally.
A: When's that?
B: When I need something.
A: Like what?
B: Well, if I have a big test at school.
A: Does God answer your prayers?
B: Yes, I've passed all my tests.
A: Do you ever pray for money?
B: Not yet. I won't need to do that until I graduate from high school.
A: The cops finally found the husband.
B: What husband?
A: The husband of the driver who ran over two college students at 3 a.m.
B: Oh, yeah. The girl died instantly, and the boy is still in the hospital.
A: The husband said he tried to help the boy.
B: Yes, he pushed him off the hood of the car.
A: No, he said he gently placed the boy on the street.
B: So what? They still drove off.
A: The husband said a fire department was nearby.
B: So what? Did he dial 911?
A: He said he was thinking about it, but he didn't get around to it.
B: He didn't get around to turning himself in, either.
A: I don't like riding the bus.
B: Why not?
A: The seats and windows are dirty.
B: Don't they clean the bus every night?
A: I think they do.
B: You should bring some wipes with you.
A: That's a good idea.
B: Then you can wipe your seat and window.
A: People will think I'm strange.
B: Who cares? Everyone is strange.
A: That's for sure.
B: Don't worry about what people think.
A: I don't like riding the bus.
B: Why not?
A: Number one, it's too slow.
B: You're right. A car is faster.
A: Number two, it's usually late.
B: You're right. The buses are never on time.
A: Number three, it doesn't run 24 hours.
B: You're right. Buses don't run late at night.
A: Number four, it's too crowded.
B: You're right. You have to stand in the aisle.
A: Number five, it's unsafe.
B: You're right. Bad guys might rob you.
A: We had a problem at school.
B: What was the problem?
A: Someone cut the tires.
B: What tires?
A: The tires on the cars.
B: Where were the cars?
A: They were in the student parking lot.
B: How many tires were cut?
A: One or two tires were cut on each car.
B: How many cars?
A: Eleven cars.
B: That's terrible. I hope they catch the person.
A: Life isn't fair.
B: It sure isn't.
A: I got a ticket yesterday.
B: What for?
A: I was crossing the street.
B: Were you in a crosswalk?
A: Yes, but the red hand was blinking.
B: So? That's a ticket?
A: Yes, it's a $140 ticket.
B: That's not right!
A: When I started to cross the street, the white walk sign was blinking.
B: You need to walk faster.
A: You're driving too fast.
B: Why do you say that?
A: The speed limit is 65.
B: I know that.
A: But you're doing 75.
B: So is everyone else.
A: But a cop might stop you.
B: No, he won't. Some cars are doing 85.
A: So the cop will stop those cars?
B: Of course. He stops the fastest cars.
A: My friend got a ticket for doing 75.
B: Your friend was unlucky.
A: Remember to put air in your tires.
B: How often do I have to do that?
A: Once every two months.
B: That's a lot.
A: What do you mean?
B: That's six times a year!
A: Yes, and it takes about five minutes each time.
B: I'll try.
A: Check your tires or you'll get a flat.
B: Oh. That's not good.
A: No, it isn't. A flat costs you time and money.
B: And I don't have either.
A: You're driving too fast.
B: I'm in a hurry.
A: Don't ever be in a hurry.
B: It's not my fault. You didn't wake me up.
A: That's not my fault. You didn't tell me to wake you up.
B: Well, I meant to.
A: Don't ever be in a hurry when you're driving.
B: Why not?
A: Because you'll have an accident. Most accidents are because people are in a hurry.
B: How do you know that?
A: I read a lot.
B: I thought drunks caused most accidents.
A: Let's go for a ride.
B: Where are we going?
A: Into the mountains.
B: That sounds nice.
A: I want to show you my new car.
B: You bought a new car?
A: Yes. I bought a Cadillac.
B: A luxury car.
A: Luxury plus speed.
B: What are we waiting for?
A: Let me get the keys.
B: Let me get my camera.
A: I have to go to the bathroom.
B: Why didn't you go before we left?
A: I did, but I have to go again.
B: Well, hold on a little longer.
A: I think I'm going to explode.
B: Just hold on.
A: Oh! Don't hit any more bumps!
B: We'll be at McDonald's in just a few minutes.
A: I hope they are fast minutes.
B: Think about something else. Think about a hamburger.
A: I'm thinking, but I still have to go.
B: It's the next exit. Hold on!
A: Where's the car?
B: What do you mean?
A: The car isn't here.
B: Where did you park it?
A: I parked it right here.
B: Are you sure?
A: Yes. I remember this big tree.
B: Maybe it's the wrong tree.
A: No, this is the tree.
B: Did someone steal it?
A: I sure hope not.
B: Maybe they towed it away.
A: Look at this traffic.
B: I'd rather not.
A: It gets worse every year.
B: Why are you complaining? We're going almost 20 miles an hour.
A: The speed limit is 65!
B: Well, that's between 2:00 and 4:00 a.m.
A: Where are all these people going?
B: They're all asking the same question.
A: When are they going to fix this problem?
B: They said they need more money.
A: They always need more money.
B: It'll get worse before it gets better.
A: Did you see that car?
B: Yes, he went through the red light.
A: Can we call the police?
B: No, the police don't care.
A: Why not?
B: They have to see it happen.
A: They don't believe us?
B: No. They can only give a ticket if they see it happen.
A: So, what do we do?
B: We don't do anything.
A: Maybe we should honk the horn next time.
B: The driver will just honk back at us.
A: My car is dirty.
B: Why don't you wash it?
A: That's what I'm going to do.
B: Are you going to wash it yourself?
A: Of course. It's not a hard job.
B: I'll help you.
A: Okay, I'll get a bucket.
B: I'll rinse the car first.
A: Then we can scrub it with a wet sponge and soap.
B: After that, we can dry it with a towel.
A: Then it will look like new
B: And you save $10.
A: It sure is windy today.
B: Paper is flying everywhere.
A: This wind is dangerous for drivers.
B: Especially for drivers of big trucks.
A: The wind blows those trucks over.
B: It blows trees over, too.
A: A tree fell onto my dad's car.
B: Was there much damage?
A: My dad had to buy a new car.
B: Wow! That's terrible.
A: Never park your car under a tree.
B: The wind will get you, or the birds will get you.
A: When are we going to stop?
B: We'll stop at the next McDonald's.
A: How far away is that?
B: I think we'll be there in half an hour.
A: I hope so. I have to go to the bathroom.
B: Well, I can always pull over.
A: No, thank you, I'll just wait.
B: We can kill two birds with one stone.
A: What do you mean?
B: While you're using the bathroom, I'll order some food.
A: Don't order for me. I'm not hungry.
B: I'm very hungry. I'll order for you, and then I'll eat yours.
A: This is such a long light.
B: Look how many cars are waiting in line.
A: They need a left-turn arrow.
B: Only two cars can make a left turn every three or four minutes.
A: We'll be here forever.
B: Get out of this lane.
A: But we need to turn left.
B: Forget it. Go straight.
A: Then what?
B: Then we'll just make a U-turn.
A: And then we can turn right at the light.
B: Good idea. It will be so much quicker.
A: I need a cheap car.
B: How much money do you have?
A: $1,000.
B: Well, that should get you something.
A: But I need something that's reliable.
B: You need a car with low mileage.
A: A car that was owned by a little old lady.
B: Where have you looked?
A: I haven't looked anywhere yet.
B: Why not?
A: Because I'll never find one for such a low price.
B: You're right about that. Keep saving your money.
A: Good afternoon, officer.
B: Your driver's license and registration, please.
A: Here you go.
B: Do you know why I pulled you over?
A: I have no idea. All of a sudden I heard your siren.
B: You rolled through that stop sign back there.
A: But I stopped!
B: No, you didn't. You slowed down, but you didn't come to a full stop.
A: Well, nobody else does, so why should I?
B: That's not the attitude of a good driver.
A: But I am a good driver. I've never had a ticket in my life.
B: Well, you've got one now. Here. Have a nice day.
A: $140. I can't believe it.
B: What are you talking about?
A: I got a ticket downtown for $140.
B: Were you speeding?
A: No, I was crossing the street.
B: Were you jaywalking?
A: No, I was in the crosswalk.
B: So why did you get a ticket?
A: The officer said the red hand was blinking.
B: Was it blinking when you entered the crosswalk?
A: No, the white WALK sign was blinking.
B: You should fight that ticket. I'll be your witness.
A: They were in a crosswalk near school at 3 a.m.
B: Who?
A: Two students from USC.
B: What happened?
A: A speeding car ran a red light, killing the girl.
B: What happened to the other student?
A: He landed on the hood of the car.
B: Did he get off the hood?
A: No, the car stopped and the passenger pushed the injured student off the hood.
B: I'll bet the car continued on its way.
A: Of course it did. Why stop after you've run over two people?
B: I hope they find them and put them in jail for life.
A: What happened to your car?
B: I got a dent in the parking lot.
A: How did you get it?
B: I don't know. Maybe it was from a shopping cart.
A: Those shopping carts are dangerous.
B: Especially the metal ones.
A: I don't park at a store that uses metal shopping carts.
B: That's a good idea, but there was a good sale at this store.
A: Did you save any money on the sale?
B: Yes, I did. I saved about $50.
A: That's great.
B: Yes, except this dent will cost about $150.
A: Did you see Titanic?
B: Yes. It is a great movie.
A: I saw it twelve times.
B: I saw it eight times.
A: I have the DVD.
B: So do I.
A: Let's go to your home.
B: We can watch my DVD.
A: And then we can go to my home.
B: And watch your DVD.
A: I always cry at the end.
B: Me too. It's so sad.
A: Let's play cards.
B: I don't know any card games.
A: I'll teach you one.
B: Okay. What will you teach me?
A: It's called poker.
B: Is it easy to learn?
A: Yes, it will only take about 30 minutes.
B: Okay. Teach me how to play.
A: We each get five cards.
B: Oh, look. I have four tens.
A: That's great, but you're not supposed to tell me.
B: Oh. Sorry. Okay, I don't have four tens.
A: I'm a good card player.
B: Why is that?
A: Because I watch the other players.
B: What do you mean?
A: People will tell you if they have a good hand.
B: How do they do that?
A: For example, a friend of mine licks his lips.
B: When he licks his lips, you know he has a good hand?
A: I know he has a good hand, so I don't bet.
B: He never wins your money?
A: Nope, and it drives him crazy.
B: He knows you can't read his mind. Maybe he thinks you're cheating.
A: Turn the radio down, please.
B: But I'm listening to it.
A: Well, listen to it more quietly.
B: I can't wait till I grow up.
A: What will you do?
B: I will play the radio as loud as I want.
A: That's okay with me.
B: I will have a radio in every room of my house.
A: Remind me to never visit you.
B: All the radios will be on extra loud.
A: Your neighbors will hate you.
B: If they don't like it, they can move.
A: I hope I win the lotto.
B: Your chances are very small.
A: But you can't win if you don't play.
B: Ha! You can't win if you do play.
A: Someone has to win.
B: That's what everyone says.
A: It might as well be me.
B: That's what everyone says.
A: You're trying to tell me something.
B: That didn't take long.
A: You think I should quit playing.
B: Save your money for school.
A: What's on TV?
B: Nothing much.
A: What about the baseball game?
B: It got rained out.
A: Rained out?
B: Yes, rained out.
A: How could that be?
B: Well, you can't play baseball in a rainstorm.
A: I thought they were playing under a dome.
B: The dome doesn't close.
A: Why doesn't it close?
B: Who knows? They said they'll fix it before next season.
A: Can I try your coffee?
B: Sure. Here you go.
A: Hmm, that's not bad.
B: There's nothing in it.
A: What do you mean?
B: I mean, it's just coffee.
A: I figured that.
B: It's not too bitter for you?
A: It's a little bitter, but it's okay.
B: There's no sugar or cream in it.
A: No, it's a taste you have to get used to.
B: Sort of like beer.
A: Let's take a walk.
B: What's the weather like?
A: Let me step outside and see.
B: It's a little chilly, right?
A: Yes, it is.
B: I'll put on my cap.
A: Wear a jacket, too.
B: I wonder if I should bring my gloves.
A: Maybe you should, just in case it gets colder.
B: I'll put a glove in each pocket.
A: We'll get warmer as we walk.
B: Yes, but it gets colder as the sun goes down.
A: Look at the car chase on TV!
B: That driver is crazy.
A: I can't believe he hasn't crashed.
B: How fast is he going?
A: They say he's going 80 miles per hour.
B: He's going to kill someone.
A: Look! He just hit that car.
B: Oh, my goodness. No one is safe on the streets.
A: Now he's slowing down.
B: Maybe he ran out of gas.
A: Look! He just got out of the car and started running.
B: I hope the police catch him.
A: TV news is so stupid.
B: They shouldn't even call it news.
A: Last night they told us about a cat in a sofa.
B: Yesterday they told us about a dog in a pipe.
A: Last week they told us about a bear in a back yard.
B: Last month they told us about a mouse in a restaurant.
A: The weatherman tells us the temperature in every town.
B: The sports guy shows us players fighting.
A: They always tell us "what's next."
B: They always make "what's next" sound exciting, but it never is.
A: It's more like news for kids.
B: They should have kid reporters.
A: I love my computer.
B: Computers are so cool.
A: I love to go online.
B: The Internet is amazing.
A: You can travel all over the world.
B: I know. I went to China yesterday.
A: What did you do?
B: I stood on the Great Wall and looked all around.
A: What was it like?
B: It was like the real thing.
A: It was like being there?
B: Yes, I felt like I was actually there.
A: The Beatles are the best.
B: They are the best musical group ever.
A: I love all their songs.
B: I don't know which one I like the best.
A: I like the ones I can sing along with.
B: So do I, like She Loves You.
A: She loves you, Yeah, yeah, yeah!
B: And you know you should be glad!
A: What a great song.
B: How about Let It Be?
A: Oh, yes! Let it be, let it be
B: There will be an answer, let it be!
A: Let's go to a movie.
B: I'd rather not.
A: Why not?
B: You know I don't like crowds.
A: Let's go to an early movie.
B: Okay, that won't be very crowded.
A: What would you like to see?
B: Oh, I don't care. You're the one who wants to go out.
A: Well, I want to see "The Pursuit of Happyness."
B: What have you heard about it?
A: It's based on a true story about a divorced man and his young son.
B: Well, I hope it has a happy ending.
A: What's your favorite thing to do?
B: I like to watch people.
A: That's your favorite thing to do?
B: Well, it's one of them.
A: Where do you go to watch people?
B: My girlfriend and I sit outside Starbucks.
A: That sounds like a good spot.
B: We watch people walk by with their dogs.
A: I guess you see lots of different dogs.
B: We don't even know what kind most of them are.
A: There are lots of different kinds, but they all have one thing in common.
B: Yes, they love to sniff each other when they meet.
A: They call him Father Dollar Bill.
B: Yes, he was on the TV news today.
A: Every Easter Sunday he gives away money.
B: Is it his money?
A: No. Movie stars give him money to give to homeless people.
B: How much money does he give away?
A: This year he gave away $15,000.
B: That's a lot of money.
A: He gave $100 to people in wheelchairs.
B: What about the other homeless people?
A: They got $1 each.
B: People stood in line just to get one dollar?
A: Old movies are the best.
B: Even though they're in black and white.
A: A good story is more important than color.
B: Actors didn't curse back then.
A: And there was no violence.
B: People today don't like that.
A: No, today people like lots of action.
B: I like a good story.
A: I like to see actors who are like real people.
B: Like real people with real problems.
A: They still make movies like that.
B: Yes, but they never make much money.
A: Do you get PBS on TV?
B: Yes, everybody gets the Public Broadcasting System.
A: It puts me to sleep.
B: Tell me about it.
A: A gardening show follows a knitting show.
B: A cooking show follows a sewing show.
A: A travel show follows another travel show.
B: I'll say! I've gone around the world a dozen times already!
A: Now they're adding old TV shows to the old movies.
B: I sure would like to see something interesting for a change.
A: If more people donate money, PBS could offer new shows.
B: Who wants to donate? Public TV should be free.
A: I love to watch Judge Judy.
B: Is that a TV show?
A: Yes. It's on every afternoon.
B: What's so good about it?
A: They have interesting lawsuits.
B: Such as?
A: Yesterday, a woman complained about a cell phone she bought on eBay.
B: Was something wrong with the phone?
A: It works only in Canada.
B: Did the seller know that?
A: Yes, and he didn't tell the buyer.
B: I hope Judge Judy made the seller take the phone back.
A: That woman is a very good singer.
B: Yes, but she looks like a man.
A: What difference does it make?
B: Female singers are supposed to be pretty.
A: Singers are supposed to sound good.
B: They should look good, too.
A: There are lots of ugly men singers.
B: Men singers don't have to look good.
A: Then neither do women singers.
B: Well, I would never buy her CD.
A: But you would buy her CD if she was pretty?
B: Yes. I would buy all of her CDs.
A: All the TV stations are going to go digital.
B: Yes, that will occur next month.
A: Most of them are already broadcasting in digital.
B: The digital signal is very clear.
A: Oh, no, it isn't!
B: What do you mean?
A: I can't get a single channel.
B: Do you have a digital TV?
A: Of course. But I don't have cable.
B: You don't need to have cable, but you do need a good antenna.
A: But I have rabbit ears.
B: Rabbit ears aren't strong enough. Buy a digital antenna.
A: I've got a date for you.
B: Oh, really?
A: Are you interested?
B: Maybe. What is she like?
A: She's got a great personality.
B: Uh-oh. That means that she's fat and ugly.
A: She's cute.
B: Okay, so she's not ugly; she's just fat.
A: She weighs 98 pounds.
B: Okay, she's not fat. So what's the problem with her?
A: Who said there is a problem with her?
B: The problem is she has no problems—she's too good for me!
A: I think you're very pretty.
B: Thank you.
A: Would you have dinner with me?
B: I would like to.
A: Can I pick you up Friday night?
B: What time?
A: Eight o'clock.
B: That sounds great.
A: We'll go to a French restaurant.
B: I've never been to a French restaurant.
A: I think you'll love the food.
B: I'm not going to eat any snails!
A: You have pretty eyes.
B: Thank you. So do you.
A: I wish my eyes were blue.
B: What's the matter with green eyes?
A: Nothing, except my favorite color is blue.
B: Maybe in your next life you'll have blue eyes.
A: But what if I'm a fish in my next life?
B: I think some fish have blue eyes.
A: I hope I don't come back as a fish.
B: I hope I come back as a cat.
A: Cats have beautiful eyes.
B: I would love to have blue cat-eyes.
A: I love you.
B: I love you, too.
A: I loved you the first day I saw you.
B: It was love at first sight?
A: Yes, it was love at first sight.
B: I didn't love you at first.
A: I know. I had to chase you for a while.
B: Yes, you chased me and then you caught me.
A: Now you're mine forever.
B: And you're mine forever.
A: We'll grow old together.
B: And be happy together.
A: I'm in love with that girl.
B: Have you told her?
A: Of course not.
B: Why not?
A: She would laugh at me.
B: How do you know?
A: Because they always do.
B: Maybe she's different.
A: They're all the same.
B: Just ask her out to dinner.
A: And then what?
B: And then she'll know that you like her.
A: Give me a hug.
B: I'm not in the mood.
A: What's the matter?
B: I saw you looking at that woman.
A: What woman?
B: You know, that woman with the big boobs.
A: I was not looking at her.
B: You were, too.
A: I'm not interested in her.
B: Then why were you looking at her?
A: I was looking at something else.
B: Oh, really? Then spend tonight looking at the sofa.
A: Would you like to go on a blind date?
B: You must be joking.
A: No, I'm serious.
B: I don't want to date a blind woman.
A: A blind date doesn't mean that she is blind!
B: What does it mean?
A: A blind date is a date with someone you don't know.
B: Why would I date someone I don't even know?
A: To try something new and exciting.
B: What if I don't like her?
A: I have a date tomorrow night.
B: Really? Who with?
A: A girl I met at the market.
B: You met a girl at the supermarket?
A: She was standing behind me in a really slow line at the checkout counter.
B: What did you say to her?
A: I had two pineapples in my cart, and she asked where I had found them.
B: She asked you about your pineapples?
A: I told her I had gotten the last two on the shelf, but I offered her one of mine.
B: That was nice of you.
A: She asked me how she could return the favor, so I asked her out.
B: Sometimes a slow line can be a good thing.
A: Did you have a date Friday night?
B: Yes, in fact, I did.
A: Who did you go out with?
B: A man I met in a coffee shop.
A: Where did you go?
B: We went to a nice restaurant.
A: Anywhere else?
B: Then we went to a jazz club.
A: That sounds like a nice date.
B: Yes, it was pleasant.
A: But you won't date him again?
B: No. He was nice, but there was no chemistry.
A: I had the worst date the other night.
B: What happened?
A: First of all, he was half an hour late.
B: That's not a good start.
A: Then he didn't bother to apologize.
B: That's rude.
A: Then he drove too fast to the restaurant.
B: That's dangerous.
A: I thought about getting out and taking a taxi home.
B: What happened at the restaurant?
A: We had a $40 meal, and he left a $1 tip!
B: I guess you can't go back to that restaurant.
A: I don't like that man.
B: Why not?
A: He's a dirty old man.
B: What do you mean?
A: He's old enough to be my father, yet he asked me out.
B: Well, you can't blame a man for asking.
A: He should act his age.
B: But a lot of old people are still interested in dating.
A: They should find a nice hobby.
B: Just wait until you're 50 years old.
A: Dating will be the furthest thing from my mind.
B: That's what you say now. Wait till you're 50.
A: Does your girlfriend ever make you angry?
B: Sometimes.
A: What does she do?
B: Just yesterday, I told her I wouldn't trade her for all the money in the world.
A: That was a nice thing to say.
B: That's what I thought.
A: What did she say?
B: She laughed! She didn't believe me.
A: That wasn't very nice of her.
B: She said that nothing is more important to me than money.
A: What did you say?
B: I told her I wouldn't trade her for any other woman in the world.
A: Some people have good noses.
B: I wish I had a good nose. Mine is way too big.
A: I don't mean good-looking. I mean good-smelling.
B: Oh. But that can be a curse.
A: Yes, because you can be too sensitive to odors.
B: I'll say. My girlfriend has a nose like a drug dog.
A: Did she catch you using drugs?
B: Sort of. She knows whenever I sneak a cigarette.
A: You don't need a good nose for that—cigarettes stink.
B: But when I sneak just one cigarette in the morning, she can smell it that evening!
A: Boy, that is a good nose.
B: I told her she should apply for a job at customs.
A: Let's go out to eat.
B: That sounds like fun.
A: Where do you want to go?
B: Let me think a minute.
A: I feel like Chinese.
B: That sounds delicious.
A: I know a good Chinese restaurant.
B: How far away is it?
A: It's only 10 minutes from here.
B: Do we need reservations?
A: Oh, no. We can walk right in.
B: Let's go now. I'm hungry!
A: I can't believe how long this line is.
B: This is a popular restaurant, isn't it?
A: Yes, but it isn't a fast-food restaurant, is it?
B: It's the slowest hamburger in town.
A: That's because they cook it while you wait.
B: Yes. That's why it's also the best hamburger in town.
A: A great burger and great service.
B: Yes, the workers are very polite.
A: And they're clean.
B: I've been coming here for years.
A: Me too.
B: Excuse me. They just called my number.
A: Lunch was delicious.
B: Thank you.
A: What kind of soup was that?
B: It was tomato soup.
A: That tasted so good.
B: I put lemon and butter in it.
A: The sandwich was good, too.
B: Everyone likes bacon and tomato sandwiches.
A: Especially on toast.
B: And the pickles were great, too.
A: Tomorrow we'll have rice and fish for lunch.
B: I can't wait.
A: I'm calling the waiter.
B: What's the matter?
A: This steak has too much fat.
B: What do you want the waiter to do?
A: Bring me a better steak.
B: I wouldn't do that.
A: Why not?
B: They will drop the new steak on the floor, step on it, and then spit on it.
A: You're crazy.
B: Then the waiter will give you a big smile as he brings you the new steak.
A: Where do you get these crazy ideas?
B: I used to cook in a restaurant!
A: Let's leave.
B: But we just got here.
A: Did you see the waiter's hands?
B: No.
A: He had dirty fingernails.
B: Really?
A: His nails were black!
B: That's disgusting.
A: And he poured water into our glasses.
B: Yuck! No water for me.
A: I wonder if the cooks' nails are dirty, too.
B: Who cares? Let's get out of here.
A: This hot bread is delicious.
B: I like this restaurant because they give you free bread.
A: Well, I think we are paying for it.
B: No. Look at the bill when we get it. There's no charge for the bread.
A: It is delicious, especially with butter.
B: I think we should just leave after we fill up on the bread.
A: They probably wouldn't like that.
B: I'm eating so much bread that I'm getting full.
A: Then stop eating the bread!
B: Okay, just one more piece. Pass the butter, please.
A: If I owned a restaurant, I would never serve hot bread before the main course.
B: That's terrible. I would never go to your restaurant.
A: Is this a clean restaurant?
B: Well, the tables and chairs look okay.
A: Okay, let's sit down.
B: Check out the silverware.
A: It passes inspection.
B: Here comes the waiter. See if his hands and nails are clean.
A: Well, the waiter looked clean, so I guess it's okay to eat here.
B: You're forgetting about the bathroom.
A: I'm going to just hope that the bathroom is clean.
B: You're not going to examine it before we order dinner?
A: No, I'd rather not find out that it's dirty, because I'm pretty hungry right now.
B: Me, too. Let's forget about germs and focus on food.
A: Have you seen our waiter?
B: Here he comes now.
A: We've been sitting here for almost 10 minutes.
B: Oops, I guess I was wrong. That isn't our waiter.
A: We can give him five more minutes, and then leave.
B: I'll go up front and talk to the manager.
A: That's a good idea.
B: Maybe they'll give us free drinks for waiting so long.
A: Maybe he'll send us our waiter immediately.
B: Every time we eat out, it's an adventure.
A: Last time, we got seats next to the kitchen.
B: We'll never go there again.
A: Is this table okay?
B: No, it's too close to the kitchen door.
A: How about this table?
B: No, it's too close to the front door.
A: This looks like a nice table.
B: No, it's too close to the salad bar.
A: Okay, I give up.
B: Well, there is one good table.
A: Great. Which one?
B: That one. A group of eight just sat down at it.
A: I don't believe the art world.
B: What is it this time?
A: An Andy Warhol drawing.
B: He's a famous artist.
A: He drew two butterflies and a flower on a napkin in a restaurant.
B: Did he sign it?
A: Yes.
B: Is it beautiful?
A: It's just black ink on a white napkin. And the napkin has food stains!
B: So it's not worth much?
A: Only about $30,000.
B: Without the food stains, it would probably be worth more.
A: Can we go to the baseball game?
B: Of course.
A: I love baseball.
B: So do I.
A: I love to eat the peanuts.
B: I love to eat the hot dogs.
A: I hope we’ll see a home run.
B: I hope we’ll catch a foul ball.
A: Bring a jacket.
B: Yes. It gets a little cool at night.
A: Bring a glove to catch a foul ball.
B: No. I’ll just use my cap to catch a foul ball.
A: Golf is a silly game.
B: It certainly is.
A: You hit a white ball.
B: And then you chase it.
A: And then you hit it again.
B: Finally, you put the ball into a hole in the ground.
A: You do this 18 times, because there are 18 holes.
B: What’s the point?
A: How can it be fun?
B: They pay money to play this silly game!
A: I think golfers have a mental problem.
B: I think they’re nuts.
A: Do you want to go fishing?
B: Yes. That’s a good idea.
A: Where do you want to go?
B: We can go to the river.
A: Or we can go to the lake.
B: Or we can go to the ocean.
A: Let’s go to the lake.
B: Yes. The lake is only 10 miles away.
A: We can be there in 20 minutes.
B: I’ll get our fishing rods.
A: I’ll get the bait.
B: We’ll have fresh fish for dinner!
A: Baseball is fun.
B: I like to hit the ball.
A: I like to run around the bases.
B: I like to slide into the bases.
A: Yeah. It’s a lot of fun to slide.
B: I want to be a baseball player when I grow up.
A: Me too. I want to play for the Yankees.
B: Not me. I want to play for the Dodgers.
A: We have to practice every day.
B: I don’t like practice.
A: Me neither. It’s boring.
B: But practice makes perfect.
A: Let’s go jogging.
B: That’s a good idea.
A: I bought some new shoes.
B: Are they comfortable?
A: They’re very comfortable.
B: How much were they?
A: They were on sale for $80.
B: Do they help you run faster?
A: No, but my feet don’t hurt anymore.
B: Then they’re worth every penny.
A: You might want to buy a pair.
B: I’ll wait until I wear this pair out.
A: Tiger is the greatest golfer in the world.
B: You can say that again.
A: But I’m worried about Tiger.
B: Why is that?
A: Because he likes to SCUBA dive.
B: What’s wrong with that?
A: It can be dangerous.
B: You mean he could drown.
A: He shouldn’t SCUBA dive until he retires.
B: But he dives to relax.
A: He might relax, but it makes me nervous.
B: If his wife doesn’t mind, you shouldn’t mind.
A: Did you watch that golf tournament?
B: The one that Tiger won?
A: How did he do it?
B: It was nothing for him.
A: He sank a 20-foot putt on the last hole to win by one stroke!
B: He sank a 25-footer last year at the same tournament to win by one stroke.
A: I think he is from outer space.
B: No human could possibly play golf that well.
A: Whenever he needs a shot to win a tournament, he makes that shot.
B: No human can do that.
A: Somebody should check his birth record.
B: I bet it says he was born on Mars.
A: Who’s the greatest baseball player?
B: There are so many great players.
A: Yes, but who is the greatest?
B: I’d have to say Babe Ruth.
A: Most people would say that.
B: He changed the game.
A: Yes, he made the home run popular.
B: Everybody loved him, all over the nation.
A: He helped make the Yankees the best team ever.
B: And Ruth was a good person, too.
A: He always visited hospitals to cheer up sick kids.
B: There will never be another Babe.
A: Did you hear what happened at the baseball game?
B: No, please tell me.
A: Someone punched out someone.
B: That’s not nice.
A: It’s worse than that.
B: How so?
A: Two guys got into an argument.
B: I’ll bet they were drinking.
A: A third guy punched one of the two guys.
B: I’ll bet he was drinking, too.
A: The victim hit his head on the concrete steps and died.
B: That’s terrible. Can’t people just have fun at a baseball game?
A: I want to go to the ball game.
B: Is there a game tonight?
A: Yes, it starts at 7 p.m.
B: Can we get tickets?
A: Yes, but only the cheap tickets.
B: How much are they?
A: They’re only $5 each.
B: That’s a good price.
A: Yes, it’s cheaper than a hot dog or a beer.
B: Where are the seats?
A: They’re behind the outfield.
B: Maybe we can catch a home run ball.
A: Golf is so hard.
B: What's so hard about hitting a little white ball?
A: It's hard if you want to do it right.
B: You mean like Tiger?
A: No, like a good amateur golfer.
B: What's so hard about golf?
A: There are so many things you have to do right.
B: Like what?
A: Like keep your left arm straight, keep your head down, and follow through.
B: Yikes! Who can remember all that?
A: You need to get a lot of lessons when you're really young.
B: Forget it. Golf sounds more like work than fun.
A: Did you hear about the ball player?
B: The home run hitter on drugs?
A: He said a doctor helped him with a personal problem.
B: He said he wasn’t using drugs.
A: He apologized to the fans.
B: The league suspended him for 50 games.
A: That will cost him some money.
B: Yes, about $7 million.
A: That will teach him a good lesson.
B: He probably won’t use drugs anymore.
A: But it won’t stop other players from using drugs.
B: No. Everyone always figures that they won’t get caught.
A: Why is there so much crime?
B: Because parents don't teach their kids right from wrong.
A: Is that it?
B: Also, there aren't enough police.
A: But there are a lot of police.
B: There's only one police officer per 100 criminals.
A: Can't we hire more police?
B: No. It costs too much money.
A: Doesn't crime cost more than police?
B: Yes, it does.
A: So it would be cheaper to hire more police?
B: Yes, it would.
A: This is a great neighborhood.
B: Yes, it is.
A: People are friendly.
B: Yes, they are.
A: The streets and sidewalks are clean.
B: Yes, they are.
A: There's a real nice park nearby.
B: Yes, there is.
A: I feel safe here.
B: There is no crime here.
A: I wish I could move here.
B: Maybe you can, if someone moves out.
A: The house burned down.
B: What happened?
A: The man fell asleep.
B: Was he smoking?
A: Yes, he was smoking a cigarette.
B: Did he die?
A: Yes, he did. His cat died, too.
B: That's too bad. What about his smoke alarm?
A: The battery was dead.
B: A good battery would have saved his life.
A: He had cigarettes, but no battery.
B: It happens all the time.
A: They say he has started fifteen big fires.
B: He's been in jail three times already.
A: Why did they ever let him out?
B: It's the law. They can't keep him in jail forever.
A: Why not? Everyone knows he's a firebug. He loves to start fires.
B: I don't know. Sometimes the law doesn't make sense.
A: But his latest fire killed someone.
B: This time they have charged him with murder.
A: So maybe he'll go to jail forever?
B: I sure hope so.
A: Someone should set him on fire.
B: That would teach him a good lesson.
A: Put your seatbelt on.
B: Why?
A: Because it will protect you in case of an accident.
B: But it's uncomfortable.
A: It's the law.
B: It's so much trouble.
A: It's common sense.
B: It's so tight that it's hard for me to breathe.
A: Hold your breath till we get there.
B: Okay, my seatbelt is on.
A: I'm glad you don't complain very much.
B: I'm ready for an accident.
A: What are you doing?
B: I'm going to change the light bulb. It burnt out.
A: What are you standing on?
B: A couple of dictionaries and some textbooks.
A: Are you crazy?
B: What's the matter?
A: Those books will slip and you'll fall.
B: It's only a couple of feet.
A: What if you fall while you're holding the light bulb, and it breaks and pieces go into your eyes?
B: I never thought about that.
A: You'd be blind for the rest of your life!
B: I'll get the stepladder.
A: Did you see that puddle of water on the floor?
B: Yes. I called for a clean-up.
A: A puddle of water is very dangerous.
B: It isn't easy to see.
A: But it's real easy to slip on.
B: Especially on these slick floors.
A: Someone who slips could hurt their back.
B: They could even crack their head open.
A: We should stand here till the clean-up person gets here.
B: We can leave if we put an orange cone here.
A: Yes, but I don't know where the orange cones are.
B: It doesn't matter. Here he comes now with the mop.
A: What happens when the fire alarm rings?
B: We tell our students to leave the classroom.
A: Can they take their belongings?
B: Yes, if they do it quickly.
A: Where do the students go?
B: They go out to the north parking lot.
A: What do the teachers do?
B: We take our rosters to the parking lot and take roll.
A: Why do you do that?
B: We want to make sure all the students are out of the building.
A: If they are all outside, then what?
B: Then we just wait outside for a fireman to tell us to go back in.
A: I have to go back upstairs.
B: Why? We're already late.
A: I have to check the stove.
B: What's the matter?
A: Maybe I left the burner on.
B: No, you didn't. I checked the stove before we left.
A: Are you sure?
B: Of course I'm sure.
A: Well, I have to go back upstairs anyway.
B: It's getting later every minute.
A: I think I left the water running.
B: No, you didn't. Let's go! The only thing running is the clock!
A: The city is buying guns.
B: What are they paying?
A: Up to $200 for each gun, no questions asked.
B: Why are they doing this?
A: They want to get guns off the street.
B: Who would turn in a gun for $200?
A: That isn't a good deal?
B: A good gun costs $400 or more.
A: Well, if you bring your receipt, maybe they'll give you $400.
B: I'll keep my receipt and my gun.
A: I didn't know you had a gun.
B: Everyone in America should have a gun.
A: You're yawning.
B: I sure am.
A: You should go to bed.
B: I will as soon as I finish this article.
A: What are you reading?
B: It's about crime in Los Angeles.
A: What does it say?
B: The mayor says the crime rate is going down.
A: Then why does everyone lock their doors?
B: I guess they haven't read this article.
A: No one believes that the crime rate is going down.
B: Maybe the mayor is just talking about his own neighborhood.
A: People who live in California are crazy.
B: Why is that?
A: Because of all the earthquakes and fires.
B: But big earthquakes happen only once in a while.
A: Once in a while is once too many.
B: But you're right. There are a lot of fires.
A: A recent fire destroyed 85 homes.
B: Still, it's safer than Florida.
A: Florida doesn't have earthquakes or fires.
B: No, Florida just has hurricanes every year from June to October.
A: But most of those hurricanes are harmless.
B: Excuse me. Hurricane Andrew destroyed 30,000 homes!
A: I went to Hawaii on vacation.
B: Did you like it?
A: I loved it. I want to live there.
B: What did you like?
A: The island is so green, and the water is so blue.
B: Did you go swimming?
A: I went to the beach every day.
B: How was the weather?
A: It was hot and sunny every day.
B: What did you do at night?
A: At night I went out to eat. The food was delicious.
B: People who live in Hawaii are lucky.
A: I like this hotel.
B: What do you like about it?
A: We get a free breakfast.
B: Coffee and a roll?
A: No, a real breakfast.
B: Bacon and eggs?
A: With toast, ham, sausage, fresh fruit, and juice.
B: Wow! That is nice. Let's stay for two nights.
A: And the rooms are clean, too.
B: Do they allow pets?
A: No pets, no smoking.
B: I like that. Let's stay three nights.
A: I'm not sleeping here tonight.
B: What's the matter? This is a nice room.
A: Maybe the room is nice, but not the bed.
B: What's wrong with the bed?
A: Look at this sheet.
B: Yes?
A: See those stains?
B: I sure do.
A: I'm not sleeping on that sheet.
B: Well, just call the front desk. They'll give us new sheets.
A: I want sheets without stains on them.
B: From now on, let's bring our own sheets.
A: What time does your plane leave?
B: It leaves at 12:15.
A: When do you have to be at the airport?
B: I have to be there two hours early.
A: So we have to be at the airport at 10:15.
B: That means we have to leave the house at 9:15.
A: Well, it's an hour to get there, if there are no traffic problems.
B: So maybe we better leave at 8:15?
A: Yes, it's better to get there too early than too late.
B: I agree.
A: You never know what might happen on these freeways.
B: There's at least one huge accident every day.
A: I need to fly to New York.
B: When are you going?
A: During the Christmas holidays.
B: You'd better buy your ticket now.
A: You must be kidding.
B: No, I'm not. It's March. Time is running out. Seats are selling out right now.
A: I thought I would wait until October.
B: I'll bet this is the first time you've ever flown during Christmas.
A: You're right.
B: Well, listen to me. You need to buy a ticket now.
A: But maybe prices will be cheaper in October.
B: Cheaper prices won't do you any good if there are no seats.
A: I hate flying.
B: So do I.
A: A long time ago, flying used to be okay.
B: Now it's like riding a bus.
A: You're jammed in with people all around you.
B: Half of them are coughing, and the other half are sneezing.
A: You don't have any elbow room or knee room.
B: People are always getting up to use the bathroom.
A: Kids are crying or climbing over you.
B: It's a flying zoo!
A: I wish I could afford first class seats.
B: Doesn't everybody?
A: Some guy rowed across the Atlantic Ocean.
B: Good for him.
A: Why would he do that?
B: Did he set a new record?
A: Yes, I think he did.
B: Well, I guess that's why he did it.
A: What's the point?
B: Now he has the world record!
A: But someone's going to break it, so what good is it?
B: Well, he can enjoy it while it lasts.
A: I don't think he even got paid for it.
B: Some people do it just to do it.
A: I want to go on a cruise ship.
B: That sounds like fun. Where do you want to go?
A: I want to cruise to Hawaii.
B: That should be a nice trip. Lots of fun, and lots of food.
A: I have no idea how much it will cost.
B: I think it depends on the season and on your cabin.
A: Well, of course I want to go when the weather is nice.
B: Yes, you don't want to travel in winter storms.
A: And I want to get a big cabin with a view.
B: Are you going to travel alone?
A: No, my sister and I will travel together.
B: Well, you should go online and try to find a good deal.
A: I hate to fly.
B: Because of all the security?
A: No, because it hurts my ears.
B: What do you mean?
A: Every time we land or take off, my ears hurt so much.
B: That's just the altitude change, I think.
A: Whatever it is, it hurts.
B: Can't you take medicine or something for it?
A: I've tried everything, but nothing works.
B: Have you tried earplugs?
A: They don't work, either.
B: Well, be glad you're not a pilot.
A: Spring break starts tomorrow.
B: Are you going to go anywhere?
A: I was thinking of driving to Arizona.
B: To the Grand Canyon?
A: Yes. I've never been there.
B: I was there when I was a kid.
A: How did you like it?
B: I loved it. I still remember how amazing it was.
A: I'm sure I'll like it, too.
B: You should try riding a mule on a trail to the bottom.
A: No way! I don't want to fall to my death.
B: Don't worry. Only one person has ever fallen off a mule.
A: That hotel was terrible.
B: The worst in the whole world.
A: The walls were so thin.
B: All day long we heard TVs or telephones.
A: All night long we heard people snoring.
B: Housekeeping didn't give us fresh towels.
A: Room service brought us a cold dinner.
B: Our nonsmoking room stunk of cigarette smoke.
A: Our room was right next to the elevator and the ice machine.
B: They added phony charges to our bill.
A: How did we end up in that terrible hotel?
B: The travel agent gave us a 50-percent discount!
A: I have to hang up. I'm so sleepy.
B: It's not even 10 o'clock.
A: I'm falling asleep on the phone.
B: You got up real early.
A: I had to take my friend to the airport.
B: Why didn't you take a nap when you got home?
A: I didn't get home until 30 minutes ago.
B: Why is that?
A: There was a bomb threat at the airport.
B: Only a threat?
A: Yes, but I was stuck there all day while they looked for the bomb.
B: Someday the bomb is going to be for real.
A: My dad went to Washington, D.C.
B: Why did he do that?
A: He was invited, along with about 90 other veterans.
B: Who invited them?
A: Some private organization.
B: Why did they invite him?
A: To thank him and all the other soldiers who served in World War II.
B: That's very nice.
A: My dad got to see the beautiful new World War II Monument.
B: That trip must have cost a lot of money.
A: That was a great trip to Washington, D.C.
B: Tell me about it, Dad.
A: About 90 of us World War II veterans got on the plane at 8 a.m.
B: How long was the flight?
A: It only took about two hours.
B: Did you take pictures at the World War II Monument?
A: Oh, yes. We all took lots of pictures.
B: Then you flew back home that evening?
A: Yes. When we landed, TV reporters and the Army band were there.
B: That must have made you feel really special.
A: Oh, it did. There were about 300 people there to honor us.
B: Well, you all deserve it. You helped save our country.
A: I need a job.
B: I thought you had a job.
A: I did.
B: What happened?
A: I got laid off.
B: That's terrible! When did it happen?
A: I got laid off last week.
B: Just you?
A: No, ten of my coworkers got laid off, too.
B: What are you going to do?
A: I'm looking in the newspaper for a job.
B: Good luck!
A: Before you go to that interview, check yourself.
B: What's to check?
A: Are your nails clean?
B: Yes, they are.
A: Did you double-check your nose and teeth?
B: They are clean, too.
A: Did you shine your shoes?
B: My shoes are shined.
A: Do your socks match?
B: Of course they match.
A: No, they don't. One is black and one is dark blue.
B: Thank you.
A: Life is hard.
B: It sure is.
A: I thought school was hard.
B: Me, too. I couldn't wait to graduate.
A: But now work is hard, too.
B: I agree. Work is just as hard as school.
A: Sometimes I wish I was back in school.
B: Me, too. School was fun.
A: And it was only 12 years.
B: It went by pretty fast.
A: But work goes on forever!
B: We have to work for 30 years!
A: I'm sleepy.
B: So am I.
A: I had a long day.
B: So did I.
A: I didn't even have lunch.
B: Neither did I.
A: I was busy the whole day.
B: So was I.
A: I had to bring work home with me.
B: I did too.
A: Your day was just like mine.
B: Of course it was. We work together!
A: I don't like my job.
B: What do you do?
A: I'm a babysitter.
B: Is that a lot of work?
A: Babies cry all the time.
B: You have to change their diapers.
A: I have to feed them.
B: Are you looking for another job?
A: No, I'm looking for another family.
B: Another family?
A: A family with only one baby.
B: That's a good idea.
A: I need a job.
B: What was your last job?
A: I was a painter.
B: What happened?
A: I got laid off because there was no work.
B: What else can you do?
A: I'm a handyman.
B: Can you fix a dripping faucet in a kitchen sink?
A: Of course.
B: Then I have a job for you in my kitchen.
A: It will cost you only $20 plus parts.
B: Okay. That sounds like a fair price.
A: What would you do if you lost your job?
B: I have no idea. I've been here for 20 years.
A: Do you have any other skills?
B: Well, I know how to flip hamburgers.
A: No one would hire you to flip hamburgers.
B: Have you heard something that you're not telling me?
A: What do you mean?
B: Are there going to be layoffs at this place?
A: I certainly hope not!
B: If you got laid off, you'd be flipping hamburgers, too.
A: Oh great, we could both work at Burger King.
B: Maybe we'd get laid off there, too.
A: Do your students ever talk about their jobs?
B: Yes, and they ask me what jobs are the best.
A: I tell my students to become a teacher.
B: Teaching is a great job.
A: It's the best job I've ever had.
B: What makes it so good?
A: For me, it's the students.
B: What do you mean?
A: I mean I have wonderful students.
B: That must be nice.
A: Teaching is the best part of my whole day.
B: You're a lucky man to have a job you love.
A: Boy, I'm glad that job is finished.
B: How long did it take?
A: Four hours, without a break.
B: It's always nice to finish a job.
A: Well, it's good and bad.
B: What's bad about it?
A: When you finish, all you do is start another job!
B: Yes, that's right. It does get boring.
A: Especially if it's the same work, over and over.
B: But that's what most people do.
A: Yes, I guess most of us are stuck in a routine.
B: I wonder if there is any job that you don't repeat over and over.
A: I think I have the worst boss in the world.
B: What makes him so bad?
A: He's rude and he yells a lot.
B: That's hard to take.
A: I've never heard him say please or thank you.
B: He sounds like a real jerk.
A: No one at work likes him.
B: Can't you report him to his supervisor?
A: Of course not. If I do that, I'll lose my job.
B: Yes, they don't like troublemakers or complainers.
A: I can't quit, because I'm making a good salary.
B: You shouldn't choose money over happiness.
A: What are we going to do?
B: About what?
A: About finding a job for me.
B: You don't need a job. I make enough money for both of us.
A: That doesn't matter. I don't want to sit around.
B: Okay, what kind of job do you want?
A: I'm not sure.
B: Well, you should do something that you enjoy.
A: I enjoy selling. I was born to sell.
B: Okay, what do you want to sell?
A: Cigarette lighters. I'll make a fortune.
B: But you hate cigarettes and you hate smoking!
A: A new hotel is looking for workers.
B: Yes, I saw it on the TV news.
A: They need 300 new workers.
B: And 4,000 people showed up.
A: So many people are out of work.
B: I still have my job, thank goodness.
A: So do I, but I'm worried.
B: Me too. There are no guarantees.
A: If you lose your job, you can move in with me.
B: Oh, thank you. That's very nice of you.
A: You would do the same for me.
B: Of course. What are friends for?
A: I think I did something real stupid.
B: What did you do?
A: I bought some stock.
B: Everybody buys stock.
A: I bought it on a hunch.
B: You didn't read about the company first?
A: I didn't have to. It's been in business for 60 years.
B: So what's the problem?
A: I used all my savings on this one company.
B: You put all your eggs into one basket.
A: If the company goes out of business, I'll have nothing.
B: Oh, you'll have something—you'll have a lesson you'll never forget!
A: I was going to be a doctor.
B: What happened to your plans?
A: I got a D in college chemistry.
B: Well, a D is better than an F.
A: A tutor helped me get the D!
B: So, you didn't become a doctor.
A: And now I'm glad that I didn't.
B: Why's that?
A: A hospital is the most dangerous place in the world.
B: Oh, yes, because of all the killer germs.
A: If you're a smart doctor, you stay away from hospitals.
B: Yes, the smart doctors are those TV news doctors—no hospitals, no patients.
A: I want to be a mail carrier when I grow up.
B: Why?
A: Because you get to meet a lot of people.
B: You sure do.
A: And you get a lot of exercise every day.
B: That's the truth.
A: And you get to play with a lot of dogs.
B: Well, you're supposed to be working.
A: Yes, but I will always pet the friendly dogs.
B: What about the unfriendly dogs?
A: I think if you are friendly to dogs, they are friendly to you.
B: Dogs are like people, not all of them are friendly.
A: I want to move to New York.
B: To the state or the city?
A: To the city, of course.
B: Why do you want to move there?
A: Because I want to make a lot of money.
B: There are a lot of poor people in New York.
A: There sure are—at least a million.
B: So how do you plan to become rich?
A: I will knock on the doors of all the corporations.
B: That won't make you rich. Nobody will talk to you.
A: I will keep knocking on doors.
B: All you will get is sore knuckles.
A: I love salads.
B: Me too.
A: I usually eat a simple salad.
B: What do you put in it?
A: Just lettuce, tomato, and celery.
B: That's it?
A: I add some pepper and salt.
B: I always put cheese in my salads.
A: Yes, cheese is nice.
B: What kind of dressing do you use?
A: I pour lots of French dressing on top.
B: Me too. French dressing is so delicious! Who cares about calories?
A: I love cheese.
B: Me too.
A: Where does cheese come from?
B: It comes from cows.
A: So we get cheese from cows, and we get milk, too?
B: Yes, we do.
A: What else do we get from cows?
B: We get hamburgers and steak.
A: Oh, that's so delicious.
B: We also get leather.
A: We get a lot of things from cows, don't we?
B: Yes. A cow is man's best friend.
A: I used to work in a deli.
B: How did you like it?
A: I loved it!
B: Did you get free food?
A: I ate free cheese and meat every day.
B: That sounds like a great job.
A: Whatever a customer ordered, I sliced off a little more for me.
B: Did you get fat?
A: No, but I did put on a few pounds.
B: That sounds like a dream job.
A: It was, until one day my manager caught me.
B: No more free cheese for you, huh?
A: I'm on a new diet.
B: What are you eating now?
A: I switched from pasta to potatoes.
B: Why did you do that?
A: Pasta is processed food. Potatoes are natural food.
B: Natural food has more vitamins.
A: And it's just as easy to prepare.
B: How do you prepare the potatoes?
A: I wash them, and then steam them for 15 minutes.
B: That's pretty simple.
A: Then I add butter, salt, and pepper.
B: Can I have all those cans of tomato sauce you bought for your pasta?
A: My girlfriend's mom got mad at me at the dinner table.
B: Why was that?
A: I sprinkled salt and pepper on the food before I tasted it.
B: What's the matter with that?
A: Her mom is a great cook.
B: So, a little salt and pepper never hurt anything.
A: It hurt her feelings.
B: Oh.
A: I apologized to her, but I could tell she was still upset.
B: Maybe you shouldn't eat there again.
A: I'm sure everything will be okay in a day or two.
B: It's your girlfriend's fault. She should have warned you.
A: I eat the same thing every day.
B: You're kidding.
A: No, I'm serious.
B: Doesn't that get old?
A: No, because I'm eating food that I like.
B: But the same thing day after day gets old.
A: Well, I guess if it ever does get old, I'll change to something different.
B: Do you eat fruits and vegetables every day?
A: No, I hate vegetables.
B: But you eat fruits.
A: I eat two apples, one banana, and one orange every day.
B: Well, there's nothing wrong with that.
A: There's something wrong with my orange.
B: What's wrong?
A: It's not orange!
B: Your orange isn't orange?
A: No, it's dark pink!
B: Are you sure? I never heard of such a thing.
A: I just peeled it, and I'm looking at it right now.
B: Let me see. Yes, you're right. Your orange is pink.
A: Who ever heard of such a thing?
B: Oh, look. Here's the little sticker that was on it. It's called a Pink Navel.
A: What is this world coming to?
B: Who knows? Maybe soon we'll have pink bananas.
A: I love peanuts.
B: Me, too. I love them roasted and salted.
A: I love boiled peanuts.
B: Boiled? I never heard of that.
A: Just boil raw peanuts in salt water until the shells are soft.
B: I'll have to try them sometime.
A: They're best when they're hot.
B: My brother is allergic to peanuts.
A: That's not good.
B: No, it isn't. He almost died when he was little.
A: I guess he has to be very careful about what he eats.
B: He has a very strict diet.
A: I'm gaining weight.
B: How much have you gained?
A: Three pounds just this month.
B: Do you know why?
A: I think it's the ice cream.
B: You started eating ice cream?
A: It was on sale.
B: How much did you buy?
A: I filled up my freezer with ice cream.
B: Well, it won't last forever.
A: No, I figure I'll finish it all by next week.
B: Then you can start losing weight, if there isn't another sale.
A: I'm stuffed.
B: Of course you are. You ate everything on the table.
A: I don't like to eat leftovers.
B: I'm glad to hear there's something you don't like to eat.
A: I like my food hot and fresh.
B: You like to see it disappear.
A: I don't like it reheated.
B: Well, you'll have hot fresh food tomorrow night.
A: I'm so full I'm going to burst.
B: You should loosen your belt.
A: I already loosened my belt and unbuttoned my pants.
B: Well, don't stand up, please.
A: I saw what you did.
B: I didn't do anything.
A: Oh yes, you did.
B: What are you talking about?
A: You know what I'm talking about.
B: I don't have any idea.
A: You know what you did.
B: Maybe I know, but how could you know?
A: Because I was watching you.
B: Okay, I'm sorry I did it.
A: Don't drink milk out of the carton. Use a glass!
B: I promise I'll never drink out of the carton again.
A: I like that shirt.
B: So do I.
A: How much is it?
B: I don't know. The tag is missing.
A: Ask the clerk.
B: I will.
A: Oh, look. Here's another shirt just like it.
B: Does it have a price tag?
A: Yes, it does. It's only $20.
B: That's a great price.
A: I think I'll buy both of them.
B: You'd better try them on first.
A: I bought you a pair of pants.
B: Thank you.
A: I hope they fit.
B: I hope you kept the receipt.
A: You think they won't fit?
B: I think I've put on some weight.
A: You think?
B: Maybe a pound or two.
A: Maybe four or five pounds?
B: My waist is bigger than it was.
A: No problem. These pants have an elastic waistband.
B: You are so smart!
A: What do we need to buy?
B: Let me look at our list.
A: I know that we need milk.
B: Nonfat.
A: Of course. What else?
B: We need cheese, bread, and ham.
A: What kind of cheese?
B: Swiss.
A: Of course, the cheese with holes in it.
B: I never used to buy Swiss cheese.
A: Why not?
B: I didn't want to pay for the holes.
A: I need some pants.
B: I thought you just bought a pair.
A: I did.
B: What's wrong with them so soon?
A: The pants are fine, but the pocket has a huge hole in it.
B: You shouldn't carry your keys and pens in your pocket.
A: But that's what pockets are for.
B: You should carry them in a purse.
A: I'm a man, and men don't carry purses!
B: Well, you should buy pants with stronger pockets.
A: I would if I could find someone who makes strong pockets.
B: Try a Google search online.
A: What are those wipes for?
B: You use them to wipe the handle of the shopping cart.
A: That's a great idea.
B: Yes, all the markets just started offering wipes to shoppers.
A: I'm going to take five wipes.
B: What do you need five of them for?
A: One to wipe the handle, and the others to wipe the produce.
B: What's the matter with the produce?
A: Do you think the bananas fell from the sky?
B: What do you mean?
A: I mean, someone used their dirty hands to pick the bananas, the apples, and the oranges.
B: Well, you better save a wipe for the dirty dollar bills you're going to pay with.
A: Did you go to the 99 Cents store?
B: Yes, I did.
A: What did you buy?
B: Well, I got a lot of good deals, as usual.
A: Like what?
B: Well, a dozen large eggs were only 99 cents.
A: That's a good deal.
B: And a one-pound tub of soft butter was the same price.
A: Another good deal.
B: But the best deal was five pounds of potatoes for 99 cents.
A: I don't know how that store makes money.
B: Neither do I, but they're doing something right.
A: I need a new computer.
B: What's the matter with yours?
A: It's six years old.
B: That's pretty old.
A: It still works, but I'm going to give it to a charity.
B: Are you going to buy a desktop or laptop?
A: Oh, a laptop, of course.
B: A PC or a Mac?
A: I haven't decided yet.
B: More and more people are using Macs.
A: But 90 percent of the world uses PCs.
B: And that's not going to change anytime soon.
A: I got ripped off.
B: What happened?
A: I had a car problem, so I went online.
B: Did you find a solution?
A: Yes, I did. A site I went to said they would send me the solution.
B: So, what's the problem?
A: I sent them $20 using my credit card, but they never sent me the solution.
B: What are you going to do?
A: I sent them an email asking for my money back.
B: Have you heard from them?
A: Not yet. It's been a week.
B: Well, I guess that's a $20 lesson for you.
A: Where's the pencil sharpener?
B: Which one?
A: Any one. I need to sharpen this pencil.
B: I think there's one on the dining room table.
A: I already looked there.
B: Did you look in the desk drawer?
A: Yes, I looked there, too.
B: Don't we have about five sharpeners?
A: Yes, but they seem to have legs.
B: Tomorrow I'm going to buy an electric sharpener.
A: Get one with the rubber suction cups on the bottom.
B: Yes. That way it will stay where I put it.
A: I'm trying to stretch my dollars.
B: How are you doing that?
A: I started shopping at the dollar store.
B: That saves a lot of money.
A: I bought three pounds of potatoes for a dollar.
B: That's a good deal.
A: Yes, even though some of the potatoes had eyes.
B: Just put them in the fridge.
A: Also, I bought a can of cheap coffee and a bag of good coffee.
B: Why did you do that?
A: I mixed them together.
B: If the coffee still tastes okay, that's a good idea.
A: I really like this house.
B: Can we afford it?
A: They want 20 percent down.
B: That's a lot of money.
A: But the house is so nice.
B: It's in a great neighborhood.
A: It's close to the beach.
B: It's close to the freeways.
A: It's got a big yard.
B: The kids love the house, too.
A: If we don't buy it, someone else will.
B: You're right. Let's buy it now. We can worry later.
A: We can't afford this house.
B: Are you sure?
A: We will be house rich, but cash poor.
B: What do you mean?
A: Our monthly payments will be too high.
B: We won't have any money for other things?
A: No, we won't have money for gas or food.
B: We'll be eating peanut butter sandwiches?
A: Without the peanut butter!
B: That's no good!
A: We have to find a cheaper house.
B: Of course. We can't live without gas or peanut butter.
A: That is a beautiful house.
B: I don't like it.
A: What's the matter with it?
B: It's on the corner.
A: So?
B: That means it gets twice as much traffic.
A: You're right.
B: When you're inside, you will always hear cars stopping and stopping at the intersection.
A: Or you'll hear the collision if someone doesn't stop.
B: Or you'll see the collision if they crash into the house.
A: Let's find a house that's at the end of a dead end.
B: That's perfect. The less traffic, the better.
A: I hate looking for an apartment.
B: Me, too.
A: We have a 2 o'clock appointment to see the one on Main Street.
B: We'd better get ready to go.
A: It's an upstairs unit.
B: That's good, because I don't want to live under people with loud feet.
A: And it's a corner unit.
B: That's great. We won't have neighbors on both sides of us.
A: No pets are allowed.
B: Perfect. We don't have to listen to barking dogs.
A: And there are only six units in the whole building.
B: Where's the checkbook? I'm ready to rent it without even seeing it.
A: Did you call the manager?
B: Yes. He said he'd come over tomorrow.
A: Did he say what time?
B: Yes. He said he'd be here at 9 o'clock.
A: Did he understand what the problem is?
B: Yes. I told him our doorbell doesn't work.
A: It shouldn't take him long to fix it.
B: I don't even know why we need to fix it.
A: In case we have visitors.
B: But they can just knock on the door.
A: Actually, I want him to look at our carpet, too.
B: Yes, it would be nice if he'd give us a new carpet.
A: Do you like this house?
B: Yes, it's beautiful.
A: It's perfect for us and the kids.
B: Three bedrooms, three bathrooms, and a big back yard.
A: And we can afford it!
B: So are we going to buy it?
A: I'm afraid not.
B: It's too far from your job, isn't it?
A: I can't spend four hours on the road every day.
B: By the time you get home, you'll be too tired to even eat.
A: I won't be able to play with the kids.
B: No, we have to find something closer to your job.
A: Boy, it's chilly outside, isn't it?
B: It sure is.
A: In fact, it's chilly in the apartment, too.
B: Let's turn on the heat.
A: I'll check to make sure that all the windows are shut.
B: It should be warmer in a few minutes.
A: It's so nice to have a heated apartment.
B: How did they survive in the old days?
A: They had fireplaces.
B: Someone had to chop the wood.
A: And carry it into the house.
B: All we have to do is flip a switch.
A: This is a nice neighborhood.
B: The streets are clean and quiet.
A: The neighbors don't party on the weekends.
B: People take care of their lawns.
A: No rusty old cars are sitting in the front yards.
B: We never have to call the police about anything.
A: Our kids are completely safe.
B: So why are we selling our house?
A: They're building a 3 story apartment building on the corner.
B: So we've got to sell before property values go down?
A: Yes. I still can't believe our city council allowed this building.
B: They're probably getting something under the table.
A: That was a huge fire in Santa Barbara.
B: Yes, it was.
A: They said about 30 houses burned to the ground.
B: And they were expensive houses.
A: I feel so sorry for those people.
B: Why feel sorry for rich people?
A: I feel sorry for anyone who loses their home.
B: So do I, but not if they're rich.
A: What does that have to do with it?
B: Rich people think they're better than us.
A: How many rich people do you know?
B: None.
A: Bears are invading our neighborhoods.
B: Of course they are. They're starving to death.
A: They should stay in the woods where they belong.
B: There's no food in the woods.
A: Can't they eat grass?
B: Do you think a bear is a cow?
A: Well, I've seen them eating berries.
B: Berries aren't in season all year round.
A: It's too dangerous for kids and pets.
B: People need to cover their trash cans.
A: The police need to shoot all the bears.
B: You don't solve a problem by shooting it.
A: Who did you vote for?
B: I voted for Obama.
A: Me too.
B: He will be a great president.
A: Everyone likes him.
B: He's a good speaker.
A: And he's really smart.
B: He will solve our problems.
A: He will end the war.
B: The next four years will be good years.
A: I'll vote for him next time, too.
B: I think everyone will.
A: The election is next week.
B: Who are you voting for?
A: I'm not voting for the mayor.
B: Why not?
A: He made promises that he didn't keep.
B: Like what?
A: He promised to hire 1,000 more police officers.
B: How many did he hire?
A: One hundred!
B: Maybe he had a good reason.
A: Maybe he's just a liar.
B: Maybe I'll vote for someone else, too.
A: I can't believe he won the election.
B: Only 15 percent of the voters turned out.
A: That is a joke.
B: Voting is so important, but people don't bother.
A: Many people think their vote doesn't matter.
B: The mayor won by only 2,000 votes.
A: We're stuck with him for four more years.
B: Voting is so easy. You can even mail your ballot in.
A: All you have to do is vote and put a stamp on it.
B: How easy is that?
A: I guess people just don't care.
B: They'll care when they see their taxes go up.
A: Well, we have a new president.
B: But we have the same old problems.
A: Well, he's made a few changes.
B: Like what?
A: I think he closed the bowling alley in the White House.
B: Oh, yeah. He's changing it to a basketball court.
A: Who's paying for that?
B: I think we are!
A: Well, that's okay, as long as it helps him relax and think more clearly.
B: Yes, we need a relaxed president who thinks clearly.
A: Do any other world leaders have a basketball court?
B: They will. You know America always leads the way.
A: People say that everybody loves Obama.
B: Well, more than 50 million people voted for McCain.
A: That's 50 million people who don't love Obama.
B: Obama's got four years to make everyone happy.
A: He's never going to make everyone happy.
B: Can you imagine being President?
A: Everyone wants you to solve their problems.
B: I have enough stress from trying to solve my own problems.
A: You and everybody else.
B: I would never want to be President.
A: But think about all the power you'd have.
B: I prefer my quiet little life to all the power in the world.
A: Did you read this article?
B: What article?
A: It says the mayor spends only 11 percent of his time on city duties.
B: Only 11 percent?
A: About 50 percent of the time he's traveling.
B: Where does he travel to?
A: Oh, all over the world.
B: But he's supposed to be making our city a better place.
A: He's visiting other cities to get ideas.
B: Can't he just go online?
A: The rest of the time he's raising money for his reelection.
B: Well, he'll never get reelected once this news gets out.
A: Who did you vote for for president?
B: I voted for Ralph Nader.
A: Who in the world is Ralph Nader?
B: He's the best man for president.
A: Why's that?
B: He hates corporations.
A: Well, most corporations do think only about money.
B: He hates Democrats and Republicans.
A: Well, they do put their party before their country.
B: He's the only candidate that I trust.
A: But he didn't have a chance. Nobody voted for him!
B: Sooner or later, voters will wake up.
A: I don't know why I bother to vote.
B: Why's that?
A: What good does it do?
B: You get to put someone in power that you like.
A: Only if my candidate wins.
B: Well, he can't win unless you and others vote for him.
A: But even if my candidate wins, he'll break his promises.
B: That's true. They promise anything just so they get elected.
A: And when elected, they go their own way.
B: They forget who put them in power.
A: They forget where they came from.
B: Maybe you should run for office.
A: That election for U.S. Senator stunk.
B: What do you mean?
A: There were more votes than voters!
B: But that's impossible.
A: Officials said that it's possible.
B: Did they explain how it's possible?
A: No. They said there are some things you can't explain.
B: So are they going to hold another election?
A: No. That will cost too much money.
B: So it's better to save money than to have an honest election?
A: Well, the Democratic Party says it was an honest election.
B: Of course they say that—their man won!
A: I see that former President Bush is at a conference.
B: Yes. He's telling jokes about his eight years as president.
A: Yes, those eight years were a lot of fun for everyone.
B: Only 4,000 American soldiers were killed overseas.
A: Not to mention 40,000 wounded soldiers.
B: But Bush visited some of them in the hospital once.
A: That's nice that he found the time to make a visit.
B: He spoke to them and made them feel better.
A: Did he speak to every family that lost a soldier?
B: No, he didn't have time to do that.
A: Well, he's got plenty of time now!
B: No, he's too busy writing a book about how hard it was to be president.
A: Did you get your Official Sample Ballot?
B: Yes, with the Voter Instructions.
A: How are you going to vote?
B: Same as ever, by mail. All it costs me is a 42-cent stamp.
A: I meant, are you going to vote for or against the new taxes?
B: Against all of them, of course.
A: But we need new taxes to pay for highways, schools, and prisons.
B: We've already voted for new taxes to pay for all that stuff!
A: That's true. Where did that money go?
B: Our legislators spent it on first-class travel all over the world.
A: They are having a good time with our money.
B: So when are we going to stop giving them more?
A: Have you decided how you are going to vote?
B: Do you mean on Measures 1, 2, and 3?
A: Yes. The ones that will improve our schools, roads, and hospitals.
B: You mean the measures that will raise our taxes.
A: But the TV ads say that our taxes will not increase.
B: Do you believe the TV ads?
A: I like the one where the fireman tells us why we should vote Yes.
B: Don't believe him! Whatever the TV ads tell you, the opposite is true.
A: But the title of Measure 1 is Better Schools at No Cost.
B: The title should be Better Schools at Huge Cost.
A: I can't believe that they would lie to us.
B: Of course they lie—that's what politicians do!
A: I have a stomachache.
B: Is it something you ate?
A: Maybe. I'm not sure.
B: What did you have for breakfast?
A: The usual, cereal with milk and a banana.
B: Maybe the milk was bad.
A: It didn't smell bad.
B: Maybe the banana was bad.
A: No, the banana was delicious.
B: Maybe you just need to go to the bathroom.
A: No, that's not the problem.
B: Maybe it will go away in a little while.
A: What's this stain?
B: I don't know.
A: It looks like blood.
B: I think my nose was bleeding.
A: You should wet your shirt immediately.
B: Why?
A: Because that gets the blood out of the shirt.
B: What's a little blood?
A: Your white shirt is ruined.
B: So, I'll just buy another one.
A: You can wear this one around the house.
B: Next time I'll soak it immediately.
A: My fingers hurt.
B: Why do they hurt?
A: I type too much.
B: You should take a break.
A: I need to type to make money.
B: But typing is causing you pain.
A: Maybe I should see a doctor.
B: Doctors are too expensive.
A: He might tell me to rest for a while.
B: He might want to cut you open.
A: He might say I'm okay.
B: He might say you have bone cancer.
A: What did the doctor say?
B: He thinks I have too much stress.
A: Stress causes your stomachaches?
B: Stress causes different problems with different people.
A: So what did he tell you to do?
B: He said I need to think positive.
A: He didn't give you any medication?
B: I hate medication. It makes me feel different.
A: So how do you think positive?
B: I think about nice things.
A: Like what?
B: Like a day at the beach, with my toes in the sand.
A: I cut my finger.
B: How did you do that?
A: It's a paper cut.
B: Paper can be dangerous.
A: It hurts, too.
B: Paper cuts can hurt a lot.
A: Where are the band-aids?
B: I think they're in the medicine cabinet.
A: It's on the tip of my finger.
B: A band-aid might not work.
A: I must not use this finger until the cut heals.
B: It might take a day or two to heal.
A: Do you smell that?
B: Oh, yes.
A: I can't stand cigarette smoke.
B: It smells so bad.
A: One cigarette stinks up the whole sidewalk.
B: Smokers think they are so cool.
A: They are so weak.
B: A little cigarette controls them.
A: They look so stupid taking a puff.
B: And then they blow smoke out of their mouth.
A: They think it's cool.
B: Cigarettes stink.
A: Do you have a cold?
B: Yes, I do.
A: How did you get it?
B: My sister had a cold. She gave it to me.
A: Have you taken anything for your cold?
B: No, I just blow my nose a lot.
A: Your nose is stopped up?
B: Yes. I have to breathe through my mouth.
A: Have you tried nose drops?
B: No, I don't like nose drops.
A: They work great.
B: I don't care. I don't like to put drops in my nose.
A: Would you put suntan lotion on my back, please?
B: Sure.
A: Thank you.
B: You shouldn't lie in the sun for too long.
A: I want to get a tan. I don't want to look so pale.
B: What's wrong with looking pale?
A: People think you might be sick.
B: Who thinks that?
A: I don't know.
B: It's better to be pale than to have skin cancer.
A: I know that.
B: So why are you arguing with me? Don't lie in the sun too long!
A: I can't quit smoking.
B: Of course you can.
A: I don't have enough will power.
B: Of course you do.
A: I wish I had never started.
B: So does every smoker.
A: I've tried to quit so many times.
B: So has everyone else.
A: Nothing seems to work.
B: All it takes is will power, and you have it.
A: Then why can't I quit?
B: You have to believe in yourself.
A: My back is killing me.
B: What did you do?
A: I got out of my car.
B: That's it?
A: I injured my back one time just by sneezing.
B: You should see a doctor.
A: My doctor said I need surgery.
B: So?
A: So, forget it.
B: You don't have the money?
A: I have no insurance.
B: Maybe a back rub would help.
A: My brother smokes three packs a day.
B: Three packs of what?
A: Cigarettes, of course.
B: How can he do that?
A: When he is almost finished with one cigarette, he uses it to light another.
B: He's a chain smoker.
A: He's been a chain smoker for 30 years.
B: That's unbelievable. Can he still breathe?
A: He can, but the people around him can't.
B: How can he still be alive?
A: His doctor says his heart and lungs are strong and healthy.
B: Maybe I should start smoking.
A: I hate brushing my teeth.
B: It's such a chore.
A: Brush, brush. Spit, spit.
B: What did they do in the old days?
A: They brushed with their fingers.
B: They also ate with their fingers!
A: Why do they call it the good old days?
B: Maybe because they didn't have to brush and floss.
A: Who invented flossing?
B: A dentist, I'm sure.
A: I hate flossing more than brushing!
B: I can't wait till all my teeth fall out.
A: Let's stop for a while. I need a break and some water.
B: This trail is hard to climb.
A: Especially on a hot day like this.
B: I can't believe we haven't seen any animals.
A: Thank goodness! I don't want to see any wild animals.
B: All we've seen so far is a couple of lizards.
A: We're hiking to lose weight, not to see goats and bears.
B: I bet I've lost a couple of pounds already.
A: All you've lost is some sweat.
B: I haven't even lost one pound of fat?
A: If you want to lose fat, you've got to do this hike every day.
B: Okay, but let's hike in town. At least there are cats and dogs to see.
A: Oh no, another pimple on my face.
B: Pimples suck.
A: It seems like I get a new pimple almost every day.
B: Maybe it's something in your diet.
A: No, I eat the same things day after day.
B: Then maybe it's in your genes.
A: You might be right.
B: Do pimples run in your family?
A: Not that I've noticed.
B: Well, maybe it's from the pollution in the air.
A: Whatever the cause, I hate seeing them on my face.
B: Well, on the bright side, they're fun to pop.
A: Do you believe everything you hear?
B: I don't believe anything I don't see with my own eyes.
A: You can't believe what you hear on TV or radio.
B: You can't believe what you read in the newspapers.
A: Everyone tells you a different story about the same thing.
B: Three different people will give you three different stories.
A: And the government will give you a fourth story.
B: Yes, like the government says not to worry about the swine flu.
A: But the swine flu just killed 20 people in Mexico.
B: The government says we have nothing to worry about.
A: Then why are some schools telling the kids to stay home?
B: The government says to wash our hands frequently, and we'll all be okay.
A: Don't pick your nose.
B: I wasn't picking my nose.
A: What were you doing?
B: I was scratching my nose.
A: I think I know the difference between picking and scratching.
B: Okay, mom, maybe I was picking it a little bit.
A: Use a tissue next time.
B: I didn't have a tissue.
A: Then wait till you find a tissue.
B: I couldn't wait. It was an emergency.
A: Oh, really? Maybe you should have called 911.
B: It wasn't that kind of emergency.
A: Our TV remote is filthy.
B: Yes, it's covered with crud.
A: I'm going to clean it.
B: Don't use water on it!
A: I'll use a damp cloth.
B: Don't let water get into any of the cracks.
A: I'll squeeze the cloth so it's almost dry.
B: Don't rub the numbers off the remote.
A: I will rub gently but firmly.
B: Do it quickly, please, so I can change channels during commercials.
A: I'll give it back to you in a couple of minutes.
B: Maybe we should put it in a plastic bag to keep it clean.
A: My ear is killing me.
B: What's the matter?
A: I was on a plane.
B: So?
A: So, every time the plane goes up, my ear starts to hurt.
B: That's no good.
A: Sometimes the pain goes away, and sometimes it doesn't.
B: Have you seen a doctor?
A: I've been to two doctors.
B: And they couldn't fix your problem?
A: They both said I have to live with it.
B: Or you can stay off planes.
A: Did you see the woman with the new face?
B: Did she get a nice job?
A: She got an "everything" job!
B: What do you mean?
A: A team of doctors gave her a whole new face.
B: Why did they do that?
A: A mad dog bit most of her face off.
B: Oh, that's terrible. What does she look like now?
A: Her face is really fat, but they say the swelling will go down.
B: And then will she look normal again?
A: I guess so.
B: God bless modern medicine.
A: There's something wrong with my right hand.
B: What's wrong with it?
A: It aches most of the time.
B: What do you think it is?
A: I don't know. I think it's old age.
B: If it's old age, why don't both of your hands hurt?
A: That's a good question. Maybe it's not old age.
B: Are you right-handed?
A: Yes. All my life.
B: You're wearing out your right hand. Stop using it so much.
A: But I do all my writing with my right hand.
B: Start typing instead. That way your left hand will do half the work.	
Hello, Tom speaking.
Hi Tom, this is Mary. Is your brother in?
No, he’s at the cinema. Can I take a message?
Yes, could you tell him to call me back, please?
Sure.
Thanks. Bye.
Bye.	
Good morning. Robert Smith speaking.
Good morning. This is Gerhard Maier. I would like to speak to Mr. Brown.
Oh, sorry. Mr. Brown is not here, yet.
Can you tell me when he will be in?
Probably around 4 pm.
Alright, I will call again later then. Thank you.
You’re welcome. Bye.
Bye.	
Who is speaking, please?
Who would you like to speak to?
What number did you dial?
Oh sorry, I think I’ve dialled the wrong number.
Can I speak to the assistant, please?
In which class are you studying?
I am in Eighth Standard. What about you?
I am in Ninth Standard.
Do you come to school by bus?
I travel by bus. I have to catch Route No. 24 bus.
It has passed on just 15 minutes before.
There is another bus at 4.45 p.m.
Who is he leaning on the iron pole?
He is a beggar. He is a trouble to the passengers.
He seems to be blind.
We must help the blind people. 
why are you late today?
I came on foot. I have an injury in my leg.
Yesterday also you came late.
We were held up in traffic jam. I will not excuse you hereafter.
How many marks did you score?
I scored 6 sir.
Then you are careless in learning it.
I shall try to improve, Sir.
Good morning Sir. My friend has given a leave letter.
Why is he on leave?
He is celebrating his Birthday in his house.
Why did you not attend the function?
I will meet him this evening.
Have you purchased any gift for him?
Yes Sir. I have purchased a story book for him.
What is the cost of the book?
The cost of the book is $ 24.
Will your parents go with you?
Yes Sir.
Do you know how to operate?
I am learning.
When did you start training?
Only two days back Sir.
Be confident. Don't be shy. Can you see the programme?
Yes Sir. It is well planned.
There is your friend. Look at him.
He is also having training only from yesterday.
How much time will you take?
I will take only 30 minutes, Sir.
We will go round all the computer classes today .
Yes Sir. We are happy to meet him.
Why are you slow in eating?
I am not well. I am suffering from cold.
Did you tell me yesterday?
I forgot to tell you.
After meals go to the medical shop and get some table.
He told me and I forget to tell you.
Apply for leave today.
No. My teacher will not permit me. I must go to school.
Go to the medical shop and then go to school.
Yes Father. I will do so.
When did you arrive at the station?
I came here at 5 pm.
Which train are you waiting for?
I am waiting for the first Express.
What is the time of departure?
5 hrs.
Have you reserved?
I have reserved two tickets for me and my brother.
We are going to our grandfather house.
Where does you grandfather reside?
He resides at the next street.
Come on. Bring your camera to take a snap of the tall building there.
What is that Sir?
It is the hotel where we stay.
What is the name of the lodge?
It is a Palace.
Shall we go round the famous lake here?
Yes. We shall go and have a ride in the boat.
What are they doing?
They are playing and running.
The driver is not there. Where has he gone?
He has gone to the hotel for tea.
Look at the birds. They are beautiful.
There is a parrot above my head. It is very nice.
Oh! There you can see them.
There is the owl and a bird that I don't know.
We can see the eagle also.
Who are standing near the bird?
A boy and a girl are standing near the bird.
What are they doing?
They are admiring the beauty of the birds.
We had a nice time today in the park.
Have you taken bath?
I have finished. Why don't you go?
I am ready. But I am waiting for the three persons bathing there.
They will return only after half an hour.
I am following my friends to take bath.
Whose boots are they?
They are mine. I will take them after my return from bath.
Where is our bus waiting for us?
Our bus is near the entrance of the school.
When will we start our return journey?
We will start at 12 pm.
What is that building?
It is a Church.
How do you know that it is a Church?
Can't you see the cross on the top of the tower?
Yes. I understand. When will the prayer begin?
It will begin at 10 am.
Shall we enter the church? Will they permit us?
They will permit us if we like to go in.
Will there be service on all days?
It will be on Sundays and on the days of Christian festivals.
what do you want?
I want to send money to my brother.
Where is the money order form?
Here it is.
How much do you want to send to your brother?
one hundred only.
Where is your brother studying?
He is studying in US.
Sir, what is the money order commission?
Five dollars.
When will the money order reach him?
Your brother will get the money tomorrow. Don't worry.
What do you want?
I want reservation of two tickets.
Give me the filled reservation form.
Here it is.
There is no seat available.
Is there any chance available in the Express?
Yes. There are two seats available in the Express.
What is the fare please?
The fare is 5.
What is the time of departure?
The time of departure is 9 pm.
Thank You Sir. 
What do you want?
I want to apply for loan.
Where are you studying now?
I am studying in Government Engineering College.
What branch have you chosen?
I have chosen Mechanical branch.
I need a loan of five thousands for my professional studies.
What is your father?
My father is an Inspector of police.
I will sanction a loan of four thousands only. It is the limit.
Shall I bring my father tomorrow?
Yes. Meet me tomorrow morning with your father.
Good morning Sir. May I help you?
Good morning. I need a room.
Do you require a single or double room or a suite?
Well! A single room will do.
Please fill your name in this register.
May I know the tariff please?
It's nine hundred rupees a day.
Does it include breakfast?
No sir. It's just for the accommodation sir.
Is the room air conditioned?
All our rooms are centrally air conditioned.
Do you have a restaurant?
Not one. We have three. We offer different restaurants.
Well! That's good news. I can choose different cuisine for different meals.
May I know the duration of your stay?
Oh! I haven't filled that column because I haven't decided on my period of stay yet. It all depends on how early or how late I am going to finish my work. But, tentatively, I shall write it as four days.
That'll do. Please inform us about your extension one day earlier.
Sure. By the way, do you have laundry facility here?
Yes. Please call up the housekeeping department and they will have the clothes picked up.
How do I get the extension phone numbers for all the departments?
All the house phone numbers are in a list kept near the telephone.
Oh! That will do. Thank you. You have been very helpful.
My pleasure! I am here to help you.
Thanks. Well I am rather tired. Can you please ask the bellboy to bring my luggage to the room?
Certainly. Here's your key.
Thank you very much.
You're welcome.
Have you been waiting for long?
Hi! I just arrived a few minutes ago. John is supposed to join us. Isn’t he?
Yes. He is. Oh! There he is!
Hey Guys! Nice to see you both. Hope I am not late!
Oh! You are just in time. Sit down and relax. Shall we order some drinks?
That'd be fine.
Fine. Now tell me what's the occasion for this sudden invitation to dinner?
Friends it’s my birthday.
Happy birthday to you dear! Happy birthday to you! What a pleasant surprise!
Come on guys! It's just a pretext to meet you! You know well that we are grown up enough not to celebrate birthdays!
Well! Whatever! It's 'a good thought. Once again, many happy returns of the day!
That's right. Especially when we are so far away from home and families.
Yes. I got a bit nostalgic remembering how my dad and mom, sister and brother used to make a lot of fuss on my birthday!
I understand. I too felt the same on my birthday last month. Most probably all three of us are on our own for our birthdays for the first time.
Well! Mine is fast approaching. It is next month. Now I know what to do on my birthday.
Great! So we have another invitation corning next month!
What to do? We have grown into men and moved out of home in search of professional prospects and we have to make the best of the situation.
That's right.
Well! I think we should place our orders now.
Could I have the order sir?
Oh! Sure! For me it's one chicken fried and rice.
How about some soup sir?
No. Not for me.
How about the dessert, sir? You can also order later.
That'd do for now. Let's order dessert after we eat all this. Tell me how long will you take to serve?
In a few minutes sir. We won't keep you waiting.
Very good!
That was a splendid dinner. Doubly so, because, we shared it on your birthday.
Yes. Especially when we are so far away from home.
I am so happy you both shared the dinner with me today. Thanks a ton folks!
Actually we should be thanking you. By the way, you know now how to spend your birthday. Don’t you?
Oh! Sure! But we will choose another restaurant. Not that anything is wrong with this place.
That's right. This is good. Still we will choose another so that we will get to eat at other places too.
That's a good idea! So let's keep in touch.
Certainly. Bye for now.
Good night. Take care. See you.
Bye. Bye.
Bye. Bye.
Good morning Sir.
Good morning. Please sit down, I am John, the CEO of this company.
So glad to meet you Sir.
Good to meet you too. Your CV is very impressive. You have done well in your academics!
Thank you very much Sir.
Well! Bright students like you generally proceed to foreign universities for higher studies. How come you didn't opt for it?
First of all, my parents couldn't afford it. Secondly, I believe the local institutions offer quality education and it depends on the students.
Well! I felt a technical degree along with Master in marketing would help me move upwards in my career.
That is good thinking! Certainly that's why you are here for this interview.
Thank you very much Sir. Well! May I know how long the training will be?
Training will be for six months. Trainees will be shifted to the regional offices.
Is there any exam to be passed at the end of the training sir?
No. No exam as such. But you will be assessed for your performance through the entire training period.
Sir, when will I get to know the result of this interview?
Say, within two weeks. You see, we have scheduled a number of interviews for this week. Best of luck!
Thank you very much Sir. You're very kind.
You're welcome!
Good morning, sir, May I help you?
Good morning. I am looking for some books on English language teaching and I would like to enroll as a member too.
Oh! Sure. We have plenty of material on English language teaching. You can surely enrol as a member.
Oh! That's splendid! Where can I find them?
Please go to the middle section and there is a full section to your right.
Oh! There is quite a stock. Now, may I know the rules for enrolment?
Well. You need to fill in this application form and you have to be introduced by a member of this library.
Oh! That'll be Fine. By the way, what is the membership fee?
It is five hundred annually.
How many books can I take at one time?
You can take three books and two journals at one time.
How long can I keep them?
Two weeks are the limit.
That's okay. Do you have a catalogue?
No. You can check the titles and authors in the computer.
Oh! That's fine. Tell me, do you have any other facility?
Yes. We have a section where you can also watch videos.
Very good! Are you open on Sundays?
No. We are open from Monday to Saturday.
That suits me fine. I will come tomorrow with the filled in application. Thank you very much. You have been a great help.
You are most welcome. Good day! 
Good afternoon, how are you today?
Good afternoon, I am doing well. And you?
I’m great, thank you. This is my best friend John. He would like to ask you a few questions.
Hello, John! It’s a nice to meet you. I am very busy today. Can you come to my office tomorrow morning?
Yes, that will be no problem. Thank you for making time for me and speaking to me today.
See you tomorrow!
Well, hello there! Wow it is a long time no see! It is great to see you again.
Hello! What a coincidence! I haven not seen you in ages! It is great to see you. What are you doing here?
I just got a new job here, so I am shopping for some new clothes. Hey, what do you think of this skirt? 
well, you remember how much I love black. See? I have got the same skirt as you!
You have always had great taste in clothes! Well this is a small world.
We must keep in touch. You still have my mobile number?
No. I lost my phone here is my new number.
OK. I will save your number.
I have got to go back to work, give us a ring so we can arrange dinner sometime.
For sure, take care bye.
How’s Mary doing? I haven’t seen her for ages.
Oh, she’s fine. She just got a job with the government.
That’s great news. We should get together one of these days. My wife would love to see you both, too.
Sure. That’d be great.
It’s really cold outside! I thought this cold front was supposed to finish last night.
Yes, I thought so too. That’s what I saw on the weather report on TV last night. They never get the weather right.
I suppose the wind chill is really bringing down the temperature down making it cooler than it is.
Do you mind if we go inside? I feel like my toes are starting to go numb. I will make us both some warm coffee.
That sounds great. Do you have any cookies?
For sure. I brought a packet this morning.
I will also make a log fire.
That sounds wonderful. I like log fires they are so beautiful.
OK let’s get inside and get warm.
What time is it? We are going to be late for the party!
It’s six. We are on time. Don’t worry we will be fine.
But I thought we had to be at her house by 6 for her surprise birthday party.
Sure we will. We are not far away now. Can you phone her husband?
I will phone him now.
Thank you!
What do you do for a living?
I am sorry, I don’t understand the question.
What is your occupation?
I'm a mechanic; I work in a garage.
A mechanic? You must do a lot of work and get very dirty.
yes I do lots of work. Every day I fix cars and it takes a long time to get clean after work.
That is really interesting. How many cars do you think you fix in a day?
On average I probably fix about seven cars every day I do get tired.
What, sort of job do you have?
I don’t have a job at the moment.
why?
I’m at college.
Thanks for the chat I have to get back to work now.
yes, thanks also.
Excuse me, am sorry to trouble you, but could you tell me how I can get to the train station?
Yes no problem, it's that way. Keeping walking straight ahead then after you pass the library you have to turn left. You cannot miss it!
Thank you so much! I have only been in this city for a few days, so I don't know how to get anywhere yet.
Oh, I know that feeling. Me and my husband moved here a 6 months ago, and I still don't know how to find certain places!
So just to double check Keep walking straight ahead till I pass the library. Is that correct?
Yes, that is correct.
Well thanks for helping me. I must go and catch my train, hopefully I haven't miss it!
OK, bye.
bye.
Oh my god! That car just hit another car!
Can you see if anyone is hurt?
It looks like a woman is hurt.
An ambulance will be there in 5 minutes
Good, I hope the woman is OK she looks to be moving with no problems.
Yes, I hope so too. You have to be very careful at all times when you’re driving.
Good morning, what can I do for you today?
Good morning. I have to send this letter to US, please.
OK, You also have the option of using international signed for.
What is that? 
Same as airmail, but the person in US has to sign for it when the post man delivers it to them.
How much does that cost?
An extra five dollars.
It's OK. Oh, I nearly forgot. I need to buy 2 stamps.
OK, that will be 7 dollars.
It's OK.
My name is Tom. What’s yours?
B: I’m Mary.
A: Hi, Mary. What level are you in?
B: I’m in Level Three. And you?
A: I’m in Level 3, too. So this is the right classroom.
B: Do you work, Tom?
A: Yes, I do. I go to work after class.
B: What kind of work do you do?
A: I’m a baker. I work until 7:00 pm.
B: That’s interesting.
A: Yes, it is. I bake bread and cookies.
B: I’m a baby sitter. I go to work after class too.
A: What days do you work?
B: I work every day except Wednesday. And you?
A: I work every day except weekends.
B: Where do you live?
A: I live in San Francisco. And you?
B: I don’t live in San Francisco, I live in Daly City.
A: Are you married?
B: Yes, I am. My husband works as a janitor.
A: Does he study English too?
B: Yes, he does. He studies at night. How about you?
A: I’m single, but I have a girlfriend.
B: I met my husband eight years ago.
A: Do you have any brothers or sisters?
B: Yes, I do. I come from a large family.
A: Really? How many brothers or sisters do you have?
B: I have four brothers and three sisters.
A: What country are you from.
B: Originally, I’m from Guatemala. But we moved to Mexico three years ago.
A: Do any of your brothers or sisters live here?
B: Yes, two brothers and one sister live in San Francisco.
A: Does your sister attend City College too?
B: Yes, she does. She studies music. She’s in Level One. She’s married. Do you come from Mexico?
A: No, I don’t. I’m from Nicaragua.
B: How many children do you have?
A: I have two children, a boy and a girl.
B: How old are they?
A: My son is five and my daughter is seven.
B: Does your son go to school?
A: Yes, he does. He’s in kindergarten. My daughter is in second grade.
B: Do your children like school?
A: They like school very much, but they’re happy after school, too.
B: What do they do after school?
A: They always play in the playground.
B: My sister has three kids. They all go to school.
A: Does she work?
B: Yes, she does. But her schedule is flexible. She works part time.
A: You go to school every day and you also work.
B: Yes, and I also take care of my children.
A: You are a very busy person.
B: So are you. You go to school every day and you work.
A: That’s okay. I like to study.
B: What do you do in your free time?
A: I like to visit my brothers and sisters and listen to music.
A: I like to read good novels and poems.
B: Where do you find books to read?
A: I go to the Mission Branch Library.
B: Where is that library?
A: It’s at the corner of 24th and Bartlett.
B: It’s just two blocks from here.
A: The summertime is cold in San Francisco.
B: I agree. It is different from my country.
A: It’s always very cold in the morning.
B: It’s foggy outside now.
A: Yes. I wear my jacket every morning.
B: I sometimes wear a sweater when it’s cold.
A: My name is Thelma. What’s yours?
B: I’m Robert, but my friends call me Bob.
A: Hi, Bob. What book is that?
B: This is Side by Side Book Two.
A: Is it the book for this Level Three Class?
B: Yes, it is. It isn’t too expensive. It’s a good book.
A: Do you go to work after class?
B: No, I don’t, but I need a job. I ‘m a painter.
A: I’m a sales clerk. I work until 5:00 pm.
B: That’s interesting. Do you have a lot of customers?
A: Yes, we do. We have a lot of good clothing.
B: I want a part time job. I want to learn more English.
A: What days do you work?
B: I work three days a week. It’s a part time job.
A: My brother is a cook. He has a pretty good job.
B: Where does he work?
A: He works downtown. His restaurant is on Market Street
B: I never go downtown. I work in Daly City.
A: Are you married?
B: Yes, I am. My wife works as a waitress.
A: Does she study English too?
B: Yes, she does. She goes to night class.
A: Do you have any children?
B: We have one son. We want another child.
A: Do you have any brothers or sisters?
B: Yes, I do. I come from a large family.
A: Really? How many brothers or sisters do you have?
B: I have two brothers and eight sisters.
A: Wow. You certainly have a large family.
B: Most of them are here in the U.S. They live in different parts of the country.
A: Do any of your sisters live in San Francisco?
B: Yes, my sister Sylvia lives here. She studies at City College.
A: Does she speak English?
B: Yes, she does. She speaks English very well.
A: Does she speak any other languages?
B: She speaks a little French too. She took a French class last year.
A: She’s married and has two daughters.
B: How old are they?
A: They are twelve and thirteen.
B: Do they go to school?
A: Yes. They both go to Horace Mann Middle School.
B: Do her children like school?
A: They like school very much. They have excellent teachers.
B: What do they usually do on weekends?
A: They like to visit their uncle. He has a big TV.
B: My sister has three kids. They don’t go to school. They’re too young..
A: Does she work?
B: What do you mean? She has three kids. She’s a full time mother.
A: How far do you live from this campus?
B: I live about two miles from here. I have to take the bus. How about you?
A: I only live a few blocks from Mission Campus. I usually walk unless it rains.
B: The bus is slow. Sometimes I wait a long time.
A: My friend Jose drives to school.
B: That’s convenient.
A: Not always. It’s difficult to find a parking space.
A: I try to eat well and get exercise.
B: You look healthy.
A: I walk a lot, and I also ride my bicycle when I can.
B: I try to exercise, but I don’t always have time.
A: A little exercise is good for you.
B: I enjoy swimming and playing tennis.
A: Does this class meet Monday to Friday?
B: Yes, it does. This is a morning class. The afternoon classes don’t meet on Friday.
A: Do the evening classes meet on Friday?
B: No, they don’t. They only meet Monday to Thursday nights.
A: My husband works in the morning. He needs an evening class.
A: Where is Mike?
B: He’s at home.
A: What’s he doing?
B: He’s studying.
A: What’s he studying?
B: He’s studying English.
A: Where are Tom and Mary?
B: They’re at school.
A: What are they doing?
B: They’re studying English.
A: When is their class?
B: It’s at 10:30.
A: Where are you going?
B: I’m going to the supermarket.
A: What are you buying?
B: I’m buying some groceries.
A: When are you coming back?
B: I’m coming back at 2 o’clock.
A: Where’s Pedro?
B: He’s .
A: What does he do?
B: He’s a carpenter.
A: When does he work?
B: He works from 9 o’clock to 5 o’clock.
A: How many children do you have?
B: I have two children.
A: How old are they?
B: My son is 6. My daughter is 3.
A: Does your son go to school?
B: Yes, he does. He’s in the first grade.
A: Does your daughter go to school?
B: No, she doesn’t.
A: Where is your daughter now?
B: She’s at home.
A: What’s she doing?
B: She’s playing with her dolls.
A: Where’s your son?
B: He’s at school.
A: What’s he doing?
B: He’s studying Math.
A: Does he like school?
B: Yes, he does. He likes it a lot.
A: How many brothers and sisters do you have?
B: I have two brothers and one sister.
A: What do they do?
B: They’re students.
A: Are they in school now?
B: Yes, they are. They’re in high school.
A: Where are Kathy and Bill?
B: They’re at work.
A: What do they do?
B: They’re police officers.
A: When do they work?
B: They work from 6 AM to 4 PM.
A: How many students do we have?
B: We have thirty six students.
A: What room are we in?
B: We’re in room.
A: What are we doing?
B: We’re listening to tapes.
A: Is Mike at home?
B: No, he isn’t. He’s at school.
A: Is he studying English?
B: No, he isn’t. He’s studying computers.
A: Where is he going after class?
B: He’s going to work.
A: Are Tom and Mary at school?
B: No, they aren’t. They’re at home.
A: Are they studying English?
B: No, they aren’t. They’re painting their living room.
A: What color are they painting it?
B: They’re painting it green.
A: Are you going to the supermarket?
B: No, I’m not. I’m going to the bank.
A: Are you going to the drugstore, too?
B: No, I’m not. I’m only going to the bank.
A: Are you coming back at 2 o’clock?
B: No, I’m not. I’m coming back at 3 o’clock.
A: Is Maria going to the laundromat?
B: No, she isn’t. She’s going to the supermarket.
A: Is she going to the park, too?
B: No, she isn’t. She’s only going to the supermarket.
A: Is she coming back at 1 o’clock?
B: No, she isn’t. She’s coming back at 2 o’clock.
A: Are Tom and Mary going to the parking lot?
B: Yes, they are. They need their car.
A: Where are they going?
B: They’re going to the restaurant.
A: Are they going to the movies, too?
B: No, they aren’t. They’re only going to the restaurant.
A: Is Mary in Room 2?
B: No, she isn’t. She’s in Room 3.
A: Is she writing the homework?
B: No, she isn’t. She’s listening to a tape.
A: Is she going to work now?
B: No, she isn’t. She’s going to work after class.
A: Is Jeff a janitor?
B: No, he isn’t. He’s a security guard.
A: Is he at work now?
B: No, he isn’t. He’s at home.
A: Is he cleaning his house?
B: No, he isn’t. He’s reading the newspaper.
A: Are your children in school?
B: No, they aren’t. It’s a holiday.
A: Where are they?
B: They’re in the park.
A: What are they doing?
B: They’re playing baseball.
A: Are they playing soccer, too?
B: No, they aren’t. They’re only playing baseball.
A: Are Peter and Olga at home?
B: Yes, they are, but they’re busy right now.
A: What are they doing?
B: They’re working in the yard.
A: That’s a good idea. It’s a nice day.
B: They are raking leaves and cutting the grass.
A: Is your daughter at school?
B: No, she isn’t. She’s at the bank.
A: Why isn’t she at school? Isn’t she a student?
B: No, she isn’t. She has a job at the bank.
A: Your daughter works at the bank. Is she a teller?
B: Yes, she is. She’s going to college next year.
A: Where are you going?
B: I’m going to the drugstore.
A: Why are you going there?
B: I need some medicine.
A: When are you coming back?
B: Around 2.
A: Where is Jose going?
B: He’s going to visit his friend.
A: Where does his friend live?
B: On Valencia Street.
A: When is he coming back?
B: Around 3 o’clock.
A: Are David and Olga going to school now?
B: No, they aren’t. They have to work.
A: When are they going to school?
B: This evening.
A: Are they going to study Math?
B: No, they aren’t. They’re going to study English.
A: Where is Maria going now?
B: She’s going to the post office.
A: Why is she going there?
B: She’s going to send a letter.
A: Is she buying any stamps?
B: Yes, she is. She’s buying some stamps.
A: What are you looking for?
B: I’m looking for my pen.
A: What color is it?
B: It’s blue. Did you see it?
A: I think so. Is this your pen?
B: Yes, that’s my pen. Thanks.
A: Where are you going now?
B: I’m going to the Station.
A: Oh. Are you going to fields?
B: No, I’m not. I’m going to the city.
A: Well, have a good ride.
B: Thank you. I’ll see you tomorrow.
A: Where is Susan going now?
B: She’s going to the Bart Station.
A: Oh. Is she going to Daly City?
B: No, she isn’t. She’s going to Europe.
A: How long will it take?
B: It’s fast. Only about 45 minutes.
A: How often do the buses come?
B: They come every fifteen minutes.
A: Is that the Number 14 Bus coming now?
B: No, it isn’t. It’s the Number 49 Bus.
A: I don’t want that bus.
B: Don’t worry. The Number 14 will be here any minute.
A: Are you waiting for the street car?
B: Yes, I am. Is it coming soon?
A: Yes, it is. I think I see it now.
B: Is it the J Street Car?
A: Yes, it is. Are you going downtown?
B: No, I’m going to Civic Center.
A: Is John busy?
B: Yes, he is. He’s at the laundromat.
A: What’s he doing?
B: He’s washing his clothes.
A: Please, tell him I called.
B: Sure. I’ll give him the message.
A: Are David and Olga busy?
B: Yes, they are. They’re at school.
A: What are they doing?
B: They’re studying English.
A: Please, tell them I called.
B: Sure. I’ll give them the message.
A: Is Sandra busy?
B: Yes, she is. She’s at the nightclub.
A: What’s she doing?
B: She’s playing the piano.
A: Please, tell her I called.
B: Sure. I’ll give her the message.
A: Mario can’t talk to you now. He’s busy.
B: What’s he doing?
A: He’s cooking dinner.
B: That’s okay. Please tell him I called.
A: Sure. I’ll give him the message.
B: I’ll call back tomorrow.
A: Sylvia can’t talk to you now. She’s busy.
B: What’s she doing?
A: She’s cleaning her room.
B: That’s okay. Please tell her I called.
A: Sure. I’ll give her the message.
B: I’ll call back in a little while.
A: Where are Mr. and Mrs. Wilson?
B: They’re in the dining room.
A: Are they having dinner now?
B: Yes, they are. Can I take a message?
A: Yes, this is their friend Roberta.
B: I’ll tell them you called.
A: Where are Mr. and Mrs. Johnson?
B: They’re in the basement right now.
A: What are they doing?
B: They’re looking for old letters.
A: Please, tell them I called.
B: Sure. I’ll give them the message.
A: Are your students interesting?
B: Yes, they are. They’re from different countries.
A: Do they speak different languages?
B: Yes, they do. English isn’t Mr. Soto’s first language.
A: What language does Mr. Soto speak?
B: He speaks Japanese. He’s from Japan.
A: Are your students interesting?
B: Yes, they are. They’re from different countries.
A: Do they speak different languages?
B: Yes, they do. English isn’t Mario’s first language.
A: What language does Mario speak?
B: He speaks Spanish. He’s from Mexico.
A: Are your students interesting?
B: Yes, they are. They’re from different countries.
A: Do they speak different languages?
B: Yes, they do. English isn’t Natasha’s first language.
A: What language does she speak?
B: She speaks Russian. She’s from Moscow.
A: What are your students doing now?
B: They’re practiciing conversation.
A: Are they studying pronunciation too?
B: Yes, they are. They practice conversation and study pronunciation every day.
A: When are they going to read a story?
B: They’re going to read a story on Friday.
A: Where are Tom and Mary?
B: They’re at school.
A: What are they doing?
B: They’re studying English.
A: When is their class?
B: It’s at 10.
A: Where are you going now?
B: I’m going to the Bart Station.
A: Oh. Are you going to Berkeley?
B: No, I’m not. I’m going to Daly City.
A: Well, have a good ride.
B: Thank you. I’ll see you tomorrow.
A: Are your children in school?
B: No, they aren’t. It’s a holiday.
A: Where are they?
B: They’re in the park.
A: What are they doing?
B: They’re playing baseball.
A: Are they playing soccer, too?
B: No, they aren’t. They’re only playing baseball.
A: Where are you going?
B: I’m going to the supermarket.
A: What are you buying?
B: I’m buying some groceries.
A: When are you coming back?
B: I’m coming back at 2 o’clock.
A: Some students are absent today.
B: Where are they? Are they at work?
A: Maria isn’t at work. She’s at the dentist.
B: Where are Mr. and Mrs. Soto today?
A: They’re at the Social Security Office.
B: Our teacher is absent today, too!
A: Are you waiting for the street car?
B: Yes, I am. Is it coming soon?
A: Yes, it is. I think I see it now.
B: Is it the J Street Car?
A: Yes, it is. Are you going downtown?
B: No, I’m going to Civic Center.
A: Some students are absent today.
B: Where are they? Do you know?
A: George isn’t here. He’s working today.
B: Where are David and Olga today?
A: They’re shopping downtown.
B: Our teacher isn’t here, either!
A: What are Sam and Betty doing?
B: They’re watching TV.
A: What program are they watching?
B: They’re watching the news on Channel Five.
A: Do they like to watch TV?
B: Yes. They sometimes like to watch TV.
A: What’s Mary doing right now?
B: She’s practicing the piano.
A: How often does she practice?
B She practices piano every evening.
A: She likes to play the piano.
B: She certainly does.
A: What’s Henry doing right now?
B: He’s cooking dinner.
A: What kind of food is he cooking?
B: He’s cooking Mexican food.
A: How often does he cook?
B: He cooks three times a week.
A: Is Linda busy?
B: Yes, she is. She’s washing her hair.
A: Is Ted busy?
B: Yes, he is. He’s feeding his dog.
A: I have to talk to Linda or Ted.
B: You’ll have to call back later.
A: Where’s Walter?
B: He’s in the kitchen.
A: What’s he doing?
B: He’s eating breakfast.
A: I need to talk to him right away.
B: Okay. I’ll go and get him.
A: Where are Mr. and Mrs. Smith?
B: They’re in the dining room.
A: Are they eating dinner?
B: Yes, they are. Do you need to talk to them?
A: No, that’s all right. I don’t want to bother them.
B: I’ll tell them you called.
A: What’s Martha doing?
B: She’s watching TV.
A: Can I talk to her please? It’s important.
B: But, she’s watching her favorite program.
A: All right. I can call back later.
B: I’ll tell her you called.
A: Are Bob and Judy busy?
B: Yes, they are. They’re washing their windows.
A: I need to talk them right away.
B: Is it important?
A: Yes, it is. It’s very important.
B: Okay. I’ll go and get them.
A: What’s Patty Williams doing?
B: She’s fixing her bicycle.
A: I need to talk to her right away.
B: I’m sorry. She isn’t home right now.
A: She isn’t? Where is she?
B: She’s in the parking lot.
A: What’s Charlie Harris doing?
B: He’s playing the piano.
A: I have to speak with him right now.
B: I’m very sorry, but he’s not here.
A: Not there? Where is he?
B: He’s at the night club now.
A: Are Mr. and Mrs. Green busy?
B: Yes, they are. They’re eating dinner.
A: I want to talk to Mrs. Green, please.
B: I’m sorry. They aren’t home right now.
A: Well, where are they? Do you know?
B: Yes, they’re at Stanley’s Restaurant.
A: I want to talk with Mr. Sharp.
B: I’m sorry. Mr. Sharp isn’t home.
A: Where is he? Do you know?
B: At the laundromat. Do you want to talk to Mrs.Sharp?
A: Yes, I want to talk to her. It’s urgent.
B: I’ll go and get her right now.
A: Is Mr. Nathan home?
B: No, he isn’t. He’s in the park.
A: What’s he doing?
B: He’s reading today’s newspaper.
A: Okay. I’ll call back tomorrow.
B: I’ll tell him you called.
A: I’m calling about the apartment for rent.
B: Do you have any questions about it?
A: Yes. Is there a stove in the kitchen?
B: Yes, there is. It’s a new stove.
A: Is there a refrigerator?
B: Yes, there is. I bought it last year.
A: Do you have another question?
B: Yes. Are the utilities included in the rent?
A: No. You must pay for the gas and electric.
B: Must I pay for the garbage and water?
A: No. Those are included in the rent.
B: When can I see the apartment?
A: You can see the apartment right now.
B: Is your address 516 Valencia Street?
A: That’s correct. Are you driving?
B: No, I’m not. I’m walking.
A: Where are you walking from?
B: I’m at Mission and 22nd Street right now.
A: Hello?
B: I’m calling about the apartment for rent.
A: Do you have any questions about it?
B: Is it still available?
A: Yes, that apartment is still available.
B: I would like to take a look at it.
A: I’m happy to show it to you.
A: We’re looking for an apartment.
B: What area do you want to live in?
A: The Mission District is fine.
B: How many bedrooms do you need?
A: We need two or three bedrooms.
B: There’s a nice two bedroom apartment on 2nd Street
A: Are there closets in the bedrooms?
B: Yes, and those closets are large.
A: How many bathrooms are there?
B: There’s only one bathroom, but it’s very nice.
A: How much does it rent for?
B: It rents for six hundred a month.
A: My son is looking for an apartment.
B: How many bedrooms does he want?
A: He only needs one bedroom.
B: There’s a clean studio apartment on Valencia Street.
A: Are there any parking spaces?
B: No, there aren’t. But the buses come often.
A: I’m looking for an apartment.
B: What area are you interested in?
A: I want to live in the downtown area.
B: How many bedrooms do you need?
A: I need a two bedroom apartment.
B: There’s a two bedroom unit on Mission near Third.
A: Does it have a good view?
B: Yes. It’s on the third floor.
A: Does the building have an elevator?
B: Yes, it does. The elevator is new.
A: Is there any parking?
B: Yes. There are six parking spaces.
A: We like this apartment very much. We would like to rent it.
B: I need to see your references.
A: I’ll give you the name and number of my employer. How’s that?
B: Fine. I need the first and last month’s rent.
A: Do you need a cleaning deposit?
B: Yes. It’s one hundred dollars. The cleaning deposit and the last month’s rent are refundable.
A: When do you get up?
B: I usually get up at 6 AM.
A: When do you leave for school?
B: I usually leave for school at 7 AM.
A: Where do you have breakfast?
B: I usually have breakfast at home.
A: When do you get to school?
B: I usually get to school at 8 AM.
A: Do you take the bus or walk?
B: I sometimes take the bus, and I sometimes walk.
A: Where do you have lunch?
B: I usually bring my lunch from home.
A: When does your sister get home?
B: She usually gets home at 5 PM.
A: When does she eat dinner?
B: She usually eats dinner at 6 PM.
A: What does she do after dinner?
B: She always listens to her phone messages.
A: My brother usually watches TV.
B: What does he like to watch?
A: He likes to watch the news.
B: When does he go to bed?
A: He usually goes to bed around 11:00 PM.
B: I like to read a book every evening.
A: Does your daughter get up at 6?
B: No, she doesn’t. She gets up at 7.
A: Why does she get up so late?
B: She doesn’t like to get up.
A: Is she sometimes late for school?
B: Yes. She sometimes misses the bus.
A: Where do you usually have lunch?
B: We go to Stanley’s Restaurant every day.
A: Is it a good restaurant?
B: It’s not bad. They have dishes from different countries.
A: Does Stanley cook Mexican food?
B: Yes, he does. He cooks Mexican food on Saturdays.
A: Is something wrong? Are you okay?
B: I’m very tired. I work too much.
A: When do you begin work?
B: I begin work at 9 AM every day.
A: When do you finish work?
B: I finish work around 7 PM daily.
A: Your friend is sleeping. Is he okay?
B: He’s very tired. He works too much.
A: How long does he work every day?
B: He sometimes works ten hours a day.
A: How many days does he work every week?
B: He sometimes works six days a week.
A: When is your day off?
B: Wednesday is my day off.
A: What do you do on your day off?
B: I sometimes visit my sister.
A: Do you have any vacation?
B: No, I don’t. I never have a vacation.
A: When is Julia’s day off?
B: Thursday is her day off.
A: Where does she go on her day off?
B: She likes to go shopping?
A: Where does she go shopping?
B: She goes shopping.
A: What do you usually do on Sundays?
B: In the morning, I go to church.
A: Who do you go to church with?
B: I always go with my family.
A: What do you do after church?
B: We sometimes go to the park.
A: What do you do for your summer vacation?
B: I like to relax and read books.
A: What kind of books do you read?
B: I always read mysteries.
A: What do you do at night after work?
B: I don’t do much. I just take it easy.
A: Where do you usually buy food?
B: I always buy food at Safeway.
A: How far is it from your apartment?
B: It’s only a couple of blocks.
A: That’s very convenient, isn’t it?
B: Yes, it is. The bus stop is near my apartment, too.
A: Where does your sister buy medicine?
B: She buys it at Walgreen’s.
A: How far is it from her house?
B: It’s convenient. Only three blocks.
A: Does she go shopping at Safeway, too?
B: No, Safeway is too far. She goes to Cala Foods instead.
A: I would like to cash this check.
B: Do you have an account at this bank?
A: Yes. I have a checking account.
B: Please, sign your name on the back.
A: How much do I have in my account?
B: You have $500.00 in your account.
A: Do you like to go fishing?
B: Yes. I go fishing once in a while.
A: Where do you go fishing?
B: I go fishing at Fisherman’s Wharf.
A: Do you ever catch anything?
B: No, I never catch anything. But it’s fun anyway.
A: How often do you play cards?
B: I play cards once a month.
A: Who do you play cards with?
B: I usually play cards with my neighbors.
A: How long do you usually play?
B: We sometimes play cards until two in the morning.
A: How often does your cousin go to church?
B: He never goes to church.
A: What does he do on Sundays?
B: He likes to spend time with his girlfriend.
A: Do they like to play tennis?
B: Yes. They sometimes play tennis, and they sometimes have a picnic.
A: I don’t have time to go dancing.
B: Why not? Are you busy tonight?
A: Yes, I am. I have to paint my apartment.
B: Are you busy tomorrow morning?
A: No. What do you want to do?
B: Let’s go for a walk in the park.
A: I don’t have time to talk right now.
B: Do you have time tomorrow?
A: Yes. I’ll talk to you tomorrow.
B: Okay. I’ll see you then.
A: What do you do in your free time?
B: I often go to the movies.
A: Are you going to the movies tonight?
B: No. I’m going dancing tonight.
A: How often do you go dancing?
B: I go dancing once or twice a month.
A: Judy sometimes goes dancing.
B: Does she do anything else in her free time?
A: Yes, she sometimes goes out with her friends.
B: Where do they usually go?
A: They sometimes go to parties.
B: Judy must have a lot of fun.
A: What do you know about Maria?
B: She paints beautiful T shirts.
A: I know that. What else does she do?
B: She also works part time as a waitress.
A: Does she work Monday to Friday?
B: Yes. She sometimes works on the weekend, too.
A: I really like my job.
B: What kind of work do you do?
A: I’m a taxi driver.
B: Why do you like your job?
A: I meet a lot of interesting people.
B: When do you usually work?
A: From 5 in the afternoon until midnight.
A: I can’t talk now. I have to run.
B: Why are you in a hurry?
A: I have to catch the bus.
B: Maybe we’ll have time tomorrow.
A: Yes, I really want to talk to you.
A: I like my job, but I have a problem.
B: What’s your problem?
A: I don’t want to talk about it.
B: Come on. Tell me. It’s all right.
A: I never see my wife. She works from 9 to 5.
B: I understand. And you work from 5 until midnight. That’s a big problem.
A: Joe has a big problem.
B: Everybody has problems. What’s his?
A: He and his wife have different work schedules.
B: That’s not a very big problem.
A: It isn’t? Why do you say that?
B: They can see each other on the weekend.
A: Yolanda works very hard every day.
B: I know. She doesn’t have much free time.
A: She doesn’t go to movies or parties.
B: She doesn’t watch TV, either.
A: She has time to work, eat, and sleep.
B: She doesn’t have time for much else.
A: Speak louder, please. I can’t hear.
B: Why not? What’s going on?
A: There’s some construction outside.
B: What are the construction workers doing?
A: They’re tearing down a building.
B: I’ll try to talk louder.
A: I can’t talk right now.
B: Why are you running?
A: I have to run or I’ll miss the bus.
B: You said the same thing yesterday.
A: How much bread do we have?
B: We only have one loaf.
A: We have to go and buy more bread.
B: Why do we need more bread?
A: Don’t you remember? We have to make sandwiches.
B: That’s right! We’re going on a picnic tomorrow.
A: I don’t have enough milk for breakfast.
B: How much do you need?
A: I only have a cup, but I need a pint.
B: I can go to the store and buy some.
A: Do you have enough money?
B: Yes. I have a couple of dollars. That should be enough.
A: May I see the menu please?
B: Here you are. I’ll come back in a minute.
A: Where is our waitress? She’s gone.
B: May I take your order please?
A: There she is! Yes, I’ll have chicken.
B: Would you like soup or salad with that?
A: I’d like a salad.
B: What kind of dressing would you like?
A: I’d like oil and vinegar dressing.
B: Would you like baked potato or French fries?
A: I’d like French fries.
B: What would you like to drink?
A: I’d like a glass of iced tea.
B: I’ll bring your tea now.
A: Thank you. And could you bring more bread and butter?
B: Yes, certainly. I’ll be right back.
A: I like this restaurant very much.
B: So do I. I hope we can eat here again soon.
A: We’re out of lettuce. We need more.
B: Why do we need more lettuce?
A: We have to make sandwiches. Don’t forget.
B: That’s right. I’ll go to the corner and buy some.
A: Also, please buy some tomatoes.
B: Oh, no. We’re out of tomatoes too?
A: Our neighbor needs some sugar.
B: Why does she need sugar?
A: She’s out of sugar, and she’s making a cake.
B: No problem. We’ll give her a cup of sugar.
A: Are you sure we have some?
B: Yes, I’m sure we have lots of sugar.
A: Excuse me, please. Where’s the milk?
B: The dairy section, end of aisle 8.
A: And where can I find the tomatoes?
B: The produce section, over there.
A: And where can I find the salt?
B: You’ll find it in the middle of aisle 6.
A: I need some lettuce, but I can’t find it.
B: It’s usually in the produce section.
A: But, there isn’t any lettuce there now.
B: I guess we ran out of lettuce. Try again tomorrow.
A: I also need some tomatoes. I can’t find them either.
B: We ran out of them. We’ll have more tomorrow.
A: I tried to buy lettuce and tomatoes.
B: What happened? Why didn’t you buy them?
A: The store didn’t have any lettuce or tomatoes.
B: That’s too bad. Now, we can’t make sandwiches.
A: But I have good news, too.
B: You’re carrying a big bag of groceries.
A: Yes, I am. I have apples, oranges, a watermelon, and grapes.
A: Is this dress on sale?
B: No, it isn’t. But this blouse is on sale.
A: How much is it?
B: It’s 3 dollars.
A: How much will I save?
B: It was 35 dollars. So, you will save 5 dollars.
A: Is this coat on sale?
B: No, it isn’t. But this sweater is on sale.
A: How much is it?
B: It’s 2 dollars.
A: How much will I save?
B: It was 3 dollars. So, you will save 6 dollars.
A: Are these pants on sale?
B: No, they aren’t. But these shoes are on sale.
A: How much are they?
B: They’re 8 dollars.
A: How much will I save?
B: They were 6 dollars. So, you will save 4 dollars.
A: Are these shirts expensive?
B: No, they aren’t. They’re cheap now.
A: How much are they?
B: They are each 30 dollars.
A: How much will I save?
B: They were 40 dollars. So, you will save 10 dollars.
A: I can’t talk now. I have to hurry.
B: Why are you always late?
A: Because I don’t get up early.
B: Maybe we’ll have time tomorrow.
A: I want a red dress.
B: What size do you wear?
A: I wear size ten. Do you have that size?
B: Yes. All of the dresses are over there.
A: Are they on sale this week?
B: Some of them are, and some of them aren’t.
A: I need a blue shirt.
B: What size do you wear?
A: I wear a large size. Do you have large shirts?
B: Yes. All of the shirts are over there.
A: Are they on sale?
B: Yes. A few of them are on sale.
A: My son needs pants.
B: We don’t sell boy’s pants.
A: Where can I buy pants for my son?
B: You can buy them at the store across the street.
A: Are they expensive?
B: No. They aren’t expensive, and they aren’t cheap, either.
A: My daughter wants a green skirt.
B: We don’t sell girl’s clothes.
A: Where can I buy a skirt for my daughter?
B: You can buy it at the store across the street.
A: Is it expensive?
B: No, it isn’t expensive, and it isn’t cheap, either.
A: I went to Macy’s this morning.
B: Did you find some nice clothes?
A: Yes, I did. I bought a warm sweater and new shoes.
B: Did you try on the sweater before you bought it?
A: Yes, I did. It fit perfectly. It’s a red sweater.
B: I like it very much. But, I think you should return the shoes. They aren’t attractive.
A: Where are Olga and David?
B: They’re in Room 2.
A; Is Room 2 a classroom?
B: Yes, it is. They’re students.
A: How long is their class?
B: It’s an hour and a forty five minutes.
A: Is Teresa home?
B: No, she isn’t. She’s at work.
A: Do you have her work number?
B: No, I don’t. But, it’s in the phone book.
A: Where does she work?
B: She works at Safeway. She’s a cashier.
A: Where are Ronald and Julie?
B: They’re at home. They’re retired.
A: What were their jobs?
B: David was a teacher. Mary was a secretary.
A: When did they retire?
B: They retired last year.
A: Is David at home?
B: No, he isn’t. He’s at work.
A: Is he at work all day?
B: Yes, he is. He’s a police officer.
B: When will he be home?
A: He’ll be home before six.
A: Donna and Jim are nurses.
B: Where do they work?
A: They work at General Hospital.
B: What are their hours?
A: They work from 3 PM to midnight.
B: I will call them tomorrow morning.
A: Jack is usually home before 5.
B: Where does he work?
A: He works at Rite Aid Drugstore.
B: Do you have his work number?
A: No, I don’t. But it’s in the phone book.
B: I’ll look it up and call him now.
A: Dave and Olga always come home before 12.
B: Where do they work. Do you know?
A: They don’t work. They’re students.
B: Where do they go to school?
A: They attend classes at Mission Campus.
B: I have that number. It’s 550-4384.
A: Cindy always gets home by 4:00.
B: Where does she go to school?
A: She attends Everett Middle School.
B: What grade is she in?
A: She’s in the seventh grade.
B: That’s okay. I can call back later.
A: How many children do you have?
B: I have three children.
A: Are they all in school?
B: The two older children are in school.
A: How about your youngest child?
B: She doesn’t go to school yet.
A: My oldest son is in middle school.
B: How old is he?
A: He’ll be thirteen next month.
B: What grade is he in?
A: He’s in the eighth grade.
B: Does he like his classes?
A: Yes, he likes all his classes.
A: You look worried. What’s the matter?
B: I’m having trouble with my sink.
A: Are you trying to fix it?
B: Yes, but it’s still leaking.
A: Maybe you should call a plumber.
B: You’re probably right.
A: Ace Plumbing Company.
B: Hello. Do you fix kitchen sinks?
A: Yes, we do. What’s your problem?
B: My drain is stopped up. I can’t fix it.
A: We can send a plumber over there tomorrow morning. Is 9:30 AM okay?
B: Oh, that’s great. I’ll be here.
A: This light doesn’t work.
B: Are you trying to repair it?
A: Yes. I’m trying to, but I can’t.
B: Perhaps you should call an electrician.
A: I want to, but I don’t know any electricians.
B: My friend Jose is a good electrician. You should call him.
A: You looked concerned. What’s the problem?
B: This refrigerator doesn’t work.
A: I know why. That refrigerator is very old.
B: I guess we need a new one.
A: Maybe we can buy one on sale.
B: Macy’s has a sale this Saturday.
A: I can’t talk. The bus is leaving.
B: You always almost miss the bus.
A: Because I don’t hear my alarm clock.
B: Maybe you need a louder one.
A: Hello. Manager.
B: Hello? This is Jonh Jones in Apartment #25.
A: Yes, Mr. Jones. How can I help you?
B: My oven doesn’t work.
A: Okay. We’ll send someone to check it.
B: Thanks very much.
A: I can’t fix your oven, Mr. Jones.
B: You can’t fix it? Why not?
A: I think we need to replace your stove.
B: Why do you need to replace it?
A: Your stove is too old. The parts are worn.
B: I hope you can replace it soon. I need a stove!
A: Hello. May I speak to the landlord?
B: Speaking. How may I help you?
A: I have a leaky faucet in the bathroom.
B: You need to tighten the handle.
A: I did that. The faucet still leaks.
B: I’ll send a plumber over there immediately.
A: I have another problem here.
B: Another problem? All right, what is it?
A: My front door doesn’t close.
B: I’ll send my brother over there right away.
A: I don’t want him. I want a carpenter.
B: My brother is a carpenter.
A: Oh, he is? That’s great.
B: I’m sure he can fix your front door.
A: I’m sorry to bother you again.
B: What’s the problem this time?
A: It rained very hard last night, you know.
B: Don’t tell me. There’s a leak in your ceiling.
A: Yes. It’s very bad. I have to use a bucket.
B: I’m angry because the roof is only two years old.
A: Can you please do something about it?
B: I’ll send a roofer over there today.
A: This is Doctor’s Clark’s Office.
B: I’d like to make an appointment .
A: What’s the problem?
B: I have a bad cough.
A: Can you come in on Friday at 2 PM?
B: 2 PM? That will be fine. Thank you.
A: I’d like to change my appointment.
B: When is your appointment.?
A: It’s on Friday at 2:00 PM.
B: I have an opening at 3:00 PM. Is that better?
A: Yes, that time is much better. Thank you.
B: We’ll see you here at 3:00 PM on Friday.
A: How may I help you?
B: What do you recommend for a sore throat?
A: I recommend Cold Eze Throat Lozenges.
B: Where can I find them?
A: They’re in Aisle 3 on the top shelf.
B: I’ll try them and see if they work. Thank you.
A: What do you recommend for a bad headache?
B: I suggest you try Aleve. It’s good for pain.
A: Aleve? Where can I find it?
B: You can find it at any pharmacy.
A: Will they have it at Walgreen’s?
B: I’m sure they have it there. Walgreen’s isn’t far.
A: My brother has acid indigestion.
B: I recommend Tagamet . It’s very good for that.
A: Where can I purchase Tagamet?
B: It is sold at most drugstores.
A: Do they sell it at Rite Aide?
B: Yes, I’m sure Rite Aide will have it.
A: Doctor, what can I do for this cough?
B: You need cough syrup.
A: Cough syrup? What kind should I get?
B: I’m giving you a prescription.
A: How often should I take the cough syrup?
B: Take two teaspoons at bedtime.
A: Doctor, can you help me? I ‘m in a lot of pain.
B: You need effective pain medicine.
A: Pain medicine? What kind should I get?
B: I’m giving you a prescription.
A: How often should I take the medicine?
B: Take two capsules every four hours.
A: I’m calling about my pain medicine.
B: Yes, how can I help you?
A: The pharmacist won’t refill my prescription.
B: The doctor has to okay the refill. What’s your pharmacy’s phone number?
A: It’s 991.
B: The doctor will call the pharmacy today.
A: My ankle is swollen and it hurts.
B: We should take an X-Ray.
A: Why do I need an X-Ray?
B: An X-Ray will tell us if it’s broken or not.
A: What should I do now?
B: You must go to room !06 for the X-Ray.
A: Your ankle isn’t broken. Don’t worry.
B: What’s wrong with it?
A: It’s a sprained ankle. It’ll be better in two weeks.
B: What should I do?
A: Hi, Mary. Why are you here?
B: I’m here to get my ID card.
A: What do you need to bring?
B: I need to bring my birth certificate.
A: Do you have to take a test?
B: No, I don’t. I only need to get my picture taken.
A: My friend Tom is getting his learner permit.
B: Does he have to take a test?
A: Yes, he does. He must take a written test.
B: Does he have to take a road test?
A: No. He’ll take the road test when he applies for his driver license.
A: Julie. What are you doing here?
B: I’m applying for my driver license.
A: Are you going to take the road test?
B: I already took it. And, I passed it.
A: Congratulations. What do you need to do now?
B: Now I need to get an eye test.
A: Are you applying for a learner permit?
B: Yes, I am. And I’m a little nervous?
A: Are you nervous about the written test?
B: Yes, I am. I hope I pass it.
A: If you don’t pass it, you can take it again.
B: I know I can. But I want my learner’s permit now.
A: I passed the written test.
B: That’s great. I’m glad you passed it.
A: Now, I need to learn how to drive.
B: I know how to drive. I can teach you.
A: You can teach me how to drive?
B: Yes, I can. It isn’t difficult.
A: Laura is going to teach me how to drive.
B: That’s great. She’s an excellent driver.
A: Yes. She knows how to drive very well.
B: You don’t know how to drive. That’s your problem.
A: I’m not worried. I’ll learn how to drive.
B: I’m glad Laura is going to teach you.
A: I passed the road test.
B: Now you have a driver’s license.
A: Yes. Now I need to buy a car.
B: What kind of car are you looking for?
A: I don’t want to buy an expensive car.
B: You should look in the want ads.
A: Dora is going to look for a used car.
B: Why does she want a used car?
A: She doesn’t want to buy an expensive one.
B: But used cars aren’t always good cars.
A: I know, but Dora can’t afford a new one.
B: A good used car is hard to find.
A: Manuel is applying for a Driver License.
B: He is? Is he a little nervous?
A: Yes, he is. He’s concerned about the road test.
B: I’m sure Manuel will pass it. He’s a good driver.
A: Yes. He knows how to drive very well.
B: He learned how to drive from Laura.
A: I bought a used car yesterday.
B: You did? How does it run?
A: It has some problems. The brakes aren’t good.
B: You need to talk to a good mechanic.
A: I don’t know any good mechanics. Do you?
B: Yes, my friend is a good mechanic.
A: May I speak with the manager?
B: Yes. I’m the manager.
A: I read your ad in the paper.
B: Oh. Do you want to apply for the cook job?
A: That’s right. I’m very interested.
B: All right. Please fill out this application form.
A: Can I talk to the supervisor?
B: Yes, I’m the supervisor. Can I help you?
A: I heard about an opening in your factory.
B: That’s right. Would you like to apply?
A: Yes, I would. I’m very interested.
B: Good. Please fill out this application form.
A: May I speak to Mrs. Parker?
B: I’m Mrs. Parker. How can I help you?
A: My friend told me you need a housekeeper.
B: That’s right. Do you want to apply for the job?
A: Yes, I do. I’m very interested.
B: Great. Please fill out the application on the table.
A: I’m calling about your ad for an office assistant.
B: Good. I’m glad you called.
A: Is that job still available?
B: Yes, it is. But you need to fill out an application.
A: All right. When can I come in?
B: You can come in during our office hours, from 9 to 5
A: Your application is very good.
B: Do you think so?
A: Yes, you have a lot of experience as a cook.
B: I can cook different kinds of food.
A: You can start on Monday at 1 o’clock.
A: Hello. Personnel Department.
B: Hello. This is Dave Jones. I’m calling about the teller job. I already filled out an application.
A: Yes, Mr. Jones. Your application is very good.
B: Thank you. Can I come in for an interview?
A: Yes. Can you come in on Monday at 10:00?
B: On Monday at 10? Yes, I can.
A: Do you have experience as a sales clerk?
B: Yes, I do. I have three years experience.
A: Do you know how to use a cash register?
B: Yes, I do. I can use a cash register very well.
A: Can you take inventory?
B: Yes. I know how to take inventory.
A: Do you have experience as a janitor?
B: Yes, I do. I have two years experience.
A: Do you know how to operate a vacuum cleaner?
B: Yes, I do. I can operate one very well.
A: Can you clean large offices?
B: Yes. I know how to clean large offices.
A: May I speak to the manager?
B: Yes, I’m the manager of this service station.
A: I want to ask about the mechanic job.
B: Yes. That job is still available.
A: I have four years experience as a mechanic.
B: Good. We need a mechanic. Fill out this form.
A: What job are you applying for?
B: I’m applying for the cashier job.
A: Do you have any experience?
B: Yes. I was a cashier in Europe.
A: Great. Please, fill out this application.
